Forbes WelcomeCLOSE   More Options   Quote of the Day  It's okay to be afraid, because you can't be brave or courageous without fear. Dave Chappelle, Comedian    






Jim Koch Biography - life, family, children, parents, story, wife, school, old, born, contract - Newsmakers Cumulation





 








World Biography
2004 Di-Ko
 Jim Koch Biography 



Jim Koch Biography











        President of Boston Beer
      


      Born C. James Koch, May 27, 1949, in Cincinnati, OH; married first wife
      (divorced); married Cynthia A. Fisher (a biotechnology entrepreneur);
      children: four (two from each marriage). 
      
        Education:
      
       Harvard University, B.A. 1971, J.D./M.B.A., 1978.
    


        Addresses:
      










          Office
        
        —Boston Beer Co., 75 Arlington St., Boston, MA 02116.
      



        Career
      

        Instructor for Outward Bound, 1973–77; business consultant,
        Boston Consulting Group, 1979–84; founded Boston Beer Co., 1984.
      



        Sidelights
      

        Jim Koch gave up a lucrative career as a business consultant to become a
        brewer. His family had been brewers back to his
        great–great–grandfather, but Koch's parents had
        steered him to a different profession. Koch (pronounced
        "Cook") founded Boston Beer Company in 1984, and brought
        American drinkers a domestic beer, Samuel Adams, that competed with
        imports on taste and quality. Koch's marketing skill made Samuel
        Adams the best–selling craft beer in the United States. Koch
        began by aggressively promoting his beer at bar after bar, trying to
        persuade Boston innkeepers to stock Samuel Adams. Now he presides over a
        company with sales of more than $200 million, at what might be called
        the largest small brewer in the country. A fanatic for taste, Koch still
        personally samples every batch of Samuel Adams.
      

        Koch was born in Cincinnati, Ohio, to a family of German descent. His
        ancestors had made beer in the old country, and his father was a brewer
        for a Cincinnati beer–maker. Koch did well in school, and was
        accepted to prestigious Harvard University. After completing an
        undergraduate degree in government, Koch went on to a combined program
        at Harvard that offered both a law degree and a master's in
        business. It was a particularly difficult course of study that attracted
        some stellar candidates. One of Koch's classmates was Mitt
        Romney, who went on to become governor of Massachusetts. But Koch was
        dissatisfied with life at Harvard. At the age of 23, he felt he had done
        nothing in his life yet but go to school. He wanted different kinds of
        experience. So he left his graduate program and became an instructor at
        the outdoor adventure school Outward Bound.
      

        Outward Bound was a rigorous wilderness program that taught often
        troubled teens how to survive the outdoors, work in a group, make good
        decisions, and assess risks. Koch was keenly aware that he held the
        lives of his students in his hands. During his four years with Outward
        Bound, he traveled across the West, gaining insights that helped him
        later in his business career. In a story he wrote for the 
        
          New York Times
        
         in 2003, Koch recalled how his Outward Bound groups always used a lot
        of nylon string. So he started out giving everyone more string than they
        would need, just in case. That group failed to take care of its string,
        and ended up with too little. For his next group, he doled out less
        string than necessary. This group learned to conserve the essential
        asset, and finished the adventure with string left over. Though it was
        years later that Koch started his company, it stuck with him that it was
        possible to do more with less.
      

        Koch eventually returned to Harvard and finished his double degree. He
        then got a job with a business consulting company called the Boston
        Consulting Group. He worked there for five years, but he found he was
        still not doing what he really wanted. He decided to quit the consulting
        group and invest his savings in brewing beer. His father, a lifelong
        brewery worker, was appalled. When Koch told his story for 
        
          Reader's Digest,
        
         he said, "When I told Dad, I was hoping he'd put his arm
        around me and get misty about reviving tradition. Instead he said,
        'Jim, that is the dumbest thing I've ever
        heard!'"
      

        Yet Koch's plan was far from naïve. He had carefully
        researched the market, and he believed beer drinkers were ready for a
        good domestic beer. In the early 1980s, sales of imported beer were
        growing. European beers had a reputation for better quality than
        mass–market American brands such as Coors and Miller. Yet
        European brewers frequently resorted to preservatives and fillers in
        order to make their products last for overseas shipment. At the same
        time, the United States market was seeing a flood of domestic beers made
        by very small brewers, called microbreweries. While these microbrews
        often won big on taste, their makers rarely had the marketing
        know–how to get their beers to a wide audience. Plus, most
        microbrewers had made large financial commitments to their physical
        plants, and had little money left over to push for wider distribution or
        to run advertising. Koch planned to make a fine–quality domestic
        beer that would compete with both imports and microbrews. But he aimed
        to grow beyond a regional market and become a national player.
      

        Koch started out with $100,000 of his own savings, plus $140,000 in
        loans from family and friends. Instead of buying a brewery with his
        capital, Koch took his great–great–grandfather's
        authentic German beer recipe to a contract brewer in Pittsburgh. He
        named his creation Samuel Adams, after the Revolutionary War hero and
        brewer. Though he saved an estimated $10 million by not building his own
        brewery, Samuel Adams still turned out to be an expensive beer. Using
        the quality ingredients Koch insisted on, Samuel Adams retailed for
        about 15 percent more than leading imported beers. This made it very
        difficult to sell. Koch roamed Boston, serving samples to bartenders and
        bar owners while telling them about his new company and his family
        tradition. Koch claimed he sometimes had to make 15 visits to a bar
        before he could persuade the owner to carry his brand.
      

        Boston Beer began advertising heavily in 1986. Unlike other beer
        advertising, which relied primarily on images of attractive, happy
        drinkers, Koch depicted Samuel Adams as simply a quality brew. Early
        advertising also emphasized that Samuel Adams was a domestic brand, with
        slogans like "Declare your independence from foreign
        beer." Perhaps because it was so different from established beer
        advertising, the Samuel Adams campaign attracted a lot of media
        attention. The brand caught on, and in 1992 it went into markets across
        the country. Sales grew by over 60 percent that year. By 1994,
        Koch's company was bringing in $50 million in sales, and Samuel
        Adams was the best–selling specialty beer in the United States.
      

        Sales continued to grow, and Koch's company was bringing in about
        $200 million by the mid–1990s. Koch took Boston Beer Company
        public in 1995. Koch told Gerry Khermouch of 
        
          BusinessWeek
        
         that he could have sold the company any time he wanted, and never
        worked again. But that did not appeal to him. "What would I do if
        I did sell?" he asked Khermouch. "I'd go looking
        for a brewery to buy so I could launch my own brand." Even as his
        company grew to have hundreds of employees, Koch remained intimately
        connected with the brewing process. The company began experimenting with
        unusual beers in the late 1990s, including pricey, extra–strong
        brews, and special seasonal flavors. Koch confided to Sarah Theodore, of
        
        
          Beverage Industry,
        
         that he still tasted every batch Boston Beer produced.
        "I'm still the protector of the beer," he told her.
        Not only did he make sure his company's beer tasted good straight
        out of the cask, but he traveled to bars, restaurants, and convenience
        stores to check how the beer was selling and make sure draft kegs were
        the right temperature and not beyond the sell date.
      

        After two years of research and development, Koch's company
        brought out a light (low–calorie) beer in 2002. Light beers were
        often disdained by the kind of beer connoisseurs who relished Samuel
        Adams and other craft beers. But Sam Adams Light aimed for a different
        kind of flavor than the typical light beer, and it was evidently very
        successful. Sales at Boston Beer climbed more than ten percent the year
        the light brew came out.
      

        By 2004, Koch was in his fifties and celebrated 20 years as head of
        Boston Beer. He was clearly not ready to retire, and brushed off talk of
        selling the company. His share of the company was then worth about $70
        million. He was keen on introducing Samuel Adams to younger beer
        drinkers, who often bypassed the brand for more exotic–sounding
        microbrews. He continued to tinker with beer recipes, brewing what he
        believed to be the world's strongest beer, a 50–proof
        special edition, to keep himself interested.
      



        Sources
      


          Beverage Industry,
        
         May 2003, p. 32.
      


          BusinessWeek,
        
         September 1, 2003, pp. 54–56.
      


          Management Review,
        
         April 1994, p. 16.
      


          New York Times,
        
         July 20, 2003, sec. 3, p. 12.
      


          Reader's Digest,
        
         February 1, 2000, pp. 28–30.
      




          —
        

          A.
        

          Woodward
        













User Contributions:


Comment about this article, ask questions, or add new information about this topic:





Name:



E-mail:



Show my email publicly



Type the code shown:








Public Comment: (50-4000 characters)





 Send comment



 
Jim Koch Biography forum


 
				David Kirk Biography





















Newsmakers Cumulation














World Biography
Newsmakers Cumulation



2004 A-Di
Contains articles like Ivan Allen Jr. Biography, Manuel Alvarez Bravo Biography, Idi Amin Biography, Ashanti Biography, Rachel Ashwell Biography, Robert C. Atkins Biography, Rowan Atkinson Biography, Mark Badgley and James Mischka Biography, Brian Becker Biography, Oscar Berger Biography, etc… 


2004 Di-Ko
Contains articles like Elizabeth Diller and Ricardo Scofidio Biography, Tim Donahue Biography, Hilary Duff Biography, Dale Earnhardt Jr. Biography, Shirin Ebadi Biography, Buddy Ebsen Biography, Larry Ellison Biography, Robert Evans Biography, Eve Biography, Colin Farrell Biography, etc… 


2004 Ko-Pr
Contains articles like Mike Korchinsky Biography, Dick Kovacevich Biography, Heinz Krogner Biography, Anthony LaPaglia Biography, Nick Lachey and Jessica Simpson Biography, Bill Laimbeer Biography, Robert Lanza Biography, Arthur Levitt Biography, Eugene Levy Biography, Daniel Libeskind Biography, etc… 


2004 Q-Z
Contains articles like Queer Eye for the Straight Guy cast Biography, Karel Reisz Biography, Caroline Rhea Biography, Paola Rizzoli Biography, V. Gene Robinson Biography, Andy Roddick Biography, Ilene Rosenzweig Biography, Coleen Rowley Biography, Donald Rumsfeld Biography, Jeffrey D. Sachs Biography, etc… 


2005 A-Fi
Contains articles like Freddy Adu Biography, Arthur Agatston Biography, Chris Albrecht Biography, Roger Ames Biography, Tadao Ando Biography, Lori B. Andrews Biography, Louise Arbour Biography, Sean Astin Biography, Alan Ball Biography, Jason Bateman Biography, etc… 


2005 Fo-La
Contains articles like Faith Ford Biography, Janet Frame Biography, Claire M. Fraser Biography, John Galliano Biography, Gabriel García Márquez Biography, Amalia García Biography, Thomas Gold Biography, Genevieve Gorder Biography, Michael Gordon Biography, Topher Grace Biography, etc… 


2005 La-Pr
Contains articles like Ricardo Lagos Biography, Avril Lavigne Biography, Matt LeBlanc Biography, Chang-rae Lee Biography, Janet Leigh Biography, Sandy Lerner Biography, Edward B. Lewis Biography, Bella Lewitzky Biography, Jet Li Biography, Peter Liguori Biography, etc… 


2005 Pu-Z
Contains articles like Albert Pujols Biography, Manny Ramirez Biography, Tony Randall Biography, Raven Biography, Ronald Reagan Biography, Joan Rivers Biography, Narciso Rodriguez Biography, Robert Rodriguez Biography, Roh Moo-hyun Biography, Dave Rosgen Biography, etc… 


2006 A-Ec
Contains articles like Paige Adams-Geller Biography, Jonathan Adler Biography, Eddie Albert Biography, Prince of Monaco Albert Biography, Jeremy Allaire Biography, Judd Apatow Biography, Fiona Apple Biography, Shizuka Arakawa Biography, Julius Axelrod Biography, Traian Băsescu Biography, etc… 


2006 Ei-La
Contains articles like Will Eisner Biography, Mohamed ElBaradei Biography, Enrico Fabris Biography, King of Saudi Arabia Fahd Biography, Niall Ferguson Biography, America Ferrera Biography, Jasper Fforde Biography, Patrick J. Fitzgerald Biography, Foo Fighters Biography, Matthew Fox Biography, etc… 


2006 Le-Ra
Contains articles like Heath Ledger Biography, Jason Lee Biography, Nanette Lepore Biography, Beth Lisick Biography, Benilde Little Biography, Christian Louboutin Biography, Richard Louv Biography, Alexander Lukashenko Biography, Pony Ma Biography, Seth MacFarlane Biography, etc… 


2006 Ra-Z
Contains articles like John Raitt Biography, Anders Fogh Rasmussen Biography, Harry Reid Biography, Judith Rossner Biography, Karl Rove Biography, Marjane Satrapi Biography, Kyra Sedgwick Biography, John Sentamu Biography, Gyanendra Shah Biography, John Patrick Shanley Biography, etc… 


2007 A-Co
Contains articles like AFI Biography, J. J. Abrams Biography, Don Adams Biography, Mahmoud Ahmadinejad Biography, Sophie Albou Biography, Monica Ali Biography, Robert Allenby Biography, June Allyson Biography, Brad Anderson Biography, Tom Anderson and Chris DeWolfe Biography, etc… 


2007 Co-Lh
Contains articles like Dominique Nils Conseil Biography, Robert Crais Biography, Raymond Davis Biography, Rosario Dawson Biography, Guerrino De Luca Biography, Brian De Palma Biography, Desmond Dekker Biography, E. L. Doctorow Biography, Alice Domar Biography, Mike Douglas Biography, etc… 


2007 Li-Pr
Contains articles like Gyorgy Ligeti Biography, Doug Liman Biography, Richard Linklater Biography, Penelope Lively Biography, Ron Livingston Biography, Ludacris Biography, Jack Ma Biography, Steve Madden Biography, Naguib Mahfouz Biography, Mako Biography, etc… 


2007 Pu-Z
Contains articles like Theodore Puck Biography, Kirby Puckett Biography, Daniel Radcliffe Biography, Estelle R. Ramey Biography, Lou Rawls Biography, Rachael Ray Biography, Kathleen J. Reichs Biography, Ruth Rendell Biography, Peter Rice Biography, Lloyd Richards Biography, etc… 






















2004 Di-Ko






 








World Biography
 2004 Di-Ko 


Elizabeth Diller and Ricardo Scofidio Biography
Born Elizabeth Diller, in 1954, in Poland; married Ricardo Scofidio. Education: Cooper Union School of Architecture, B.A., 1979. 
Tim Donahue Biography
Born Timothy M. Donahue, c. 
Hilary Duff Biography
Born Hilary Ann Lisa Duff, September 28, 1987, in Houston, TX; daughter of Bob (a retail executive) and Susan (a business manager) Duff.
Dale Earnhardt Jr. Biography
Born Ralph Dale Earnhardt Jr., October 10, 1974, in Concord, NC; son of Dale, Sr. (a race car driver and team owner) and Brenda Earnhardt.
Shirin Ebadi Biography
Born in 1947, in Hamadan, Iran; daughter of Mino Ebadi; married to Javad Tavassolian (an electrical engineer); children: two daughters. Education: Studied law at Tehran University.
Buddy Ebsen Biography
Born Christian Rudolph Ebsen, April 2, 1908, in Belleville, IL; died of pneumonia, July 6, 2003, in Torrance, CA. Actor and dancer. 
Larry Ellison Biography
Born Lawrence Joseph Ellison, August 17, 1944, in New York, NY; son of Florence Spellman; adopted at nine months by Florence's aunt, Lillian Ellison, and her husband, Louis; married Adda Quinn, 1967 (divorced, 1974); married Nancy Wheeler, 1976 (divorced, 1978); married Barbara Boothe, 1983 (divorced, 1987); married Melanie Craft (a romance novelist), 2003; children: David, Margaret (with Boothe). Education: Attended University of Illinois, Champaign, IL, 1962–64, and University of Chicago, 1966.
Robert Evans Biography
Born Robert J. Shapera, June 29, 1930, in New York, NY; son of Archie (a dentist) and Florence (a homemaker) Shapera; married Sharon Hugueny (an actor), May 28, 1961 (divorced, 1962); married Camilla Sparv (a model and actor), c. 
Eve Biography
Born Eve Jihan Jeffers, November 10, 1978, in Philadelphia, PA; daughter of Jerry Jeffers (a chemical–plant supervisor) and Julie Wilcher (a medical publishing–company supervisor).
Colin Farrell Biography
Born March 31, 1976, in Dublin, Ireland; son of Eamon (a professional soccer player) and Rita Farrell; married Amelia Warner (an actress), July 17, 2001 (divorced, November, 2001); children: one son (with model Kim Bordenave). Education: Studied acting at Gaiety School of Drama, Dublin, Ireland.
Howard Fast Biography
Born Howard Melvin Fast, November 11, 1914, in New York, NY; died of natural causes, March 12, 2003, in Old Greenwich, CT. Author. 
Anthony S. Fauci Biography
Born Anthony Stephen Fauci, December 24, 1940, in Brooklyn, NY; son of Stephen (a pharmacist) and Eugenia A. Fauci; married Christine Grady (a nurse), 1985; children: Jennifer, Megan, Alison. 
Roger Federer Biography
Born August 8, 1981, in Basel, Switzerland; son of Robert (a pharmaceutical company employee) and Lynette Federer (a pharmaceutical company employee). Education: Attended tennis training centers in Switzerland.
Will Ferrell Biography
Born John William Ferrell, July 16, 1968, in Irvine, CA; son of Lee (a musician) and Kay (a schoolteacher) Ferrell; married Viveca Paulin (an art–house auctioneer), August, 2000; children: Magnus Paulin. Education: University of Southern California (sports journalism), 1990.
Alberta Ferretti Biography
Born in Cattolica, Italy, c. 1950; married, c. 
Harvey Fierstein Biography
Born Harvey Forbes Fierstein, June 6, 1954, in Brooklyn, NY; son of Irving (a handkerchief manufacturer) and Jacqueline (a housewife; maiden name, Gilbert) Fierstein. Education: Pratt Institute, Brooklyn, NY, B.F.A., 1973.
Claudia Fleming Biography
Born April 11, 1959, in Brentwood, NY; married Gerry Hayden (a chef). Education: Studied at Peter Kump's New York Cooking School (now known as the Institute of Culinary Education).
George Foreman Biography
Born George Edward Foreman, January 10, 1949, in Marshall, TX; son of J.D. (a railroad worker) and Nancy Ree Foreman; married and divorced four times; married Mary Foreman; children: Michi, Freeda George, Georgetta, Natalie, Leola, George Edward II, George Edward III, George Edward IV, George Edward V, George Edward VI.
Tommy Franks Biography
Born Tommy Ray Franks, June 17, 1945, in Wynnewood, OK; married Cathryn (maiden name, Carley; March 22, 1969); children: Jacqueline. Education: Attended University of Texas at Austin, 1963–65; graduated from U.S. 
John Frieda Biography
Born July 5, 1951, in England; married Lulu (a pop singer; born Marie McDonald McLaughlin Lawrie), 1976 (divorced, 1994); children: Jordan (son).
Jim Furyk Biography
Born May 12, 1970, in West Chester, PA; son of Michael and Linda Furyk; married Tabitha Skartved, 2000; children: Caleigh Lynn. Education: Graduated from University of Arizona, 1992.
Peter Gallagher Biography
Born August 19, 1955, in New York, NY; son of Tom (an advertising executive) and Mary (a bacteriologist) Gallagher; married Paula Harwood (a music video producer), 1983; children: James, Kathryn. Education: Earned degree in economics from Tufts University, mid–1970s; attended the New England Conservatory of Music and the University of California—Berkeley.
Julie Gerberding Biography
Born Julie Louise Gerberding, August 22, 1955, in Estelline, SD; married David Rose (a computer software engineer); children: Renada (stepdaughter). Education: Case Western Reserve University, Cleveland, OH, B.S. 
Althea Gibson Biography
Born August 25, 1927, in Silver, SC; died of respiratory failure, September 28, 2003, in East Orange, NJ. Professional tennis player. 
Jean-Sebastien Giguere Biography
Born on May 16, 1977, in Montreal, Quebec, Canada; son of Claude (a bus driver) and Gisele Giguere; married Kristen Fawthrop, 2003.
Brian Graden Biography
Born March 23, 1963, in Hillsboro, IL. Education: Oral Roberts University, Tulsa, OK, B.A, 1985; Harvard Business School, Boston, MA, M.B.A., 1989.
Martha Griffiths Biography
Born Martha Wright, January 29, 1912, in Pierce City, MO; died April 22, 2003, in Armada, MI. United States Representative. 
Christopher Guest Biography
Born Christopher Haden–Guest, February 5, 1948, in New York, NY; son of Peter (an editor) and Jean (maiden name, Hindes; a network executive) Haden–Guest; married Jamie Lee Curtis (an actress), December 18, 1984; children: one son, one daughter. Education: Attended Bard College, 1967; attended New York University, 1968–70.
Buddy Hackett Biography
Born Leonard Hacker on August 31, 1924, in Brooklyn, NY; died June 30, 2003, in Malibu, CA. Comedian. 
E. Lynn Harris Biography
Born Everette Lynn Harris, in 1955, in Flint, MI; son of James Jeter and Etta W. Harris (a factory worker). 
Richard Harris Biography
Born Richard St. John Harris, October 1, 1930, in Limerick, Ireland; died of Hodgkin's disease, October 25, 2002, in London, England. 
Bruce Hayse Biography
Born c. 1949, in Burns, OR; son of Joe (stepfather, a civil engineer) and Laura; married to Jan; children: two daughters. 
David Hempleman-Adams Biography
Born 1956, in Swindon, England; married Claire (an attorney); children: Alicia, Camilla, Amelia. Education: Studied business at a Manchester, England college.
Justine Henin-Hardenne Biography
Born Justine Henin, June 1, 1982, in Liège, Belgium; daughter of Jose (a postal worker) and Françoise Henin; married Pierre–Yves Hardenne, November 16, 2002.
George Roy Hill Biography
Born December 20, 1921, in Minneapolis, MN; died December 27, 2002, in New York, NY. Film director. 
Bob Hope Biography
Born Leslie Townes Hope, May 29, 1903, in Eltham, England; died from complications due to pneumonia, July 27, 2003, in Toluca Lake, CA. Comedian and actor. 
Sam Houser Biography
Born c. 1972, in England; son of a jazz–club owner.
Hugh Jackman Biography
Born October 10, 1968, in Sydney, New South Wales, Australia; son of Chris Jackman (an accountant); married Deborra–Lee Furness (an actress), February, 1996; children: Oscar Maximilan. Education: Studied journalism at the University of Technology, Sydney; attended Actor's Centre, Sydney; theater diploma from the West Australian Academy of Performing Arts, 1994.
Peter Jackson Biography
Born October 31, 1961, in Pukerua Bay, North Island, New Zealand; son of Bill (a civil servant) and Joan Jackson; companion of Frances Walsh; children: Billy, Katie.
Jesse James Biography
Born Jesse Gregory James in 1969, in Long Beach, CA; son of an antiques dealer; married Karla (divorced); married Janine Lindemulder (an actress), 2002 (divorced, 2004); children: Jesse (son), Chandler (daughter, from first marriage), Sunny (daughter), one stepson (from second marriage).
Roy Harris Jenkins Biography
Born November 11, 1920, in Abersychan, Monmouthshire, Wales; died of a suspected heart attack, January 5, 2003, in East Hendred, Oxfordshire, England. Politician and author. 
Hu Jintao Biography
Born in December of 1942 in Shanghai, China; married Liu Yongqing; children: one son, one daughter. Education: Tsinghua University, degree in hydraulic engineering, 1964; Central Party School, 1980.
Diane Johnson Biography
Born Diane Lain, April 28, 1934, in Moline, IL; daughter of Dolph and Frances (Elder) Lain; married B. Lamar Johnson Jr., July, 1953 (divorced); married John Frederic Murray (a professor of medicine), May 31, 1968; children: Kevin, Darcy, Amanda, Simon (from first marriage). 
Norah Jones Biography
Born March 30, 1979, in New York, NY; daughter of Ravi Shankar (a world renowned sitar player) and Sue Jones (a nurse). Education: Attended University of North Texas.
Juanes Biography
Born Juan Esteban Aristizábal, August 9, 1972, in Medellín, Colombia; married Karen Martínez (a model and actress); children: Luna (daughter).
Karen Jurgensen Biography
Born c. 1949, in NC; daughter of Kai (a drama teacher) and Peggy Jurgensen; married first husband (divorced); married Bill Leary (an attorney); children: Kirsten (from first marriage). 
Elia Kazan Biography
Born Elia Kazanjoglous, September 7, 1909, in Constantinople, Turkey; died of natural causes, September 28, 2003, in Manhattan, NY. Director and author. 
Jean Kerr Biography
Born Bridget Jean Collins, July 10, 1922, in Scranton, PA; died of pneumonia, January 5, 2003, in White Plains, NY. Author and playwright. 
David Kirk Biography
Born c. 1956; married (divorced); married Kathy Anne Dropp (a museum curator), 2000; children: Violet, Primrose, Wisteria. 
Jim Koch Biography
Born C. James Koch, May 27, 1949, in Cincinnati, OH; married first wife (divorced); married Cynthia A. 


















Koch Brothers' Products • Nifty Homestead




































































































































Win Free Homestead Supplies!
Get free books, seeds, and more:




















Koch Brothers’ Products

Post by  Keiren • Last Updated: September 26, 2016Affiliate Policy: Posts may contain links to outside vendors that pay us a commission when you purchase from them, at no additional cost to you. Thank you for supporting our site! 


Koch Brothers Products — We’re Surrounded.
If you have been following news about the Koch brothers, you might be curious as to which products they manufacture.
It turns out, the Koch Brothers, with a net worth of over $40 billion each, own stakes in a ton of industries like paper and wood products, chemicals, textiles, plastics, etc.



Here are a list of companies and industries in which the Koch brothers own a stake:

Paper Products: Angelsoft, Brawny, Dixie, Mardi Gras, Quilted Northern, Soft n Gentle, Sparkle, Vanity Fair
Wood: Georgia-Pacific (largest plywood manufacturer in US – also owns most of the paper companies above).
Textiles & Plastics: Polarguard, Stainmaster, Dacron, Lycra, CoolMax/SolarMax, Thermolite, and more.
Chemicals, Coal, & Oil: Crude oil processing, Flint Hills Resources, lots of other commodities handled.
Nitrogen: One more reason to make your own fertilizer – Koch Industries produces many synthetic fertilizers.

Those are just the best known brands – there’s many more on the list below. =(
Koch Brothers Products: Paper Products










Georgia-Pacific owns all of the brands above, and also distributes paper towels, napkins and soap dispensing systems used in commerical settings. Some GP commercial toilet paper brands: Envision, Coronet®, SCA, Tork and Fort James. GP also produces Pacific Garden liquid soaps.

Georgia-Pacific produces ink and office paper under the labels: Advantage, GP (including GP Harmon recycled papers), ImagePlus and the Spectrum® family of office paper products.
Koch Brothers Products: Wood
Georgia-Pacific is the largest manufacturer of plywood in the U.S.
Including Plytanium Plywood®, DryPly® plywood, Ply-Bead®.
Georgia-Pacific is one of the country’s largest suppliers of corrugated boxes and containers.
Various, numerous wood products, dimensional lumber and building materials: Blue Ribbon, Clutter Cutter, DensArmor Plus, DensDeck, DensGlass, DensShield® gypsum board, DryPly, Fireguard®, Grant Forest OSB Board, GP Lam, Hushboard, Nautilus, Ply-Bead, Plytanium, Southern Gold, Sta-Strait, Thermostat, ToughRock and Wood I Beam.
Koch Brothers Products: Textiles and Plastics
These are under the Koch Brothers brand Invista Products. Invista produces a large selection of products under this business, including polyethylene terephthalate (PET) polymers for carbonated soft drink, water, beer, juice, food and custom container applications. Production also includes polyester intermediate feedstocks, film products, fibers, and specialty polymers for a variety of applications, inlcuding PBT-based engineering polymer.

Stainmaster
Dacron
Lycra
CoolMax
SolarMax
Polarguard
Thermolite
Antron
Comforel fiberfill
DBE® dibasic esters
Tactel
Tactesse Carpet Fibers
Terathane
ADI-Pure®
Polyshield®
Polyclear®
Oxyclear™
Performa®
Cordura fabric
Supplex® Fabric
Somerelle® Bedding

Documentary: Koch Brothers Exposed

The full-length documentary starts with the background of the Koch brothers—their father started the empire with oil money earned in the Soviet Union. This is an updated edition of the documentary, showing the latest political contributions made by the Koch Brothers. It goes on to discuss their plans for eduction, their opposition to the minimum wage, their work to increase barriers to voting, their opposition to unions, and the environmental impact of their businesses.
Koch Brothers Products: Chemicals, Coal & Oil
Through its subsidiaries Koch operates refineries in Alaska, Minnesota and Texas, with a combined crude oil processing capacity of more than 800,000 barrels per day. Koch Industries owns or operates about 4,000 miles of pipelines that transport crude oil, refined petroleum products, natural gas liquids and chemicals. Koch Minerals and its affiliates are among the world’s largest dry-bulk commodity handlers, marketing and trading more than 40 million tons of coal, petcoke, cement and other related products annually. Flint Hills Resources produces about 9 billion pounds of building-block chemicals per year. Koch is a leading producer of paving and roofing asphalt. Koch Oil Sands Operating LLC has leases for 1.1 million acres of Alberta oil fields. Their Pine Bend, Minn. refinery is one of the largest single buyers and refiners of Canadian heavy oil. Source: www.kochind.com
Koch Industries Produces:

Gasoline
Diesel
Jet fuel
Naphtha
Asphalt
Fracking Chemicals
Benzene
Toluene
Metaxylene
Paraxylene
Orthoxylene
Cumene
Cycohexane
Heavy reformate
Pseudocumene
Sure Sol ® 100
Sure Sol ® 150
Purified Isophthalic Acid
Maleic Anhydride
Trimellitic Anhydride
Ethylene
Chemical Grade Propylene
Polypropylene
Polyethylene

“In Flint Hills Resources manufacturing plants, various hydrocarbon products are the basic feedstocks. At the refineries, the main feedstock is crude oil. The refineries produce a wide range of transportation fuels for motorists, truckers and the airline industry. In the olefins plants, the company processes natural gas liquids into ethylene and propylene. In the polymers plants, those two products are processed into various forms of olypropylene, which are key ingredients in products such as consumer and healthcare products, packaging and other plastic products. In the aromatics plant, products produced during the crude oil refining process become xylenes, cumenes and other light products. Those products are the building blocks for many other chemicals and plastics.” Source: www.fhrstage.fhr.com
Koch Carbon LLC and its affiliates globally trade and transport petroleum coke, coal, cement, pulp and paper, sulfur and other related commodities through a network of bulk import/export terminals in the United States and Europe. The C. Reiss Coal Company is a leading supplier of coal and related products typically used in industrial applications or to generate electricity.
Koch Exploration Company LLC and its affiliates acquire, develop and trade petroleum and natural gas properties in the United States, Canada and Brazil.
Koch Oil Sands Operating LLC has leases for 1.1 million acres of Alberta oil fields. The Koch’s are developing a bitumen recovery project known as the Dunkirk In Situ Project which is roughly 60 km West of the Fort McKay native community. Source: =The Globe & Mail.
Frac-Chem: is an oilfield chemical manufacturer & wholesale chemical supplier with an emphasis on hydraulic fracturing, stimulation and coil tubing chemistries.
Bernie Sanders Speaks About The Koch Brothers

In this 17-minute speech from 2014, Senator Sanders discusses the Koch Brothers and their influence on politics, which has only increased since the Citizens United decision eliminated limits on campaign spending. Sanders goes over the Koch brothers’ positions. Asks Sanders: “What do they want? Why are they spending so much money on politics? What do they stand for?” He focuses on the Koch Brothers’ desire to repeal security net programs like Social Security.
Koch Brothers Products: Pipelines
Koch Pipeline and its affiliates own or operate about 4,000 miles of pipelines that transport crude oil, refined petroleum products, natural gas liquids and chemicals. Koch Alaska Pipeline Company owns an approximate 3 percent interest in the Trans Alaska Pipeline System, as well as a has a 28 percent interest in Colonial Pipeline Company, owner and operator of the world’s largest-volume refined products pipeline.
Koch Brothers Products: Fertilizer
Koch Fertilizer and its affiliates have the capability to manufacture, market and distribute more than 10 million tons of nitrogen fertilizer products annually. They distribute to dealers, so their product has many a label. “Fertilizer today is an intensely industrial business more akin to oil refining or chemical production.” Source:  www.kochind.com
Koch Brothers Products: Equipment
Koch-Glitsch and its affiliates are global leaders in the design, manufacture and installation of mass transfer and mist elimination equipment. The company’s products are found in refineries and chemical plants worldwide.
Koch Membrane Systems develops and manufactures membrane separation systems for a variety of applications worldwide, including membranes for microfiltration, ultrafiltration, nanofiltration and reverse osmosis.
John Zink Hamworthy Combustion and its affiliates are global leaders in ultra-low emission process burners, boiler burners, duct burners, flares and thermal oxidizers. The companies are also global suppliers of flare gas/vapor recovery and vapor combustor systems.
Molex makes electronic connectors, sensors and other electronic gear.
What You Don’t Know About The Koch Brothers
Daniel Schulman, author of Sons of Wichita: How the Koch Brothers Became America’s Most Powerful and Private Dynasty, discusses the family’s history. In researching his book only Frederick Koch agreed to speak to him—Frederick isn’t involved in the family company and instead spends his time restoring homes. He also describes the 20-year series of lawsuits within the family—”one of the most brutal family feuds we’ve ever seen.”
Koch Brothers Products: Cattle
Koch Ag and Energy Solutions operates three ranches with a total of 15,000 head of cattle in Kansas, Montana, and Texas. “Matador Ranch in Texas offers a number of hunting packages that include first-class accommodations. Everything is provided to ensure an enjoyable experience.” Source: www.kochind.com
Koch Brothers Services
Koch Supply & Trading companies around the world trade and provide risk management services in crude oil; refined petroleum products; natural gas and gas liquids; gas, power and emissions;  industrial metals; and other commodities and financial instruments.
Optimized Process Designs LLC provides consulting, engineering, design, procurement, fabrication and construction services for the natural gas and gas processing industries worldwide. OPD has been the general contractor on some of the largest natural gas plants built in the U.S.
Koch Knight LLC and its affiliates are leaders in acid proof solutions. The companies offer construction, engineering and services through a global network of manufacturing and outsourcing facilities. Their products, made from state-of-the-art ceramics and plastic materials, are available worldwide.
Invista provides the resources and know how to deliver world-scale technology for licensing to a growing portfolio of technologies in the polyester, polyurethane and nylon value chains.
Koch Brothers European Brands

Colhogar®
Delica®
Demak’Up®
Inversoft®
Kitten Soft®
Lotus®
Moltonel®
Nouvelle®
Okay
Tenderly®
Tutto®

Source: kochind.com
Pollution by Koch Brothers Companies
Koch Industries emits 24 million metric tons of greenhouse gases a year. Koch Industries is the nation’s 13th largest polluter/emitter according to the University of Massachusetts at Amherst’s Political Economy Research Institute. See detailed emissions breakdowns:  peri.umass.edu
Koch Industries spent a total of $37.9 million on oil and gas lobbying during 2006 to 2009. Source:  sourcewatch.org
According to the International Forum on Globalization, Charles and David Koch are America’s single largest source of private money for attacks against environmental protections. They have spent over $643 million to block or rollback legal protections for clean air, clean energy, clean water, and other environmental issues through sketchy scientific research, lobbying lawmakers, contributing to electoral candidates’ campaigns, media manipulation, etc. Source: kochcash
Petroleum coke (a byproduct of tar sands refining) has been irritating numerous residents in both Chicago and Detroit. Koch Carbon is storing enormous quantities of petroleum coke on the banks of Chicago’s Calumet River and Michigan’s Detroit River. The ever growing piles await processing, but refineries cannot keep up with the quantity. Source: thinkprogress
A routine aerial inspection found Koch Pipeline Co. spilled 400 gallons of crude oil in Texas in late October, 2013.
Environmental Charges Against Koch
November, 2014: the city of North Pole, Alaska filed suit against refinery owner Flint Hills Alaska Resources: “During the times that the defendants owned or operated the refinery, the defendants caused or allowed numerous and/or continuous releases of hazardous substances into the groundwater located beneath the refinery, and failed to contain or remediate the hazardous substances,” the lawsuit states. “Ultimately, these hazardous substances have migrated off the refinery property and have contaminated the groundwater down gradient of the refinery and within the city, including wells owned by the city and supplying drinking water to the city’s inhabitants. The presence of sulfolane contamination in the city’s groundwater has rendered that groundwater unfit for human consumption and endangers the public health or welfare, or fish, animals, vegetation or any other part of the natural habitat in which it is found,” the lawsuit states. Source: newsminer.com
December 2006: Flint Hill Resources fined nearly $16,000 by the EPA for 10 separate violations of the Clean Air Act at its Alaska oil refinery facilities, and required to spend another $60,000 on safety equipment needed to help prevent future violations. yosemite.epa.gov
May 2001: Koch Industries paid $25 million to the federal government to settle the federal lawsuit that found the company had improperly taken more oil than it had paid for from federal and Indian land. A federal jury found that Koch Industries had stolen oil from government and American Indian lands and had lied about its purchases more than 24,000 times. Source: wikipedia.org/wiki/Koch_Industries
September 2000: A federal grand jury in Corpus Christi, Texas returned a 97-count indictment against Koch Industries Inc., Koch Petroleum Group for violating federal clean air and hazardous waste laws, due to the release of at least 91 metric tons of uncontrolled, untreated carcinogenic benzene. In April 2001, the company reached a $20 million settlement in exchange for admitting to covering up environmental violations at its refinery in Corpus Christi, Texas. Source: justice.gov
March 2000: Koch petroleum which operates a refinery in Rosemount, Minn., was sentenced to pay a $6 million criminal fine and pay an additional $2 million in remediation costs. This is the largest federal environmental fine ever paid in Minnesota. Koch admitted that it negligently discharged 200,000 – 600,000 gallons of aviation fuel into a wetland and an adjoining waterway. In addition, their way of recovering the fuel (a year and a half later) destroyed a portion of the surrounding ecosystem and wildlife habitat. In a separate offense, Koch dumped a million gallons of wastewater with high ammonia content on the ground between November 1996 and March 1997 and also increased its flow of wastewater into the Mississippi River on weekends when no one monitored discharges. These actions allowed Koch to circumvent the weekly monitoring and reporting requirements of its wastewater discharge permit. The case was investigated by EPA’s Criminal Investigation Division, the FBI and the Minnesota Pollution Control Agency and was prosecuted by the U. S. Attorney’s Office for the District of Minnesota. Source: www.ehso.com
January 2000: Koch Pipeline agreed to a $35 million settlement with the U.S. Justice Department and the State of Texas as fines for the firm’s three hundred oil spills (300 million gallons) in Texas and five other states going back to 1990. Source: wikipedia.org/wiki/Koch_Industries
August 1996: Koch’s Sterling butane pipeline had a leak in Lively, Texas, on August 24, 1996. Two teenagers on the way to report the leak drove into the unseen butane cloud, and were killed when the gas exploded and burned. The National Transportation Safety Board concluded that severe external pipeline corrosion was the cause of the failure. Source: wikipedia.org/wiki/Koch_Industries
Koch Brothers: Climate Change Denial
A March 2010 Greenpeace report shows that Koch Industry foundations have contributed (2005-2008) nearly $25 million to organizations that oppose clean energy and climate policy. That does not include oil and gas lobbying of $37.9 million. For more info on Koch Industries’ funding of Climate Denial Groups — Source: GreenPeace’s report “Koch Industries Funding the Climate Denial Machine” pdf at greenpeace.org
In the August, 2010 New York Magazine article ‘Covert Operations,‘ oil tycoon David Koch was quoted as saying, global warming will be a good thing for the planet and will help “support enormously more people because a far greater land area will be available to produce food.” Source: newyorker.com
Koch Brothers: Revenue

Koch Industries brings in $115 billion in revenue annually.
Charles Koch has a net worth of over $42 billion.
David Koch also has a net worth of $42 billion. The Koch brothers’ combined net worth is $84 billion.
Charles Koch has called the recent push to raise the minimum wage ‘an obstacle to prosperity’. forbes

Koch Brothers: Voting Rights
Since the Citizen’s United decision, corporations can now attempt to influence their employees’ votes. The Koch Brothers jumped on that band wagon right away and mailed out lists of Koch supported candidates to their 50,000 employees during the last election. See info and a copy of a recommended election packet at thenation.com
Koch Brothers: University Affairs
They give as long as they can pick the teachers. See “Billionaire’s role in hiring decisions at Florida State University raises questions” at tampabay.com
Not Just Florida State…Utah, West Virginia, etc… Source: insidehighered.com
The Mercatus Center is a conservative Think Tank at George Mason University’s Arlington campus. It is a university-based research center that makes its research findings available to the media and public policy makers. According to GreenPeace the Mercatus Center has received over 10 million dollars worth of funding from the Koch Brothers. Mercatus also fights environmental regulation, opposes clean energy legislation and lobbys to prevent curbs on industrial pollution. Sources: greenpeace.org,  mercatus.org
List of Koch Organizations

Koch Family Foundations
Koch Network
Freedom Partners
Americans for Prosperity
American Encore
60 Plus
Generation Opportunity
Knowledge and Progress Fund
DonorsTrust
Donors Capital
TC4 Trust

Koch Brothers Oppose Electric Cars

This report from the show The Young Turks explains that the Koch Brothers are backing a new organization trying to stop the rising tide of electric vehicle adoption. This would hurt petroleum producers like the Koch Brothers. The group is likely to run ads attacking the subsidies given to electric cars.

Related Posts 

Kombucha Fabric
Algae Streetlight
Kitchen Of The Future
Genetically Modified Cartoons
Cork Chair Inspiration
Wedge Shaped Cars
Banksy's Environmental Message
Food Consumption In America
Midway Island Albatross 
 




Affiliate Policy (full policy): Posts may contain links to outside vendors that pay us a commission when you purchase from them, at no additional cost to you. Thank you in advance for supporting our site.

Win Free Homestead Supplies!
Signup for our newsletter and get updates on our monthly contests for great homesteading gear:
















Author: Keiren
Keiren is an artist who lives in New York City. A lover of animals, nature, science & green building.







			Comments		





Too bad only the ‘little people’ can be criminals!


Reply 






Why are we letting these people completely ruin this country and planet, when it is too late then maybe we will wake up and get rid of these people. This renegrade criminal group will destroy everything that humans hold sacred, for the love of money. What they will do with all of this money when there is no planet worth living on, I often wonder.


Reply 






Hi America, England here. The news I have for you is Charles Koch was a board director in the Royal Bank of Scotland just before the worldwide banking collapse. He is now a director of a large American property management group that I understand bought a lot of the low cost properties during America’s slump. Stil researching for facts, but can let you know if I find anything?


Reply 






Half of the chemicals thet use are known carcinogens. They have been banned by the FDA! How do they get around the law? They must be investigated for numerous violations.6


Reply 






Not Tork!
Georgia Pacific is indeed a filthy company and should be avoided at all costs.
but Tork products are fine–they compete with GP. in fact, their parent company, SCA is one of the greener companies in the US, and the paper products in particular are recycled, Green Seal approved, etc. etc.
please correct this—we want people to be able to find alternatives to G=P products!


Reply 






Hello All,
I need to know of Pearson Publishing is connected to the Koch brothers. 
Thank you.


Reply 






Will you create a list of union friendly and environment friendly options to patronize and promote?


Reply 






Good to know the companies to steer clear of and never buy there products.


Reply 






Quality posts is the crucial to invite the people to pay a quick visit the web page, that’s what this site is providing.


Reply 






I will not buy anything made by the Koch brothers.


Reply 






I was searching for a complete list and this was very informative. The processing of bulk crude and coal leads to tons of byproducts that they then sell to us. 
Been using cloth napkins and cloth dish towels for years. Mom does too, same with grocery bags. Now to make plastic garbage extinct instead of the planet. 
Good luck planet, 
thanks Inspiration Green for I good ID of a couple real life villains.


Reply 






I am the Business Manager of this private start-up business , founded at LSU, and is focused on ‘Drone technology solutions in the Commercial Industries’. If you know of any private investor, either silent of strategic, please let me know of them so I can find if they would like to invest in this market that is expanding rapidly. View the website http://www.environmentalroboticsinstitute.com


Reply 






This is hard to believe! is no one else presenting these to the American people?? Why isn’t the media shouting this from the rooftops? These robber barons must be stopped!


Reply 






I would like to know why the fines and penalties are so minimal and also why they are not prosecuted as individuals since they obviously manage all these companies. They must know what is going on with their companies. Don’t hey have to sign certified audit statements?


Reply 






No worse than selling body organs of 1/2 born human beings. Obviously a liberal website when it appears only the liberal opinions are being shown.


Reply 






Sorry obviously didnt read every post. Good to see there are some decent conservatives that still believe in capitalism and free enterprise. If you work hard you can achieve the American dream and employee hard working people as well instead of believing the liberal crap of global warming, pollution, etc.


Reply 






This take’s alot of work. A lot of people producing a profit. Now I know which brands to support.


Reply 






Hemp is good. They should support hemp!


Reply 






Having been a faithful consumer of the products shown above for years I feel the need to let you know just how ‘extremely upset’ I am with these products as of late!!! 
Didn’t surprise me in the least when I found the owners of the companies who are putting these products out are you, the Koch Brothers, and actually gave me some insight as to why we are being ripped off!
Just how stupid do you think we are to not notice how the boxes of Kleenex, your 3-ply toilet tissue and the paper towel are being shorted. I consider myself a wise shopper and whether it matters to you or not, I’ve worked hard for my money owning my own business for 30 years! Had I treated my customers like you do in at least one company you own, my business would have been short lived.
Unfortunately you aren’t alone in your treatment of the consumers who line your pockets with silver and gold! 
I’m certain this comment won’t even be seen by you personally, but I do hope your departments who handle complaints might sit up and take notice if they receive enough of them.
In the past I talked many of my friends and family into buying your products. They too have noticed the quality isn’t there anymore!!
Hope Intellyou enjoy your wealthy lifestyle without regret. Just remember one thing, ‘you can’t take it with you when you die!!!!!’


Reply 






Having been a faithful consumer of the products shown above for years I feel the need to let you know just how ‘extremely upset’ I am with these products as of late!!! 
Didn’t surprise me in the least when I found the owners of the companies who are putting these products out are you, the Koch Brothers, and actually gave me some insight as to why we are being ripped off!
Just how stupid do you think we are to not notice how the boxes of Kleenex, your 3-ply toilet tissue and the paper towel are being shorted. I consider myself a wise shopper and whether it matters to you or not, I’ve worked hard for my money owning my own business for 30 years! Had I treated my customers like you do in at least one company you own, my business would have been short lived.
Unfortunately you aren’t alone in your treatment of the consumers who line your pockets with silver and gold! 
I’m certain this comment won’t even be seen by you personally, but I do hope your departments who handle complaints might sit up and take notice if they receive enough of them.
In the past I talked many of my friends and family into buying your products. They too have noticed the quality isn’t there anymore!!
Hope you enjoy your wealthy lifestyle without regret. Just remember one thing, ‘you can’t take it with you when you die!’


Reply 






I have stopped buying any products that they make ,I know that won’t even make a dent in their fortune but it makes me feel better by not supporting them , didn’t see stain Master carpet on the list but they own that too .


Reply 






No fracking !


Reply 






Where is the list of sources cited for this information. I hate it when I think I’ve found a reputable source, but then find out that the page doesn’t cite any sources.


Reply 






Greetings! Who may I speak with in your Marketing or Advertising Department about being an Ad Sponsor for ‘Community Garden’ which can originate at KCAA Radio, and, two of its other stations, in Loma Linda, California, being Southern California outside of Los Angeles, CA. The listener reach is up to six million listeners, and, at a 400,000 person reach per hour. You can pay the radio station or my Ad Agency for a six month contract. Your Fertilizer or Paper Products would be GREAT to have. The cost is either $40 a week, or, full sponsorship at $160 a week on a Saturday mid morning broadcast or, at $250 a week for a drive time sponsorship. You can mix up the various products to advertise. I will also send the recorded LIVE show to about 25 other radio stations across the USA at no extra cost. My Digital Magazine ‘Community Garden’ and you can find the Link on my Facebook page
‘Community Garden Magazine’. I have great companies that provide pictures and articles for my Magazine from Walmart Foundation, Ames.com, Lowe’s Home Improvement, Baker Creek Heirloom Seed Company, Garden Tower Project, and, more. I interview Groups from all over the USA. Thanks! for your time. Hope we can do some Business together. Have a Great Community Garden Day! Mary K. Hukill, PHONE: 812-760-4879


Reply 






Avoid all these companies for a brighter future!


Reply 



Pingback: Andrew Carnegie was a #CUCK! | Teen Sleuth Haunted Library





These men (demons) lack the true meaning of what it means to be human. They respect nor create anything that is truly of value to the human condition. What they do create is disrespect steeped in greed, arrogance and stupidity. They have damned their own generations. My prayers will have no value for their spirits


Reply 





Leave a Reply Cancel reply 
Your email address will not be published. Required fields are marked *Comment Name * 
Email * 
Website 
 

 





 


 



  Latest Posts: 

How To Start A Farm


How To Choose A Greenhouse Material


Indigenous Microorganisms (IMO)


Tree Cookies


How To Remove Bramble Bushes


The Best Amazon Prime Day Deals For Homesteaders


Chicken Diseases


Transitioning From City Life To Country Life


How To Build A Headboard


English Garden Inspiration For Your Yard


Nifty Homestead Giveaway – July 2017


6 Plants That Like Wet Soil


Raw Milk


Growing Blackberries


Companion Planting For Sweet Corn


Is Tesla’s Solar Tile Roof Right For You?


Polycarbonate Greenhouses


Companion Planting For Eggplant





 





































 


James Koch
 | LinkedIn
 


























 









LinkedIn



















































Main content starts below.




James KochInformatics Consultant at Coventry Health Care, an Aetna CoLocationAustin, TexasIndustryHospital & Health CareCurrentAetna HealthcarePreviousIdealforce LLC, Magellan Health Services, Texas Department of State Health ServicesEducationIndiana University BloomingtonRecommendations4 people have recommended James175 connectionsView James’ full profile. It's free!Your colleagues, classmates, and 500 million other professionals are on LinkedIn.View James’ Full ProfileSummaryOver 20 years experience in operations improvement, team leadership, project management, and program evaluation.  Utilized holistic approach to address analysis and consistently provided quality products exceeding client’s documented and unarticulated needs.  Created Medicaid fraud investigation reports.  Documented cost savings for implementation of cost recovery program.  Evaluated and modified desk audit materials to improve audit effectiveness and employee morale.  Collaborated with the CDC and State health departments to create national outcome measures for health education programs.  Analyzed reimbursement fee structure to allow increases in provider fees while remaining within State budget guidelines.  Reviewed client-specific reports to improve product quality and eliminate system-related errors.  Currently located in Austin, TX.  PhD University of California, Davis.  MPH Indiana University.Specialties: Systems Analysis, Program Evaluation, Team Leader, Health Data Analyst, Project Manager, Epidemiologist, Community Planning, InstructorExperienceSr Informatics ConsultantAetna HealthcareApril 2013  –  Present (4 years 4 months)Austin, Texas AreaVerification and reconciliation of PBM Contract reporting for Medicare, Medicaid, and Commercial lines of business.•	Tracking rebate reporting and payments•	Verify and monitor PBM contract Metrics•	Health Outcome Rebate Analytics•	Monitor Specialty Drug Pricing and Reconciliation Reports•	Monitor Membership and Shortfalls, Internet Penetration, and Mail Utilization Reporting•	Support clinical team in maintaining and updating formulariesBusiness AnalystIdealforce LLCJuly 2011  –  September 2012 (1 year 3 months)Austin, Texas Area•	Development of CMS required reports for a Medicaid Management Information System and reporting platform for Medical and Pharmacy claims, •	Created test cases and implemented UAT testing for the data warehouse and reports.•	Documented functional mapping and business requirements for use in data warehouse development.•	Subject Matter Expert for professional, institutional, and pharmacy claims, provider and provider reimbursement business areas.Sr Business AnalystMagellan Health ServicesJanuary 2006  –  December 2010 (5 years)Systems Analysis, Team Leader, Medicaid Fraud Investigation, Health Data Analysis.•	Developed Medicaid Fraud investigation reports.  •	Spearheaded development of cost recovery reports.•	Analyzed fee structure for service provision which allowed client to modify reimbursement strategies annually while remaining under program budget.•	Documented implementation of client-requested software modifications.•	Created audit reports which documented timely payment for Medicaid claims.EpidemiologistTexas Department of State Health ServicesMarch 1997  –  December 2005 (8 years 10 months)Program Evaluation, Team Leader, Health Data Analysis, Project Manager, Community Planning.•	Authored the HIV/STD Epidemiological profile for Texas.•	Collaborated with the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) and three State Health Departments to develop outcome measures for chronic disease monitoring.•	Established the first behavioral database for Hepatitis C testing in Texas.•	Adapted published techniques for the cost-effectiveness analysis of education programs which allowed management to support expenditures for educational programs.Research AssociateIndiana Prevention Resource CenterMay 1996  –  March 1997 (11 months)Systems Analysis, Program Evaluation, Team Leader, Project Manager, Community Planning, Lecturer•	Administered development of evaluation materials for behavioral modification-based education programs.  •	Developed tools for case managers to track patient progress during long-term drug prevention programs.•	Collaborated with the Substance and Mental Health Services Administration (SAMHSA) in a national evaluation of drug prevention programs.Volunteer Experience & CausesCauses James cares about:Animal WelfareArts and CultureCivil Rights and Social ActionEducationEnvironmentHealthHuman RightsPoverty AlleviationScience and TechnologyHonors & AwardsTeam Work AwaradBureau of HIV/STDApril 2005CoursesIndiana University BloomingtonExperimental Design and Analysis (T693)Experimental Design and Analysis (T693)Correlation Techniques (T691)Correlation Techniques (T691)Statistical Techniques of Research in HPER (T592)Statistical Techniques of Research in HPER (T592)Measurement and Evaluation in Health Education (H594)Measurement and Evaluation in Health Education (H594)Program Planning (C501)Program Planning (C501)Environmental Health Science (C512)Environmental Health Science (C512)International Health (H530)International Health (H530)Epidemiology (C511)Epidemiology (C511)Advanced Nutrition (N530)Advanced Nutrition (N530)Organization and Administration of Public Health Programs (C510)Organization and Administration of Public Health Programs (C510)Nutritional Assessment Analysis (N532)Nutritional Assessment Analysis (N532)Philosophy and Principles of Health Eductation (C500)Philosophy and Principles of Health Eductation (C500)Ithaca CollegeVertebrate Structure and Function (Biol 211)Vertebrate Structure and Function (Biol 211)Cell Physiology (Biol 334)Cell Physiology (Biol 334)Biochemistry (Biol 353)Biochemistry (Biol 353)Plant Physiology (Biol 373)Plant Physiology (Biol 373)Computer Applications (Math 172)Computer Applications (Math 172)Intro to Programming (Math 170)Intro to Programming (Math 170)Intro to Electronics and Computing (Phys 152)Intro to Electronics and Computing (Phys 152)ElectromagnetismElectromagnetismThermodynamicsThermodynamicsAnalytical MechanicsAnalytical MechanicsQuantum PhysicsQuantum PhysicsUndergraduate Research (2 yrs)Undergraduate Research (2 yrs)Iowa State UniversityAdvanced Biochemistry (Chem 404-405)Advanced Biochemistry (Chem 404-405)Protein Biochemistry (Chem 652)Protein Biochemistry (Chem 652)Elementary Differential Equations (Math 266)Elementary Differential Equations (Math 266)Carbohydrate Chemistry (Chem 622)Carbohydrate Chemistry (Chem 622)University of California, DavisIsolation and Characterization of Trace Volitiles (Food Sci 250-251)Isolation and Characterization of Trace Volitiles (Food Sci 250-251)Cell Wall Biochemistry (Plant Phys 214)Cell Wall Biochemistry (Plant Phys 214)Physical Chemistry in Life Sciences (Chem 107A-107B)Physical Chemistry in Life Sciences (Chem 107A-107B)Spectroscopy of Organic Compounds (Chem 219)Spectroscopy of Organic Compounds (Chem 219)Astrophysics (Physics 127)Astrophysics (Physics 127)Post-harvest Biology (Plant Sci 291)Post-harvest Biology (Plant Sci 291)Introduction to Plant Pathology (Plant Path 120)Introduction to Plant Pathology (Plant Path 120)Magellan Health ServicesSAS Business Intelligence Applications for Reporting and AnalysisSAS Business Intelligence Applications for Reporting and AnalysisCreating and Exploiting OLAP using the SAS SystemCreating and Exploiting OLAP using the SAS SystemSAS Programming I: EssentialsSAS Programming I: EssentialsSAS Programming II: Manipulating Data with the DATA StepSAS Programming II: Manipulating Data with the DATA StepSAS Macro LanguageSAS Macro LanguageTexas Department of State Health ServicesMS Project IntroMS Project IntroMS Project AdvancedMS Project AdvancedSystems ThinkingSystems ThinkingProblem SolvingProblem SolvingSeven Habits of Highly Effective PeopleSeven Habits of Highly Effective PeopleMeeting FacilitationMeeting FacilitationIntroduction to Crystal ReportsIntroduction to Crystal ReportsIntroduction to Database DevelopmentIntroduction to Database DevelopmentAdvanced Crystal ReportsAdvanced Crystal ReportsSkillsProgram EvaluationSystems AnalysisCommunity DevelopmentData AnalysisAnalysisMS ProjectSAS programmingProblem SolvingStatistical DesignCost Reduction/AvoidanceCost/Value AnalysisLogic/Scientific ThinkingManagement ReportingData Processing ManagementData WarehousingSee 35+Database DesignData MiningCustomer Service & SupportGovernment ContractingOperations AnalysisProcess Design & AutomationProject ManagementConceptual DesignConducting ExperimentsHigher MathematicsExpressing Complex Technical InfoProcess DevelopmentOptimizationTechnical ConsultingClient Relationship ManagementClient Technical SupportCustomer PresentationsCustomer Needs AnalysisTrend AnalysisPublic SpeakingDocument ManagementProductivity ManagementSenior Staff CommunicationProgramming/CodingSoftware CustomizationLegislative Review/AnalysisSME for Court ProceedingsEpidemiologyBiostatisticsTeachingManagementStrategic ThinkingStatisticsMedicaidSQLSee lessHow's this translation?Great•Has errorsThanks for your help!PublicationsMethanol accumulation in maturing seeds.J Exp Bot 41, 489-495.1991Authors: James Koch, Obendorf, RL, RJ Gorecki, RA Amable, MT AveniThe tomato fruit cell wall. I. The use of purified tomato polygalacturonase and pectinesterase to identify developmental changes in their constitutive substrates.Plant Physiol 91, 816-822.1990Authors: James Koch, DJ NevinsThe tomato fruit cell wall. II. Polyuronide metabolism in a non-softening tomato mutant.Plant Physiol 92, 642-647.1990Authors: James Koch, DJ NevinsAuxin effects on the correlative interaction among fruits in Phaseolus vulgaris L.Proceedings, Plant Growth Regulator Society of America. Ed. AR Cooke. p 208-215.1986Authors: James Koch, Tamas, IA, BK Mazur, PJ DaviesEvidence of singlet oxygen participation in the chlorophyll-sensitized photooxidation of indole acetic acid.Plant Physiol 70, 414-417.1982Authors: James Koch, RL Oberlander, IA Tamas, JL Germain, DB ShermanData from the HIV Counseling and Testing System - Texas, 1996Texas Department of HealthApril 1997Authors: James KochData from the HIV Counseling and Testing System - Texas, 1997Texas Department of HealthApril 1998Authors: James KochThe 2000 Texas HIV and STD Epidemic Profile.Texas Department of HealthJuly 2000Authors: James KochPublicly-Funded HIV Prevention Counseling and Testing in Texas, 1999-2000:  A Synopsis of African American Men.Texas Department of HealthMay 2001Authors: James KochPublicly-Funded HIV Prevention Counseling and Testing in Texas, 1999-2000:  A Synopsis of African American Women.Texas Department of HealthMay 2001Authors: James KochCost-effectiveness analysis of prevention counseling programs for annual report FY 2001.Texas Department of HealthAugust 2001Part of Annual Report to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.Authors: James KochThe 2003 Texas HIV and STD Epidemic Profile.Texas Department of State Health ServicesJuly 2003Authors: James Koch1997 Epidemiological Profile for Community Planning,Texas Department of Health, Bureau of HIV/STD PreventionAugust 1997Responsible for Prevention Counseling SectionAuthors: James KochThe 2005 Texas Epidemic Profile for TexasTexas Department of State Health ServicesAugust 2005Responsible for Prevention Counseling and Census DataAuthors: James KochPublicly-Funded HIV Prevention Counseling and Testing in Texas, 1999  A Profile of Homeless ClientsTexas Department of State Health ServicesAugust 2000Authors: James KochEducationIndiana University BloomingtonMPH, Public HealthMPH, Public Health1995  –  1997University of California, DavisPhD, Plant PhysiologyPhD, Plant Physiology1984  –  1988Received two Jastro-Shields awards in recognition of my potential to carry out research projects related to the missions of the College of Agricultural and Environmental Sciences.Activities and Societies: Thesis:  Characterization of tomato fruit ripening.  Changes in polyuronides and their susceptibility to polygalacturonase during ripening.Iowa State UniversityMS, BotanyMS, Botany1982  –  1984Activities and Societies: Thesis:  Immunohistochemical localization of exo-beta-D-glucan in cell walls of zea.Ithaca CollegeBA, Biology, minor PhysicsBA, Biology, minor Physics1978  –  1982Received NSF Undergraduate Research Funding, 1980Received Sigma Xi award for excellence in undergraduate research, 1982.Undergraduate research publications:Auxin effects on the correlative interaction among fruits in Phaseolus vulgaris L.Evidence of singlet oxygen participation in the chlorophyll-sensitized photooxidation of indole acetic acidActivities and Societies: Sigma Xi; Swim team; Biology clubMaster Gohring's Tai Chi and Kung FuFirst Degree Black Sash, Tai Chi (Yang Form)First Degree Black Sash, Tai Chi (Yang Form)Activities and Societies: Tai Chi, Saber, Flute/Short Staff, Sword, Push Hands forms.RecommendationsA preview of what LinkedIn members have to say about James:I directed Jim's work for a number of years, working on the Texas Medicaid Account. Jim went above and beyond expectations, often working late into the night, and on the weekends to meet the client's demanding needs. I hope to work with Jim again should the opportunity arise. Until then I am sure he will be a strong contributor to another team.See moreSee lessJim covered all aspects of reporting for a very challenging client.  He worked independently, yet kept team members in the loop with excellent documentation.  I found that he was unusually good at managing a lot of expert information and using it for our maximum benefit.  I would strongly recommend Jim be considered for any detail oriented and challenging position.See moreSee lessSign up to see who recommended JamesGroupsHome Care and Healthcare AdvocacyPredictive Modeling NewsSpecialty Pharmacy ProfessionalsLean Six Sigma for BusinessIIBA Austin ChapterBusiness Analyst Social NetworkingPharmacy Professionals NetworkSee 7 moreAssociation of Certified Fraud Examiners (ACFE)American Public Health Association (APHA)Mostly Medicaid (Medicaid Professionals)Pharmaceutical Market AccessCenters for Medicare & Medicaid ServicesNational Prevention Information Network (NPIN)Epidemiology and Healthcare EpidemiologySee lessView James’ full profile to...See who you know in commonGet introducedContact James directlyView James’ Full ProfileNot the James you’re looking for? View moreView this profile in another languageEnglishGermanPeople Also ViewedKalas BurkuleMBARobert A. Burgard, Jr. MBAInsurance ProfessionalDebjani ShuklaETL Engineer at Tyco Integrated SecurityC. Seth LesterActuarial Senior Analyst at CignaGreg HoweNetwork EngineerSheetal SalviDoug WhatleyManager, Informatics - Phoenix Data Solutions - AetnaKannan KrishnaswamySALES TRAINING CONSULTANT at self employed, freelancerSonali SurveEntrepreneur, Founder-Chief Food Officer at Specialty Health Food Company, Registered Dietetic Emily ReedPublic profile badgeInclude this LinkedIn profile on other websitesView profile badgesFind a different James KochFirst NameLast NameExample:  James KochJames Koch.United StatesJames Koch, CTFLInformation Technology Solutions ArchitectUnited StatesJames KochBusiness Operations Manager at CiscoUnited StatesJames M. (Jim) KochTax Partner at PwCUnited StatesR James Koch MDFacial Plastic and Reconstructive SurgeonUnited StatesMore professionals named James KochLinkedIn member directory:abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzmoreBrowse members by country




















 




Companies Overview - Koch Industries









































Skip Navigation
Newsroom
Search Jobs





Facebook Page


LinkedIn Page


Twitter Page


YouTube Page


Instagram Page


































Menu









Newsroom
Careers
Media Resources





Facebook Page


LinkedIn Page


Twitter Page


YouTube Page


Instagram Page






Contact Us


Terms of Use


Privacy Policy




Code of Conduct


California Supply


Vendors
















                        Many industries. Countless products. One focus.
                    
 
 



                        At first glance, Koch companies might look curiously unrelated. After all, they stretch from the fibers of fashion to the rugged world of ranching. When you look deeper, there’s a common thread that ties them together. It’s a desire to keep improving the products that meet your basic needs every single day.
                    



                                More than
                            

                                120,000
                            

                                employees in 60 countries worldwide
                            



                                More than
                            

                                1,200
                            

                                excellence awards since 2009
                            


Historically
                            

                                90%
                            

                                of earnings reinvested into the company
                            


 
 






Flint Hills Resources



                                By responsibly harnessing natural resources and innovation, our modern way of life just keeps getting better. From next-generation fuels to essential chemical components, we work tirelessly to power, and empower, us all.
                            

                                Learn More
                            

 
 





Georgia-Pacific



                                Our handiwork includes everyday items such as plywood and lumber, Quilted Northern® tissue and Brawny® towels, Dixie® cups and more.
                            

                                Learn More
                            

 
 





Guardian Industries



                                We make high-performance glass and automotive trim for customers around the world — while helping supply building materials across America.
                            

                                Learn More
                            

 
 





INVISTA



                                You might know our STAINMASTER® carpet, and LYCRA® fiber for clothing. We also make materials for bedding, air bags, engines, backpacks and the list goes on and on. 
                            

                                Learn More
                            

 
 





Molex



                                Electronics inspire advancements in communication, medical equipment, transportation, appliances and more. We make the connecting components that bring it all to life. 
                            

                                Learn More
                            

 
 





Koch Ag & Energy Solutions



                                We provide fertilizer products that help farmers nourish crops responsibly, to put more food on tables. We’re also a reliable source for gas and electricity that energizes the nation.
                            

                                Learn More
                            

 
 





Koch Chemical Technology Group



                                From filtration technologies that increase the world’s supply of clean water, to pollution control equipment for manufacturers, our products stand up for the environment.
                            

                                Learn More
                            

 
 





Koch Minerals



                                Industries depend on commodity resources worldwide to make products that you use every day. We market and trade more than 40 million tons of these materials annually.
                            

                                Learn More
                            

 
 





Koch Pipeline



                                Before there’s fuel at the gas station, someone has to safely move it along the way. We operate about 4,000 miles of petroleum product pipelines to make that happen.
                            

                                Learn More
                            

 
 





Koch Supply & Trading



                                Global trading of energy commodities and metals takes knowledge and attention to detail. We’ve been applying both for decades to manage pricing, risks and logistics.
                            

                                Learn More
                            

 
 





Matador Cattle Company



                                Some Koch employees literally hop back in the saddle each morning. Our cattle ranches in Montana, Kansas and Texas cover 460,000 acres.
                            

                                Learn More
                            

 
 





Opportunity knocks.
Discover a career that’s perfect for you among our diverse, global companies.

                                        Learn More
                                    

                                        Open Roles
                                    

 


 
 






Home




Companies





 




Scroll













 








Sam Adams' C. James Koch may be a billionaire but craft beer is king - latimes

Advertisement


YOU ARE HERE: LAT Home→Collections→Craft BeerSam Adams' C. James Koch may be a billionaire but craft beer is kingSeptember 09, 2013|By Amy Hubbard


California has the most breweries in the country.  (IBIS World )C. James Koch, the man behind Sam Adams beer, is a newly minted billionaire, and he owes it all to craft beer. Or, perhaps craft beer owes it all to Koch. Koch, a Harvard grad with multiple acronyms (BA, MBA, JD), wanted to make beer. It was a family thing. As the Sam Adams site says, he brewed his great-great-grandfather's recipe in his kitchen in 1984. Then he brewed his beer in batches and carried bottles bar to bar.A year later, Koch's Boston Beer Co. created Samuel Adams. Six weeks later, it won a "Best Beer in America" consumer poll.PHOTOS: Celebrity bankruptcies -- 12 famous facesKoch is up $33.8 million, or 23%, over the same period in 2012.It's been a good year for Koch. But hey, it's been a good year for craft beer, and the future for the industry looks bright.Revenue for the breweries industry was expected to hit $28.2 billion in 2013, according to a report by market research firm IBIS World. Cheap beer filled the bill as the recession dragged down disposable income. But as the economy improves, demand for traditional beer has been dropping. Craft brewers have seen no dip, competing successfully with wines and spirits. And craft and premium beers are expected to bolster revenue growth in the breweries industry over the next five years.The craft brewing industry saw volume grow 15% and dollar sales 17% in 2012 over 2011, according to the Brewers Assn. Last year, 310 microbreweries and 99 brewpubs opened in the U.S., the association says. A chunk of those are in California.The state has the largest number of breweries of any state in the country at 304, according to IBIS World. The majority of those are brewpubs or microbreweries.California's plethora of live entertainment, awards shows and music festivals boost the consumption of craft brews and encourage the establishment of new beer makers.How long can the good news continue? IBIS World predicts a slowdown, with demand for beer lessening between now and 2018 as consumers continue to switch to alternative alcoholic beverages. Wine and spirits are expected to slow revenue growth -- but craft and premium beers are expected to be the bright spot in the industry, maintaining robust demand.





MORE:Seizure Led to FloJo's DeathHis 104 scores make his caseRestaurant review: South Beverly GrillBrutal Murder by Teen-Age Girls Adds to Britons' ShockComaneci Confirms Suicide Attempt, Magazine SaysAdvertisement


FROM THE ARCHIVESWe are king: California outstrips other states in craft...June 12, 2013Have a Hoppy Easter: 10 top Southern California craft beersMarch 29, 2013Night: Beer crawl sponsors' goal is to boost recognition of...September 24, 2010Craft brewers rethink rice in beerSeptember 30, 2009You call this a beer?August 10, 2005MORE STORIES ABOUTCraft BeerCopyright 2017 Los Angeles TimesTerms of Service|Privacy Policy|Index by Date|Index by Keyword























Boston Beer Company Inc (SAM)  People | Reuters.com


























































X



Edition:

United States


















Africa
América Latina


عربي
Argentina


Brasil
Canada


中国
Deutschland


España
France


India
Italia


日本
México


РОССИЯ
United Kingdom

United States
















Boston Beer Company Inc (SAM)










Related Topics: 
StocksStock ScreenerMarket DataConsumer Non-CyclicalsBrewers












                
                        Overview
                    



                
                        News
                    



                
                        Key Developments
                    



                
                        People
                    



                
                        Charts
                    



                
                        Financials
                    



                
                        Analysts
                    



                    
                            Research
                        



                    
                            Pulse
                        










				SAM on New York Consolidated


				137.30USD
21 Jul 2017





				    Change	(% chg)


		    
						    $4.80


					            (+3.62%)
					        






Prev Close

$132.50


Open

$133.15




Day's High

$137.60


Day's Low

$132.85




Volume

218,656


Avg. Vol

150,764




52-wk High

$195.35


52-wk Low

$128.70











					Summary





Name
Age
Since
Current Position




							C. James Koch

67
2010

                                Chairman of the Board




							Martin Roper

54
2003

                                President, Chief Executive Officer, Director




							Frank Smalla

51
2016

                                Chief Financial Officer, Treasurer




							Quincy Troupe

50
2016

                                Senior Vice President - Supply Chain




							Matthew Murphy

48
2015

                                Chief Accounting Officer




							Jonathan Potter

53
2016

                                Chief Marketing Officer




							Cheryl Fisher

58
2016

                                Vice President - Human Resources




							David Grinnell

59
2008

                                Vice President - Brewing




							Tara Heath

42
2016

                                Vice President - Legal, Deputy General Counsel




							John Geist

57
2016

                                Chief Sales Officer




							Jean-Michel Valette

56
2013

                                Lead Director, Independent Director




							Cynthia Fisher

56
2014

                                Director




							David Burwick

55
2005

                                Independent Director




							David Fialkow

58
2016

                                Independent Director




							Michael Spillane

56
2016

                                Independent Director




							Gregg Tanner

60
2007

                                Independent Director



» Insider Trading





					Biographies





Name
Description




							C. James Koch


					
							Mr. C. James Koch is Chairman of the Board of the Company. He founded Boston Beer in 1984 and currently serves as its Chairman. Until January 2001, Mr. Koch also served as the Company’s Chief Executive Officer. He also served as the Company’s Secretary/Clerk until May 2010. Prior to starting Boston Beer, he had worked as a consultant for an international consulting firm, with a focus on manufacturing.




							Martin Roper


					
							Mr. Martin F. Roper is President, Chief Executive Officer, Director of the Company. He joined Boston Beer as Vice President of Manufacturing and Business Development in September 1994, became the Chief Operating Officer in April 1997, and became President and Chief Operating Officer in December 1999. In April 2006, Mr. Roper joined the Board of Directors of Lumber Liquidators, Inc. (NYSE: LL), a Virginia-based hardwood flooring retailer, where he serves as Chair of its Compensation Committee and a member of its Audit Committee. Mr. Roper holds a master’s degree in manufacturing from Cambridge University, as well as an MBA from Harvard Business School. Prior to joining Boston Beer, he worked as a strategy consultant and led small manufacturing companies in turn-around situations.




							Frank Smalla


					
							Mr. Frank H. Smalla is Chief Financial Officer, Treasurer of the Company. He was Senior Vice President - Finance of the Company. Smalla previously worked in various senior financial roles for Kraft Food Groups, Inc. of Northfield, Illinois from 1995 through 2015, most recently as Senior Vice President, Finance of U.S. Business Units, U.S. Sales, Integrated Supply Chain, RDQ and Marketing Services. He held the positions of Senior Vice President of Finance from 2012-2015 and Vice President of Finance from 2010-2012.




							Quincy Troupe


					
							Mr. Quincy B. Troupe is Senior Vice President - Supply Chain of the Company. He has over fifteen years of supply chain management experience in the consumer food industry. Prior to joining Boston Beer, he served as Vice President, Manufacturing and Supply Chain Strategy, for the Pepperidge Farm division of Campbell Soup Company, Inc. from 2013 to 2015, and as Vice President, Supply Chain for Campbell North America from 2010 to 2013. Prior to joining Campbell Soup, Mr. Troupe served in various senior operational roles with Mars, Inc. of McLean, Virginia from 1997 to 2010.




							Matthew Murphy


					
							Mr. Matthew Donal Murphy is Chief Accounting Officer of The Company. Prior to the appointment, Mr. Murphy held the position of Corporate Controller at Boston Beer since September 2006. Prior to joining Boston Beer, he was Chief Financial Officer of Opodo, a leading European online travel agency, from 2004 to 2006.




							Jonathan Potter


					
							Mr. Jonathan N. Potter is Chief Marketing Officer of the Company. Prior to joining the Company, he held positions with Moet Hennessy USA (MH), a wine and spirits company headquartered in New York, New York. At MH, Mr. Potter held the position of Chief Marketing Officer and Executive Vice President for all brands from July 2012 to December 2015, and was appointed the Managing Director of its Chandon division in January 2016. Prior to that, he was Senior Partner and Chief Marketing Officer of McKinney Rogers International (USA), Inc., a global business execution consulting firm headquartered in New York, New York, from 2010 to 2012. From 1997 to 2010, Mr. Potter held a number of positions around the globe with Diageo, a multinational alcoholic beverages company, finishing his career there as Chief Marketing Officer for Diageo North America.




							Cheryl Fisher


					
							Ms. Cheryl A. Fisher is Vice President - Human Resources of the Company. She joined the Company in 2014 as Director, Human Resources for Brewing and Operations. Prior to joining Boston Beer, Ms. Fisher held several vice president or director-level positions in the human resources field, including roles with Houghton International Inc. in Valley Forge, PA from 2012 to 2014, Reynolds Packaging Group in Illinois from 2008 to 2012, and Alcoa Inc. in Pennsylvania from 1999 to 2008.




							David Grinnell


					
							Mr. David L. Grinnell is Vice President - Brewing of the Company. He had served as Executive Vice President of Ken’s Foods, Inc., a food product manufacturer located in Marlborough, MA, from January 2001 to January 2007. Prior to joining Ken’s Foods, Mr. Lance held a number of positions in operations with Bausch and Lomb, a manufacturer of vision care products located in Rochester, NY. Mr. Grinnell joined Boston Beer in 1988 from New Amsterdam Brewing Company, where he was a founding member.




							Tara Heath


					
							Ms. Tara L. Heath is Vice President - Legal, Deputy General Counsel of the Company. She joined the Company in 1997 and has held various positions during that time, including Senior Corporate Counsel & Director of Regulatory Affairs from 2013 to 2016 and Senior Manager & Attorney for Regulatory Affairs from 2009 to 2013.




							John Geist


					
							Mr. John C. Geist is Chief Sales Officer of the Company. He was Vice President - Sales of Boston Beer Company Inc., since February 2007. He served as National Sales Manager since December 1998. Mr. Geist joined the Company in 1997 from a large alcohol beverage distributor where he had been a sales manager.




							Jean-Michel Valette


					
							Mr. Jean-Michel Valette is Lead Independent Director of the Company. He currently serves as an independent advisor to select branded consumer companies. Until November 2012 he was Chairman of the Board and a member of the Audit and Nominating/Governance Committees of Peet’s Coffee & Tea Inc., a California-based specialty coffee company; since then he is a Director and Chairman of its Audit and Valuation Committees. He is also Chairman of the Board and a member of the Audit Committee of Select Comfort Corporation (NASDAQ: SCSS), a Minneapolis-based bedding company. Until October 2006, he was also Chairman of Robert Mondavi Winery, a California wine company. Prior to assuming that position, he had served as President and Managing Director of Robert Mondavi Winery from October 2004 to January 2005. He holds an MBA from Harvard Business School.




							Cynthia Fisher


					
							Ms. Cynthia A. Fisher is Director of the Company. She founded WaterRev, LLC, an investment company located in Newton, Massachusetts, focused on innovative technology companies that enable sustainable practices of water use. She is an independent investor and consults to corporate boards and executive management teams. She also serves on the Board of Directors of Easterly Government Properties, Inc. (NYSE: DEA), a publicly-held real estate investment trust. In 1992, Ms. Fisher founded ViaCord, Inc., a cord blood stem cell banking company, and served as CEO of Viacord, Inc. from 1993 to 2000. In 2000, she co-founded ViaCell, Inc., a cellular medicines company and successor to ViaCord, which went public in 2005. Ms. Fisher served as ViaCell’s President from 2000 to 2001 and as a member of its Board of Directors until 2002. Ms. Fisher is the spouse of C. James Koch, Boston Beer’s Founder and Chairman of the Board of Directors. Ms. Fisher holds an MBA from Harvard Business School and an Honorary Doctorate of Science from Ursinus College.




							David Burwick


					
							Mr. David A. Burwick is Independent Director of the Company. He was appointed President and Chief Executive Officer of Peet’s Coffee & Tea, Inc., a specialty coffee and tea company based in California. Prior to this role, starting in April 2010, Mr. Burwick served as President, North America of Weight Watchers International, Inc., a publicly-held company based in New York City and a leading provider of weight management services. Mr. Burwick previously had been Senior Vice President and Chief Marketing Officer of PepsiCo North American Beverages, headquartered in Purchase, New York, until September 2009. Before assuming that position in April 2008, he had been Executive Vice President, Commercial, of PepsiCo International and President of Pepsi-QTG Canada, headquartered in Toronto, a position he held from November 2005 to March 2008. Mr. Burwick held several positions with Pepsi-Cola North America, including serving as Senior Vice President and Chief Marketing Officer from June 2002 until immediately prior to his move to Pepsi-QTG Canada. Mr. Burwick holds an MBA from Harvard Business School.




							David Fialkow


					
							Mr. David P. Fialkow is Independent Director of the Company. He is Managing Director of General Catalyst Partners, a venture capital firm with offices in Boston, New York, and California that he co-founded in 2000. In his capacity as Managing Director at General Catalyst Partners, he serves on the Board of Directors on a number of privately-held companies. Prior to that, he co-founded and sold four companies: National Leisure Group, Alliance Development Group, Retail Growth ATM Systems, and Starboard Cruise Services. His focus areas include travel, financial services, and e-commerce. Mr. Fialkow also sits on the boards of various not-for-profit entities, including the Pan-Mass Challenge, Facing History and Ourselves, and Debate Mate.




							Michael Spillane


					
							Mr. Michael Spillane is Independent Director of the Company. He currently serves as President of Product & Merchandising at Nike, Inc., a publicly-traded manufacturer and marketer of athletic footwear, apparel, and equipment, a position he has held since April 2016. Prior to that, Mr. Spillane held a variety of roles with Nike dating back to May 2007, including Vice President and General Manager of Global Footwear from May 2015 to April 2016 and General Manager and Vice President, Greater China from May 2013 to May 2015. From June 2011 to May 2013, he held the position of Chief Executive Officer at Umbro International, a Nike subsidiary based in England. From September 2009 to June 2011, Mr. Spillane was the Chief Executive Officer of Converse, a Nike subsidiary based in Massachusetts. From 2007 to 2009, he held the position of President, North America and Global Product at Nike. Prior to joining Nike, Mr. Spillane held senior management roles at various apparel and textile companies, including Malden Mills, Tommy Hilfiger USA, Jockey International, and Missbrenner, Inc.




							Gregg Tanner


					
							Mr. Gregg A. Tanner is Independent Director of the Company. He is currently an Advisor for Dean Foods Company (NYSE: DF), a leading food and beverage company and the largest processor and direct-to-store distributor of fluid milk and other dairy and dairy case products in the United States, located in Dallas, Texas. He served as the company’s Chief Executive Officer from November 2012 until December 2016. Prior to serving as CEO, Mr. Tanner served as the Chief Supply Chain Officer and President of its Fresh Dairy Direct division since November 2007. From July 2006 through October 2007, Mr. Tanner was Senior Vice President of Global Operations for The Hershey Company of Hershey, Pennsylvania. He was with ConAgra Foods of Omaha, Nebraska from September 2001 through July 2005, holding the position of Senior Vice President, Retail Supply Chain from June 2002 through July 2005. Prior to that, Mr. Tanner held positions of increasing responsibility at the Quaker Oats Company and Ralston Purina Company. In January 2017, Mr. Tanner joined the Board of Directors of Sun Opta Inc., a global organic food company specializing in sourcing, processing, and packaging of natural and certified organic food products.











					Basic Compensation





Name
Fiscal Year Total




							C. James Koch

702,687




							Martin Roper

23,392,800




							Frank Smalla

5,644,790




							Quincy Troupe

3,138,330




							Matthew Murphy

--




							Jonathan Potter

3,625,820




							Cheryl Fisher

--




							David Grinnell

--




							Tara Heath

--




							John Geist

5,405,260




							Jean-Michel Valette

166,966




							Cynthia Fisher

144,966




							David Burwick

155,966




							David Fialkow

259,932




							Michael Spillane

269,932




							Gregg Tanner

159,966



As Of 
30 Dec 2016





					Options Compensation





Name
Options
Value




							C. James Koch

0
0




							Martin Roper

0
0




							Frank Smalla

0
0




							Quincy Troupe

0
0




							Matthew Murphy

0
0




							Jonathan Potter

0
0




							Cheryl Fisher

0
0




							David Grinnell

0
0




							Tara Heath

0
0




							John Geist

0
0




							Jean-Michel Valette

0
0




							Cynthia Fisher

0
0




							David Burwick

0
0




							David Fialkow

0
0




							Michael Spillane

0
0




							Gregg Tanner

0
0









					Insider Trading












Name
Shares Traded
Price


Burwick (David A)
5,000
$38.56


Burwick (David A)
1,800
$144.97


Burwick (David A)
1,800
$143.80


Burwick (David A)
1,400
$143.00


GRINNELL DAVID L
372
$143.06


Koch (C James)
3,497
$141.66


Koch (C James)
1,500
$139.83


Koch (C James)
2,503
$140.74


Koch (C James)
204
$140.10


Koch (C James)
5,071
$139.39


Koch (C James)
2,225
$138.59


Koch (C James)
912
$139.78


Koch (C James)
6,325
$138.81


Koch (C James)
200
$137.65


Koch (C James)
63
$141.00


Koch (C James)
1,300
$139.47


Koch (C James)
300
$140.92


Koch (C James)
5,900
$140.23


Koch (C James)
1,100
$140.66


Koch (C James)
5,226
$139.71


Koch (C James)
1,174
$139.03


Koch (C James)
3,112
$138.61


Koch (C James)
4,388
$139.42


Koch (C James)
300
$136.15


Koch (C James)
4,223
$139.06




» Full list on Insider Trading
















Related Topics: 
StocksStock ScreenerMarket DataConsumer Non-CyclicalsBrewers




















 


James Koch | Professional Profile
 


























 









LinkedIn



















































Main content starts below.




James KochProduct Specialist, Oxford University PressLocationPortland, Oregon AreaIndustryPublishingCurrentOxford University PressPreviousMcGraw-Hill Higher EducationEducationWestminster College169 connectionsView James’ full profile. It's free!Your colleagues, classmates, and 500 million other professionals are on LinkedIn.View James’ Full ProfileJames’ ActivityTextbook publishers contemplate 'inclusive access' as...James sharedBill Marting

Hey, vitalsource is doing cool things.  Maybe...James sharedLove seeing this!James likedEveryone in the education space should read this.James sharedBill MartingJames sharedBill MartingJames sharedSee all activitySummaryDynamic sales leader who leverages exceptional consultative sales abilities to drive revenue growth and account penetration.  Results driven professional who consistently overachieves sales targets.  Skilled communicator who listens to client requirements, presents highly targeted, fully integrated solutions.  Experienced in training, coaching and mentoring territory field representatives, with the ability to build strong relationships with external and internal customers.ExperienceProduct SpecialistOxford University PressJuly 2014  –  Present (3 years 1 month)Develop and implement sales strategies for winning key adoptions at large colleges and universities.  Partner with field sales representatives, guiding them through the implementation of sales strategies throughout the sales cycle.  Utilize Salesforce.com to analyze the market, territory and to forecast sales.  Senior Learning Technology RepresentativeMcGraw-Hill Higher Education1999  –  2014 (15 years)Portland, Oregon AreaBuild and maintain consultative sales relationships with key account influencers to grow revenue and deepen account penetration for both new and existing learning technologies and print solutions.  Present new technologies to key account influencers including deans, chairs, and faculty.  Present strategies for how McGraw-Hill solutions meet their needs and solve key issues.  Manage all aspects of accounts pre and post sales.•  Hand selected for the Sales Leadership Council, mentoring new field representatives by      conducting field work, training, and coaching on sales process and product knowledge.•  Consistently meet and exceed sales goals.•  Top ten in custom learning solutions in 2010 and 2011.•  Hand selected to train all western region territory representatives to effectively leverage the    capabilities of Salesforce.com.•  One of two representatives selected to be a member of the Connect Spanish pilot program in     2009.•  Selected to the Champions Board of Advisors in 2008.SkillsSalesforce.comAccount ManagementSales PresentationsPublishingDigital MarketingSolution SellingB2BSalesCold CallingDigital StrategyNew Business DevelopmentCustom PublishingSales ManagementMarketing StrategyDigital MediaSee 9+Strategic PartnershipsSellingSales ProcessManagementTrainingE-LearningLeadershipAcademic PublishingHigher EducationSee lessHow's this translation?Great•Has errorsThanks for your help!EducationWestminster CollegeM.B.A, BusinessM.B.A, Business1989  –  1992University of UtahBachelor of Science (B.S.), CommunicationBachelor of Science (B.S.), Communication1982  –  1988GroupsHigher Education ManagementEDUCAUSEView James’ full profile to...See who you know in commonGet introducedContact James directlyView James’ Full ProfileNot the James you’re looking for? View moreView this profile in another languageEnglishChinese (Simplified)GermanPeople Also ViewedJeff KerrOwner, K's custom T'sJeff Kerr--Jeff Kerrsaw man at us refactoryJeff KerrEngineer at Indianapolis Fire DeptJeffrey Kerr--Jeff Kerr--jeffrey kerrOwner, ideal cars & trucksJeffrey KerrCustomer Service & Support Planner at IBMPeter ScullyChief Consultant at Peter Scully Energy ConsultantsJeffrey Kerr--Public profile badgeInclude this LinkedIn profile on other websitesView profile badgesFind a different James KochFirst NameLast NameExample:  James KochJames Koch.United StatesJames Koch, CTFLInformation Technology Solutions ArchitectUnited StatesJames KochBusiness Operations Manager at CiscoUnited StatesJames M. (Jim) KochTax Partner at PwCUnited StatesR James Koch MDFacial Plastic and Reconstructive SurgeonUnited StatesMore professionals named James KochJobs similar to James’Oxford University Press jobsProduct Specialist jobsProduct Specialist jobs in Portland, OregonLinkedIn member directory:abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzmoreBrowse members by country






















James E Koch                                                                                                             - Indianapolis                                      , IN         - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



IN



Indianapolis



Business Services, Nec



Business Services At Non-commercial Site



                            James E Koch
                                    



 





















J 


James E Koch                                                                                                            
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



7840 STONEHURST DR INDIANAPOLIS, IN 46256
Get Directions



(317) 576-9423
 





Business Info



 Founded 1999
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue $56,399.00
 Employee Count 1
 Industries Business Services At Non-commercial Site
 Contacts James E Koch                                                                                                            







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


James E Koch                                                                                                             is located at 7840 Stonehurst Dr in Indianapolis and has been in the business of Business Services At Non-commercial Site since 1999. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







J

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.

















Charles Koch - Wikipedia





















 






Charles Koch

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Charles Koch


Born
Charles de Ganahl Koch
(1935-11-01) November 1, 1935 (age 81)
Wichita, Kansas, U.S.


Residence
Indian Wells, California, U.S.


Alma mater
Massachusetts Institute of Technology


Occupation
Chairman and CEO of Koch Industries


Net worth
$48.7 billion (February 2017)[1]


Political party
Republican


Spouse(s)
Liz Koch (m. 1972)


Children



Chase Koch[2]
Elizabeth Koch[3]





Parent(s)



Fred C. Koch
Mary Robinson





Relatives

Siblings:



Frederick R. Koch
David Koch
Bill Koch







Charles de Ganahl Koch (/ˈkoʊk/; born November 1, 1935) is an American businessman, political donor and philanthropist. He is co-owner, chairman of the board, and chief executive officer of Koch Industries, while his brother David Koch serves as Executive Vice President. Charles and David each own 42% of the conglomerate. The brothers inherited the business from their father, Fred C. Koch, then expanded the business.[4] Originally involved exclusively in oil refining and chemicals, Koch Industries now includes process and pollution control equipment and technologies; polymers and fibers; minerals; fertilizers; commodity trading and services; forest and consumer products; and ranching. The businesses produce a wide variety of well-known brands, such as Stainmaster carpet, the Lycra brand of spandex fiber, Quilted Northern tissue and Dixie Cup.
Koch Industries is the second-largest privately held company by revenue in the United States according to a 2010 Forbes survey.[5] In February 2014, Koch was ranked 9th richest person in the world by Hurun Report[6] with an estimated net worth of $36 billion. Previously, in October 2012 he was ranked the 6th richest person in the world with an estimated net worth of $34 billion—according to the Bloomberg Billionaires Index[7]—and was ranked 18th on Forbes World's Billionaires list of 2011 (and 4th on the Forbes 400), with an estimated net worth of $25 billion, deriving from his 42% stake in Koch Industries.[8] Koch has published three books detailing his business philosophy, The Science of Success,[9] Market Based Management,[10] and Good Profit.[11]
Koch supports a number of free market-oriented educational organizations, including the Institute for Humane Studies, the Ayn Rand Institute, and the Mercatus Center at George Mason University. He also contributes to the Republican Party and candidates, libertarian groups, and various charitable and cultural institutions. He co-founded the Washington, DC-based Cato Institute. Through the Koch Cultural Trust, founded by Charles Koch's wife, Elizabeth, the Koch family has also funded artistic projects and creative artists.[12]



Contents


1 Early life, education, and career
2 Political and economic views

2.1 Market-based management


3 Philanthropic and political activities
4 Personal life
5 Awards
6 See also
7 References
8 External links



Early life, education, and career[edit]
Koch was born and lives in Wichita, Kansas, one of four sons of Clementine Mary (née Robinson) and Fred Chase Koch.[13][14] Koch's grandfather, Harry Koch, was a Dutch immigrant who settled in West Texas, founded the Quanah Tribune-Chief newspaper, and was a founding shareholder of Quanah, Acme and Pacific Railway.[15] Among his maternal great-great-grandparents were William Ingraham Kip, an Episcopalian bishop, William Burnet Kinney, a politician, and Elizabeth Clementine Stedman, a writer.
In an interview with Warren Cassell Jr., which was recorded in February 2016, Koch explained that as a child he did not live a privileged lifestyle despite growing up in a wealthy family. Koch said, "My father wanted me to work as if I was the poorest person in the world."[16] Koch was educated at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology. He is a member of the Beta Theta Pi fraternity. He received a Bachelor of Science (B.S.) in General Engineering in 1957, a Master of Science (M.S.) in Nuclear Engineering in 1958, and a second M.S. in Chemical Engineering in 1960.[13] After college, Koch started work at Arthur D. Little, Inc. In 1961 he moved back to Wichita to join his father's business, Rock Island Oil & Refining Company.[17] In 1967 he became president of the business, which was then a medium-sized oil firm.[18] In the same year, he renamed the firm Koch Industries in honor of his father.[19] In 2006, Koch Industries generated $90 billion in revenue, a growth of 2000 times over, which represents an annual compounded return of 18%.[20] As of 2014[update], Koch was worth approximately $41.3[21] billion (in 2013 $36 billion) according to the Forbes 400 list.[13]
Koch has been a director of Entrust Financial Corp. since 1982 and director of Koch Industries Inc. since 1982. He is director of resin and fiber company Invista and director of Georgia-Pacific LLC, paper and pulp products. Koch founded or helped found several organizations, including the Cato Institute, the Institute for Humane Studies and the Mercatus Center at George Mason University, the Bill of Rights Institute, and the Market-Based Management Institute. He is a member of the Mont Pelerin Society.[22]
Political and economic views[edit]
Charles Koch is a classical liberal and has formerly identified as a libertarian.[23] He is opposed to corporate welfare[24] and told the National Journal that his "overall concept is to minimize the role of government and to maximize the role of private economy and to maximize personal freedoms."[25] He has expressed concern for too much government regulation in the U.S., stating that "we could be facing the greatest loss of liberty and prosperity since the 1930s."[26] In addition, he has warned that drastic government overspending and a decline of the free enterprise system will prove detrimental to long-term social and economic prosperity.[27]
Influences on Koch include Alexis de Tocqueville,[28] Adam Smith, Michael Polanyi,[17] Joseph Schumpeter, Julian Simon, Paul Johnson, Thomas Sowell, Charles Murray, Leonard Read, and F.A. Harper.[18] The presidents he most admires include George Washington, Grover Cleveland, and Calvin Coolidge. In an interview with the American Journal of Business, Koch said he owes "a huge debt of gratitude to the giants who created the Austrian School [of economics]. They developed principles that enabled me to gain an understanding of how the world works, and these ideas were a catalyst in the development of Market-Based Management." In particular, he expresses admiration for Ludwig von Mises’ book Human Action, as well as the writings of Friedrich Hayek.[17] Koch said "the short-term infatuation with quarterly earnings on Wall Street restricts the earnings potential of Fortune 500 publicly traded firms."[18] He also considers public firms to be "feeding grounds for lawyers and lawsuits," with regulations like Sarbanes–Oxley only increasing the earnings potential of privately held companies.[18]
Koch disdains "big government" and the "political class."[18] He believes billionaires Warren Buffett and George Soros, who fund organizations with different ideologies, "simply haven't been sufficiently exposed to the ideas of liberty."[18] Koch thinks "prosperity is under attack" by the Obama administration and "warns of policies that threaten to erode our economic freedom and transfer vast sums of money to the state."[29]
In an April 2011 Wall Street Journal op-ed, Koch wrote:

Government spending on business only aggravates the problem. Too many businesses have successfully lobbied for special favors and treatment by seeking mandates for their products, subsidies (in the form of cash payments from the government), and regulations and tariffs to keep more efficient competitors at bay. Crony capitalism is much easier than competing in an open market. But it erodes our overall standard of living and stifles entrepreneurs by rewarding the politically favored rather than those who provide what consumers want.[30]

His opposition to corporate welfare includes lobbying for the end to ethanol subsidies despite the fact that Koch Industries is a major ethanol producer. He is quoted as saying: “The first thing we’ve got to get rid of is business welfare and entitlements.”[31] Regarding government regulation, Koch has written that he expects his employees to cooperate fully with the law, regardless of personal views:

We needed to be uncompromising [with our workforce], to expect 100 percent of our employees to comply 100 percent of the time with complex and ever-changing government mandates. Striving to comply with every law does not mean agreeing with every law. But, even when faced with laws we think are counter-productive, we must first comply. Only then, from a credible position, can we enter into a dialogue with regulatory agencies to demonstrate alternatives that are more beneficial. If these efforts fail, we can then join with others in using education and/or political efforts to change the law.[32]

In an April 2014 Wall Street Journal op-ed, Koch wrote, "the fundamental concepts of dignity, respect, equality before the law and personal freedom are under attack by the nation's own government." He criticized the Obama Administration, saying that its "central belief and fatal conceit" is that people are not capable of running their own lives. "This is the essence of big government and collectivism," he wrote. He cited the "current health care debacle" as an example of disastrous government control. He complained that he had been the victim of "character assassination."[33][34]
In an November 2015 joint interview with his brother, David, on MSNBC's Morning Joe Koch, who supports a non-interventionist foreign policy,[35] criticized America's current foreign policy calling it a "form of insanity."[36]
Market-based management[edit]
Koch's business philosophy, "market-based management" (MBM), is described in his 2007 book The Science of Success. In an interview with the Wichita Eagle,[19] he said that he was motivated to write the book by Koch Industries' 2004 acquisition of Invista so he could give new employees a "comprehensive picture" of MBM. According to the website of the Market-Based Management Institute, which Koch founded in 2005, MBM is "based on rules of just conduct, economic thinking, and sound mental models", harnessing the dispersed knowledge of employees just as markets harness knowledge in society. "It is organized in and interpreted through five dimensions: vision, virtue and talents, decision rights, incentives, and knowledge processes."[37] In the book, Koch attempts to apply F. A. Hayek's spontaneous order theory and Austrian entrepreneurial theory, such as that of Mises and Israel Kirzner, to organizational management.[31][38] T. Boone Pickens argues that Koch's business success lends credibility to the book's concept.[38]
Philanthropic and political activities[edit]
See also: Political activities of the Koch brothers
Koch funds and supports libertarian and free-enterprise policy and advocacy organizations.[29] In 1977 he co-founded, with Edward H. Crane and Murray Rothbard, the Cato Institute.[39] He is a board member at the Mercatus Center, a market-oriented research think tank at George Mason University.[40]
In 2008, Koch was included in Businessweek's list of top 50 American givers. Between 2004 and 2008, Koch gave $246 million, focusing on "libertarian causes, giving money for academic and public policy research and social welfare."[41] Koch was awarded an Honorary Doctorate from George Mason University in recognition of his financial support "through scholarships, faculty recruitment, and research grants".[42] A leaked 2012 fundraising plan indicated that the Charles G. Koch Charitable Foundation contributed $25,000 in 2011 to The Heartland Institute, an American conservative and libertarian public policy think tank.[43][44][45]
Koch's philanthropic activities have focused on research, policy, and educational projects intended to advance free-market views. He has underwritten scholarships and financed the research of economists such as James Buchanan and Friedrich Hayek. He has also “supported efforts to inspire at-risk young people to consider entrepreneurship, to teach American students the principles of limited government, and to connect recent graduates with market-oriented organizations, in an effort to launch their careers in public policy.”[46]
Two works that have been especially influential upon Koch's philosophy are Ludwig Von Mises' Human Action and F. A. Harper's Why Wages Rise. After reading Harper's book, Koch became involved with Harper's Institute for Humane Studies, of which he became a principal supporter. He has been on the board of IHS since 1966. Since the 1980s, IHS has been increasingly interested in aiding the careers of aspiring educators, journalists, and policy professionals with an interest in classical liberal thought. Among other projects, the IHS runs the Charles G. Koch Summer Fellow Program, which “has supported more than 900 students during eight-week internships at public policy organizations, both in D.C. and around the country.”[46] In addition, almost 200 institutions of higher education in the U.S. are funded by the Charles Koch Foundation. What all the Koch-funded programs have in common is an interest in studying free societies with an eye to understanding how economic freedom benefits humanity.[46]
Through the Koch Cultural Trust, founded by Charles Koch's wife, Elizabeth, the Koch family has provided financial support to promising artists in a variety of fields. More than $1.7 million in grants have been awarded to programs and individuals with Kansas roots.[12]
Koch supported his brother's candidacy for vice president on the Libertarian Party ticket in 1980.[47] After the bid, Koch told a reporter that conventional politics "tends to be a nasty, corrupting business ... I’m interested in advancing libertarian ideas".[47] In addition to funding think tanks, Charles and David also support libertarian academics[48] and Koch funds the Charles G. Koch Summer Fellow Program through the Institute for Humane Studies which recruits and mentors young libertarians.[49] Koch also organizes twice yearly meetings[18] of Republican donors.[29]
Charles Koch looks favorably upon the Tea Party movement. "The way it's grown, the passion, and the intensity, was beyond what I had anticipated," he told an interviewer.[27] He's funded groups opposed to Barack Obama's administration.[47]
Koch has given money to support public policy research focused on "developing voluntary, market-based solutions to social problems."[50] He has given to the Bill of Rights Institute, a non-profit group that educates teachers, students, and others about the Bill of Rights.[50][51] He has also given to the Youth Entrepreneurs Kansas, an organization that teaches business skills to at-risk youth in Kansas schools.[52] Koch has also supported the Berkeley Earth Surface Temperature project, a scientific effort to compile an open database of the Earth's surface temperature records.[53]
In 2002, Koch Industries donated $6 million to renovate the Wichita State University basketball arena. The gift was given in honor of Koch, and the arena was subsequently renamed the Charles Koch Arena.[54] Koch has continued to be a major donor to both the university and its athletic program. In December 2014, Koch Industries and the Koch family foundation donated $11.25 million to the university, the largest one-time gift in school history, with $4.5 million of that going toward a plan to renovate the arena and expand the athletic program's academic support center.[55] Several months later, when men's basketball head coach Gregg Marshall was considering an offer to become head coach at the University of Alabama, Koch led a group of local business leaders and WSU boosters that raised Marshall's annual salary from $1.85 million to $3 million and kept him at the school. The raise was seen as an unprecedented move for a school outside the Power Five conferences, and likely to make Marshall among the 10 highest-paid college basketball coaches.[56]
In 2011, Koch was awarded the William E. Simon Prize for Philanthropic Leadership.[57] The award honors "the ideals and principles which guided William E. Simon's giving, including personal responsibility, resourcefulness, volunteerism, scholarship, individual freedom, faith in God, and helping people to help themselves."[58]
In July 2015 Charles Koch and his brother were praised by President Obama and Anthony Van Jones for their bipartisan efforts to reform the criminal justice system.[59][60] For roughly a decade Koch has been advocating for several reforms within the prison system, including the reduction of recidivist criminals, easing the employment process for rehabilitated persons, and the defense of private property from Asset forfeiture.[60][61] Aligning with groups such as the ACLU, the Center for American Progress, Families Against Mandatory Minimums, the Coalition for Public Safety, and the MacArthur Foundation, Koch believes the current system has unfairly targeted low-income and minority communities all while wasting substantial government resources.[60][62]
In February 2016, Koch penned an opinion piece in The Washington Post, where he said he agreed with presidential candidate Bernie Sanders about the unfairness of corporate welfare and mass incarceration in the United States.[63]
Personal life[edit]
Koch has been married to his wife Liz since 1972[64] and has two children, Chase Koch and Elizabeth Koch.[47] Charles and his three brothers have all suffered from prostate cancer.[65] Koch "rarely grants media interviews and prefers to keep a low profile".[19] TIME magazine included Charles and David Koch among the most influential people of 2011. According to the magazine, the list includes "activists, reformers and researchers, heads of state and captains of industry." The article describes the brothers' commitment to free-market principles, the growth and development of their business, and their support for liberty-minded organizations and political candidates.[4] He now lives in Indian Wells, California.[66]
Awards[edit]





This section of a biography of a living person needs additional citations for verification. Please help by adding reliable sources. Contentious material about living persons that is unsourced or poorly sourced must be removed immediately, especially if potentially libelous or harmful. (June 2014) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Koch has received various awards and honors, including:

Honorary Doctor of Science, from George Mason University, for his continued support of the economics program at GMU[67]
Honorary Doctor of Commerce from Washburn University[68]
Honorary Doctor of Laws from Babson College
President's Medal from Wichita State University in 2004
The Adam Smith Award from the American Legislative Exchange Council
The 1999 Directors' Award for Global Vision in Energy from the New York Mercantile Exchange
The 1999 Governor's Arts Patrons Award from the Kansas Arts Commission
The 2000 National Distinguished Service Award from The Tax Foundation
The Spirit of Justice Award from The Heritage Foundation
The Entrepreneurial Leadership Award from the National Foundation for Teaching Entrepreneurship
The Brotherhood/Sisterhood Award from the National Conference of Christians and Jews
The Distinguished Citizen Award from the Boy Scouts of America
The Free Enterprise Award from The Council for National Policy
The Herman W. Lay Memorial Award from the Association of Private Enterprise Education
The Distinguished Service Citation from the University of Kansas
Honorary Life Member in the Washburn Law School Association
The Distinguished Citizen Award from Kansas State University
Induction into the Kansas Oil and Gas Hall of Fame
Induction into the Wichita and Kansas Business Halls of Fame
Spirit of Excellence Award from The Urban League of Wichita
Outstanding Humanitarian Award from the Greater Wichita Chapter of the National Society of Fundraising Executives
Wichita City Medallion
Wichita State University Entrepreneur in Residence
Wichita District Minority Small Business Advocate of the Year
The Individual Recognition Award from the Wichita/Sedgwick County Arts and Humanities Council
The Uncommon Citizen Award from the Wichita Chamber of Commerce
The 2011 William E. Simon Prize for Philanthropic Leadership from the Philanthropy Roundtable
The 2011 Defender of Justice award from the National Association of Criminal Defense Lawyers[69]
In 2012, ExecReps ranked him number two on their Top Chief Executive List[70]

See also[edit]

Charles Koch Arena
Charles Koch Institute
Charles G. Koch Charitable Foundation
List of billionaires

References[edit]


^ "Charles Koch profile". Forbes. Retrieved 23 February 2017. 
^ Mr. Big Forbes.com. Retrieved November 2011.
^ "Koch, Charles (1935)". New Netherland Project. 
^ a b Ferguson, Andrew (21 April 2011). "The 2011 TIME 100". TIME. Retrieved 22 April 2011. 
^ The Top 10, America's Largest Private Companies Forbes.com. Retrieved April 2011.
^ [1] Hurun Report Global Rich List 2014
^ "Bloomberg". Bloomberg LP. Retrieved October 31, 2012. 
^ "'Charles Koch', Forbes profiles". 
^ Charles G. Koch (2007). The Science Of Success ISBN 9780470139882 Retrieved April 2011.
^ 2006, ISBN 9781931721998
^ "Charles Koch's New Book Out Tuesday" Biz Journals, Wichita, October 12, 2015. (ISBN 9780147520470)
^ a b "History". Koch Cultural Trust. Retrieved 3 April 2012. 
^ a b c "The 400 Richest Americans". Forbes. Massachusetts Institute of Technology, Bachelor of Arts / Science Massachusetts Institute of Technology, Master of Science Son of Koch Industries founder Fred C. Koch (d. 1967), MIT grad who invented method of refining gasoline from heavy oil. Took refining innovation to Soviet Union 1929; returned home 1930s. Sons Frederick, Charles, David and William inherited Koch Industries after father's death; Charles and David bought out William and Frederick for $1.3 billion in 1983. 
^ "FMK Foundation History". Fmkfoundation.org. Retrieved 2010-08-29. 
^ Daniel Fisher (26 February 2007). "Koch's Laws". Forbes. Retrieved 16 November 2010. 
^ "Interview with Charles Koch". Warren Cassell Jr. 
^ a b c "Twenty Questions for Charles Koch". American Journal of Business. Muncie. 24 (1): 15–8. Spring 2009. 
^ a b c d e f g Stephen Moore (May 6, 2006). "The Weekend Interview with Charles Koch: Private Enterprise". The Wall Street Journal. p. A.8. 
^ a b c Phyllis Jacobs Griekspoor (4 March 2007). "Charles Koch: His philosophy and his company". Wichita Eagle. 
^ Mark Skousen (4 March 2007). "Business Bookshelf: A Short Course In Long-Term Value". The Wall Street Journal. p. D.8. 
^ Carrie Sheffield. "Charles Koch". Forbes. 
^ Koch's bio at the Mercatus Center
^ "Charles Koch opens up about his 'classical liberal' views". Fox News. 15 October 2015. Retrieved 27 December 2015. 
^ The Koch Brothers December 24, 2012 p. 96 Forbes
^ National Journal (May 16, 1992)
^ The Top 10 Forbes Asia October 19, 2009.
^ a b Continetti, Matthew (April 4, 2011). "The Paranoid Style in Liberal Politics". The Weekly Standard. 
^ Koch, Charles, The Science of Success, p. 57
^ a b c Kate Zernike (25 October 2010). "Secretive Republican Donors Are Planning Ahead". The New York Times. 
^ Koch, Charles (March 1, 2011). "Why Koch Industries Is Speaking Out". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ a b Daniel Fisher (December 5, 2012). "Inside The Koch Empire: How The Brothers Plan To Reshape America". Forbes. 
^ Koch, Charles, The Science of Success, p. 45.
^ Koch, Charles (April 3, 2014). "Charles Koch: I'm Fighting to Restore a Free Society". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ Kopan, Tal (April 3, 2014). "Charles Koch calls critics ‘collectivists’". Politico. 
^ "Koch Brothers Question Wisdom of U.S. Interventionism". November 5, 2015. 
^ "Charles Koch: American Foreign Policy a 'Form of Insanity'". 
^ What is MBM? www.mbminstitute.org. Retrieved April 2011.
^ a b Schor, Elana (16 May 2011). "In Right's Energy-Subsidy Clash, Shades of Koch vs. Pickens". New York Times. New York Times. Retrieved 19 May 2011. 
^ "25 Years at Cato" (PDF). Retrieved 2009-07-10. 
^ "Board of Directors – Mercatus". Mercatus Center at George Mason University. Retrieved 23 January 2014. 
^ "The 50 Top American Givers". Bloomberg Businessweek. Retrieved 27 April 2011. 
^ Charles Koch receives honorary degree from George Mason University www.kochind.com. Retrieved April 2011.
^ "Climate skeptic group works to reverse renewable energy mandates". Washington Post. 
^ Gillis, Justin; Kaufman, Leslie (15 February 2012). "Leak Offers Glimpse of Campaign Against Climate Science". The New York Times. 
^ "The Heartland Institute 2012 Fundraising Plan" (PDF). The Heartland Institute. 15 January 2012. 
^ a b c Glassman, James. "Market-Based Man". Philanthropy Magazine. Philanthropy Roundtable. Retrieved 16 March 2012. 
^ a b c d Jane Mayer (August 30, 2010). "Covert Operations: The billionaire brothers who are waging a war against Obama". The New Yorker. Retrieved January 5, 2012. 
^ Brian Doherty (2008). Radicals for Capitalism: A Freewheeling History of the Modern American Libertarian Movement. PublicAffairs. p. 410. ISBN 1-58648-572-5. One longtime Koch lieutenant characterized the overall strategy of Koch's libertarian funding over the years with both a theatrical metaphor and an Austrian capital theory one: Politicians, ultimately, are just actors playing out a script. The idea is, one gets better and quicker results aiming not at the actors but at the scriptwriters, to help supply the themes and words for the scripts—to try to influence the areas where policy ideas percolate from: academia and think tanks. Ideas, then, are the capital goods that go into building policy as a finished product—and there are insufficient libertarian capital goods at the top of the structure of production to build the policies libertarians demand. 
^ "Charles G. Koch Summer Fellow Program". Institute for Humane Studies at George Mason University. Retrieved 2010-09-10. The Charles G. Koch Summer Fellow Program combines a paid public policy internship with two career skills seminars and weekly policy lectures. You’ll gain real-world experience, take a crash course in market-based policy analysis, and hone your professional skills. The intensive ten-week program begins in June and includes a $1,500 stipend and a housing allowance. 
^ a b "About Charles G. Koch". Charles G. Koch Foundation. February 2009. 
^ "Bill of Rights Institute". Media Matters for America. 
^ "Youth Entrepreneurs Kansas". Charles G. Koch Foundation. 
^ BEST donors, accessed 3/25/11
^ "Charles Koch Arena". Wichita State University. Retrieved 22 May 2013. 
^ Wenzl, Roy (December 16, 2014). "Koch gives $11.25 million to Wichita State". The Wichita Eagle. Retrieved April 3, 2015. 
^ Suellentrop, Paul (April 2, 2015). "Wichita State, community work together to keep Gregg Marshall". The Wichita Eagle. Retrieved April 3, 2015. 
^ "Winner of the 2011 William E. Simon Prize". philanthropyroundtable.org. 
^ "2011 William E. Simon Prize". Philanthropy Roundtable. Philanthropy Roundtable. Retrieved 29 April 2011. 
^ Nelson, Colleen Mccain; Fields, Gary (Jul 16, 2015). "Obama, Koch Brothers in Unlikely Alliance to Overhaul Criminal Justice". Wall Street Journal. 
^ a b c Horwitz, Sari (Aug 15, 2015). "Unlikely Allies". Washington Post. 
^ Hudetz, Mary (Oct 15, 2015). "Forfeiture reform aligns likes of billionaire Charles Koch, ACLU". The Topeka Capital Journal. 
^ "Koch brothers join Obama in advocating US prison reform". Russian Today. Jul 17, 2015. 
^ Koch, Charles G. (February 18, 2016). "Charles Koch: This is the one issue where Bernie Sanders is right". The Washington Post. Retrieved February 19, 2016. 
^ "About Charles G. Koch". Charles G. Koch Charitable Foundation. Retrieved 19 December 2010. 
^ "Donor aims to 'lick' illness that he has battled for 15 years". The Chronicle of Philanthropy. Retrieved 16 October 2011. 
^ Robinson, Peter (April 14, 2016). "Good Profit Part I". Uncomomn Knowledge. Hoover Institution. Video Interview, recorded March 18, 2016 
^ Levinthal, Dave. "Spreading the Free-Market Gospel". The Atlantic. Retrieved 2017-03-09. 
^ "Honorary Degree Recipients and Degrees Conferred Honoris Causa" (PDF). Washburn. 
^ Ball, Molly (Mar 3, 2015). "Do the Koch Brothers Really Care About Criminal-Justice Reform?". The Atlantic. 
^ "May 2013 ExecRank Top CEOs". 


External links[edit]

Profile at Koch Industries
Charles G. Koch Charitable Foundation
Profile at Philanthropy Roundtable
Names in the News: David and Charles Koch at FollowTheMoney.org
Political contributions from Influence Explorer at the Sunlight Foundation
Charles Koch at Bloomberg L.P.
Robinson, Peter (April 29, 2016). "Good Profit Part II". Uncommon Knowledge. Hoover Institution. Video Interview, recorded March 18, 2016 
Charles G. Koch at Goodreads







v
t
e


Koch family



Parents



Fred C. Koch: 1900–1967





Children



Frederick R. Koch: 1933
Charles Koch: 1935
David Koch: 1940
William Koch: 1940





Other



Harry Koch: 1867–1942





Major companies



Koch Industries





Other organizations



Koch family foundations
Charles Koch Institute
Citizens for a Sound Economy
Americans for Prosperity
David H. Koch Institute for Integrative Cancer Research
Bill of Rights Institute
Cato Institute





See also



Political activities of the Koch brothers
Mary R. Koch (ship)
The Science of Success (book)
Mercatus Center
Charles Koch Arena
David H. Koch Theater












v
t
e


Koch Industries



Invista



Antron
Comforel
Coolmax
Cordura
Dacron
Lycra
Polarguard
SolarMax
Stainmaster
Tactel
Thermolite





Georgia-Pacific



Angel Soft
Brawny
Colhogar
Delica
Demak'Up
DensArmor Plus
Dixie
KittenSoft
Lotus
Mardi Gras
Moltonel
Okay
Plytanium
Quilted Northern
Soft 'n Gentle
Sparkle
Tenderly
ToughRock
Tutto
Vanity Fair
Zee





Other units



ABKO Properties
Flint Hills Resources
Koch Chemical Technology Group
Koch Fertilizer
Koch Minerals
KochPAC
Koch Pipeline Company
Koch Supply & Trading
Matador Cattle Company
Molex





Key people



Charles Koch
David Koch
Richard Fink
Kevin Gentry












v
t
e


The World's Billionaires – Top ten richest people in the world as of 20 April 2017






 Bill Gates ($86.0B, United States)
 Warren Buffett ($75.6B, United States)
 Jeff Bezos ($72.8B, United States)
 Amancio Ortega ($71.3B, Spain)
 Mark Zuckerberg ($56.0B, United States)
 Carlos Slim ($54.5B, Mexico)
 Larry Ellison ($52.2B, United States)
 Charles Koch ($48.3B, United States)
 David Koch ($48.3B, United States)
 Michael Bloomberg ($47.5B, United States)












v
t
e


Wealthiest people in the United States by state







AL
Jimmy Rane


AK
Leonard Hyde and Jonathan Rubini


AZ
Bruce Halle


AR
Jim Walton


CA
Mark Zuckerberg


CO
Charlie Ergen


CT
Ray Dalio


DE
Robert W. Gore and Elizabeth Snyder


FL
Thomas Peterffy


GA
Jim Kennedy


HI
Pierre Omidyar


ID
Frank L. VanderSloot


IL
Kenneth C. Griffin


IN
Carl Cook


IA
Harry Stine


KS
Charles Koch


KY
B. Wayne Hughes


LA
Tom Benson


ME
Bill and Susan Alfond


MD
Ted Lerner


MA
Abigail Johnson


MI
Dan Gilbert


MN
Whitney MacMillan


MS
Leslie Lampton


MO
Stan Kroenke


MT
Dennis Washington


NE
Warren Buffett


NV
Sheldon Adelson


NH
Andrea Reimann-Ciardelli


NJ
Donald Newhouse


NM
Mack C. Chase


NY
Michael Bloomberg


NC
James Goodnight


ND
Gary Tharaldson


OH
Les Wexner


OK
Harold Hamm


OR
Phil Knight


PA
Mary Alice Dorrance Malone


RI
Jonathan M. Nelson


SC
Anita Zucker


SD
T. Denny Sanford


TN
Thomas F. Frist Jr.


TX
Alice Walton


UT
Gail Miller


VT
John Abele


VA
Jacqueline Mars


WA
Bill Gates


WV
Jim Justice


WI
John Menard Jr.


WY
John Mars










Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 36349742
LCCN: n2006075374
ISNI: 0000 0001 1489 9756
GND: 136727751










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Charles_Koch&oldid=791155318"					
Categories: 1935 birthsLiving people20th-century American businesspeople21st-century American businesspeopleAmerican billionairesAmerican businesspeople in the oil industryAmerican chief executives of energy companiesAmerican chief executives of manufacturing companiesAmerican libertariansAmerican people of Dutch descentAmerican people of German descentAmerican philanthropistsBusinesspeople from KansasCato Institute peopleKansas RepublicansKoch familyMassachusetts Institute of Technology alumniMont Pelerin Society membersNon-interventionismPeople from Indian Wells, CaliforniaPeople from Wichita, KansasTea Party movement activistsHidden categories: Use American English from February 2016All Wikipedia articles written in American EnglishUse mdy dates from February 2016Articles with hCardsNo local image but image on WikidataArticles containing potentially dated statements from 2014All articles containing potentially dated statementsBLP articles lacking sources from June 2014All BLP articles lacking sourcesWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةবাংলাDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisՀայերենBahasa IndonesiaItalianoمازِرونیမြန်မာဘာသာOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаPortuguêsРусскийSimple EnglishSuomiSvenska 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 18 July 2017, at 13:49.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Charles Koch - Wikipedia





















 






Charles Koch

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Charles Koch


Born
Charles de Ganahl Koch
(1935-11-01) November 1, 1935 (age 81)
Wichita, Kansas, U.S.


Residence
Indian Wells, California, U.S.


Alma mater
Massachusetts Institute of Technology


Occupation
Chairman and CEO of Koch Industries


Net worth
$48.7 billion (February 2017)[1]


Political party
Republican


Spouse(s)
Liz Koch (m. 1972)


Children



Chase Koch[2]
Elizabeth Koch[3]





Parent(s)



Fred C. Koch
Mary Robinson





Relatives

Siblings:



Frederick R. Koch
David Koch
Bill Koch







Charles de Ganahl Koch (/ˈkoʊk/; born November 1, 1935) is an American businessman, political donor and philanthropist. He is co-owner, chairman of the board, and chief executive officer of Koch Industries, while his brother David Koch serves as Executive Vice President. Charles and David each own 42% of the conglomerate. The brothers inherited the business from their father, Fred C. Koch, then expanded the business.[4] Originally involved exclusively in oil refining and chemicals, Koch Industries now includes process and pollution control equipment and technologies; polymers and fibers; minerals; fertilizers; commodity trading and services; forest and consumer products; and ranching. The businesses produce a wide variety of well-known brands, such as Stainmaster carpet, the Lycra brand of spandex fiber, Quilted Northern tissue and Dixie Cup.
Koch Industries is the second-largest privately held company by revenue in the United States according to a 2010 Forbes survey.[5] In February 2014, Koch was ranked 9th richest person in the world by Hurun Report[6] with an estimated net worth of $36 billion. Previously, in October 2012 he was ranked the 6th richest person in the world with an estimated net worth of $34 billion—according to the Bloomberg Billionaires Index[7]—and was ranked 18th on Forbes World's Billionaires list of 2011 (and 4th on the Forbes 400), with an estimated net worth of $25 billion, deriving from his 42% stake in Koch Industries.[8] Koch has published three books detailing his business philosophy, The Science of Success,[9] Market Based Management,[10] and Good Profit.[11]
Koch supports a number of free market-oriented educational organizations, including the Institute for Humane Studies, the Ayn Rand Institute, and the Mercatus Center at George Mason University. He also contributes to the Republican Party and candidates, libertarian groups, and various charitable and cultural institutions. He co-founded the Washington, DC-based Cato Institute. Through the Koch Cultural Trust, founded by Charles Koch's wife, Elizabeth, the Koch family has also funded artistic projects and creative artists.[12]



Contents


1 Early life, education, and career
2 Political and economic views

2.1 Market-based management


3 Philanthropic and political activities
4 Personal life
5 Awards
6 See also
7 References
8 External links



Early life, education, and career[edit]
Koch was born and lives in Wichita, Kansas, one of four sons of Clementine Mary (née Robinson) and Fred Chase Koch.[13][14] Koch's grandfather, Harry Koch, was a Dutch immigrant who settled in West Texas, founded the Quanah Tribune-Chief newspaper, and was a founding shareholder of Quanah, Acme and Pacific Railway.[15] Among his maternal great-great-grandparents were William Ingraham Kip, an Episcopalian bishop, William Burnet Kinney, a politician, and Elizabeth Clementine Stedman, a writer.
In an interview with Warren Cassell Jr., which was recorded in February 2016, Koch explained that as a child he did not live a privileged lifestyle despite growing up in a wealthy family. Koch said, "My father wanted me to work as if I was the poorest person in the world."[16] Koch was educated at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology. He is a member of the Beta Theta Pi fraternity. He received a Bachelor of Science (B.S.) in General Engineering in 1957, a Master of Science (M.S.) in Nuclear Engineering in 1958, and a second M.S. in Chemical Engineering in 1960.[13] After college, Koch started work at Arthur D. Little, Inc. In 1961 he moved back to Wichita to join his father's business, Rock Island Oil & Refining Company.[17] In 1967 he became president of the business, which was then a medium-sized oil firm.[18] In the same year, he renamed the firm Koch Industries in honor of his father.[19] In 2006, Koch Industries generated $90 billion in revenue, a growth of 2000 times over, which represents an annual compounded return of 18%.[20] As of 2014[update], Koch was worth approximately $41.3[21] billion (in 2013 $36 billion) according to the Forbes 400 list.[13]
Koch has been a director of Entrust Financial Corp. since 1982 and director of Koch Industries Inc. since 1982. He is director of resin and fiber company Invista and director of Georgia-Pacific LLC, paper and pulp products. Koch founded or helped found several organizations, including the Cato Institute, the Institute for Humane Studies and the Mercatus Center at George Mason University, the Bill of Rights Institute, and the Market-Based Management Institute. He is a member of the Mont Pelerin Society.[22]
Political and economic views[edit]
Charles Koch is a classical liberal and has formerly identified as a libertarian.[23] He is opposed to corporate welfare[24] and told the National Journal that his "overall concept is to minimize the role of government and to maximize the role of private economy and to maximize personal freedoms."[25] He has expressed concern for too much government regulation in the U.S., stating that "we could be facing the greatest loss of liberty and prosperity since the 1930s."[26] In addition, he has warned that drastic government overspending and a decline of the free enterprise system will prove detrimental to long-term social and economic prosperity.[27]
Influences on Koch include Alexis de Tocqueville,[28] Adam Smith, Michael Polanyi,[17] Joseph Schumpeter, Julian Simon, Paul Johnson, Thomas Sowell, Charles Murray, Leonard Read, and F.A. Harper.[18] The presidents he most admires include George Washington, Grover Cleveland, and Calvin Coolidge. In an interview with the American Journal of Business, Koch said he owes "a huge debt of gratitude to the giants who created the Austrian School [of economics]. They developed principles that enabled me to gain an understanding of how the world works, and these ideas were a catalyst in the development of Market-Based Management." In particular, he expresses admiration for Ludwig von Mises’ book Human Action, as well as the writings of Friedrich Hayek.[17] Koch said "the short-term infatuation with quarterly earnings on Wall Street restricts the earnings potential of Fortune 500 publicly traded firms."[18] He also considers public firms to be "feeding grounds for lawyers and lawsuits," with regulations like Sarbanes–Oxley only increasing the earnings potential of privately held companies.[18]
Koch disdains "big government" and the "political class."[18] He believes billionaires Warren Buffett and George Soros, who fund organizations with different ideologies, "simply haven't been sufficiently exposed to the ideas of liberty."[18] Koch thinks "prosperity is under attack" by the Obama administration and "warns of policies that threaten to erode our economic freedom and transfer vast sums of money to the state."[29]
In an April 2011 Wall Street Journal op-ed, Koch wrote:

Government spending on business only aggravates the problem. Too many businesses have successfully lobbied for special favors and treatment by seeking mandates for their products, subsidies (in the form of cash payments from the government), and regulations and tariffs to keep more efficient competitors at bay. Crony capitalism is much easier than competing in an open market. But it erodes our overall standard of living and stifles entrepreneurs by rewarding the politically favored rather than those who provide what consumers want.[30]

His opposition to corporate welfare includes lobbying for the end to ethanol subsidies despite the fact that Koch Industries is a major ethanol producer. He is quoted as saying: “The first thing we’ve got to get rid of is business welfare and entitlements.”[31] Regarding government regulation, Koch has written that he expects his employees to cooperate fully with the law, regardless of personal views:

We needed to be uncompromising [with our workforce], to expect 100 percent of our employees to comply 100 percent of the time with complex and ever-changing government mandates. Striving to comply with every law does not mean agreeing with every law. But, even when faced with laws we think are counter-productive, we must first comply. Only then, from a credible position, can we enter into a dialogue with regulatory agencies to demonstrate alternatives that are more beneficial. If these efforts fail, we can then join with others in using education and/or political efforts to change the law.[32]

In an April 2014 Wall Street Journal op-ed, Koch wrote, "the fundamental concepts of dignity, respect, equality before the law and personal freedom are under attack by the nation's own government." He criticized the Obama Administration, saying that its "central belief and fatal conceit" is that people are not capable of running their own lives. "This is the essence of big government and collectivism," he wrote. He cited the "current health care debacle" as an example of disastrous government control. He complained that he had been the victim of "character assassination."[33][34]
In an November 2015 joint interview with his brother, David, on MSNBC's Morning Joe Koch, who supports a non-interventionist foreign policy,[35] criticized America's current foreign policy calling it a "form of insanity."[36]
Market-based management[edit]
Koch's business philosophy, "market-based management" (MBM), is described in his 2007 book The Science of Success. In an interview with the Wichita Eagle,[19] he said that he was motivated to write the book by Koch Industries' 2004 acquisition of Invista so he could give new employees a "comprehensive picture" of MBM. According to the website of the Market-Based Management Institute, which Koch founded in 2005, MBM is "based on rules of just conduct, economic thinking, and sound mental models", harnessing the dispersed knowledge of employees just as markets harness knowledge in society. "It is organized in and interpreted through five dimensions: vision, virtue and talents, decision rights, incentives, and knowledge processes."[37] In the book, Koch attempts to apply F. A. Hayek's spontaneous order theory and Austrian entrepreneurial theory, such as that of Mises and Israel Kirzner, to organizational management.[31][38] T. Boone Pickens argues that Koch's business success lends credibility to the book's concept.[38]
Philanthropic and political activities[edit]
See also: Political activities of the Koch brothers
Koch funds and supports libertarian and free-enterprise policy and advocacy organizations.[29] In 1977 he co-founded, with Edward H. Crane and Murray Rothbard, the Cato Institute.[39] He is a board member at the Mercatus Center, a market-oriented research think tank at George Mason University.[40]
In 2008, Koch was included in Businessweek's list of top 50 American givers. Between 2004 and 2008, Koch gave $246 million, focusing on "libertarian causes, giving money for academic and public policy research and social welfare."[41] Koch was awarded an Honorary Doctorate from George Mason University in recognition of his financial support "through scholarships, faculty recruitment, and research grants".[42] A leaked 2012 fundraising plan indicated that the Charles G. Koch Charitable Foundation contributed $25,000 in 2011 to The Heartland Institute, an American conservative and libertarian public policy think tank.[43][44][45]
Koch's philanthropic activities have focused on research, policy, and educational projects intended to advance free-market views. He has underwritten scholarships and financed the research of economists such as James Buchanan and Friedrich Hayek. He has also “supported efforts to inspire at-risk young people to consider entrepreneurship, to teach American students the principles of limited government, and to connect recent graduates with market-oriented organizations, in an effort to launch their careers in public policy.”[46]
Two works that have been especially influential upon Koch's philosophy are Ludwig Von Mises' Human Action and F. A. Harper's Why Wages Rise. After reading Harper's book, Koch became involved with Harper's Institute for Humane Studies, of which he became a principal supporter. He has been on the board of IHS since 1966. Since the 1980s, IHS has been increasingly interested in aiding the careers of aspiring educators, journalists, and policy professionals with an interest in classical liberal thought. Among other projects, the IHS runs the Charles G. Koch Summer Fellow Program, which “has supported more than 900 students during eight-week internships at public policy organizations, both in D.C. and around the country.”[46] In addition, almost 200 institutions of higher education in the U.S. are funded by the Charles Koch Foundation. What all the Koch-funded programs have in common is an interest in studying free societies with an eye to understanding how economic freedom benefits humanity.[46]
Through the Koch Cultural Trust, founded by Charles Koch's wife, Elizabeth, the Koch family has provided financial support to promising artists in a variety of fields. More than $1.7 million in grants have been awarded to programs and individuals with Kansas roots.[12]
Koch supported his brother's candidacy for vice president on the Libertarian Party ticket in 1980.[47] After the bid, Koch told a reporter that conventional politics "tends to be a nasty, corrupting business ... I’m interested in advancing libertarian ideas".[47] In addition to funding think tanks, Charles and David also support libertarian academics[48] and Koch funds the Charles G. Koch Summer Fellow Program through the Institute for Humane Studies which recruits and mentors young libertarians.[49] Koch also organizes twice yearly meetings[18] of Republican donors.[29]
Charles Koch looks favorably upon the Tea Party movement. "The way it's grown, the passion, and the intensity, was beyond what I had anticipated," he told an interviewer.[27] He's funded groups opposed to Barack Obama's administration.[47]
Koch has given money to support public policy research focused on "developing voluntary, market-based solutions to social problems."[50] He has given to the Bill of Rights Institute, a non-profit group that educates teachers, students, and others about the Bill of Rights.[50][51] He has also given to the Youth Entrepreneurs Kansas, an organization that teaches business skills to at-risk youth in Kansas schools.[52] Koch has also supported the Berkeley Earth Surface Temperature project, a scientific effort to compile an open database of the Earth's surface temperature records.[53]
In 2002, Koch Industries donated $6 million to renovate the Wichita State University basketball arena. The gift was given in honor of Koch, and the arena was subsequently renamed the Charles Koch Arena.[54] Koch has continued to be a major donor to both the university and its athletic program. In December 2014, Koch Industries and the Koch family foundation donated $11.25 million to the university, the largest one-time gift in school history, with $4.5 million of that going toward a plan to renovate the arena and expand the athletic program's academic support center.[55] Several months later, when men's basketball head coach Gregg Marshall was considering an offer to become head coach at the University of Alabama, Koch led a group of local business leaders and WSU boosters that raised Marshall's annual salary from $1.85 million to $3 million and kept him at the school. The raise was seen as an unprecedented move for a school outside the Power Five conferences, and likely to make Marshall among the 10 highest-paid college basketball coaches.[56]
In 2011, Koch was awarded the William E. Simon Prize for Philanthropic Leadership.[57] The award honors "the ideals and principles which guided William E. Simon's giving, including personal responsibility, resourcefulness, volunteerism, scholarship, individual freedom, faith in God, and helping people to help themselves."[58]
In July 2015 Charles Koch and his brother were praised by President Obama and Anthony Van Jones for their bipartisan efforts to reform the criminal justice system.[59][60] For roughly a decade Koch has been advocating for several reforms within the prison system, including the reduction of recidivist criminals, easing the employment process for rehabilitated persons, and the defense of private property from Asset forfeiture.[60][61] Aligning with groups such as the ACLU, the Center for American Progress, Families Against Mandatory Minimums, the Coalition for Public Safety, and the MacArthur Foundation, Koch believes the current system has unfairly targeted low-income and minority communities all while wasting substantial government resources.[60][62]
In February 2016, Koch penned an opinion piece in The Washington Post, where he said he agreed with presidential candidate Bernie Sanders about the unfairness of corporate welfare and mass incarceration in the United States.[63]
Personal life[edit]
Koch has been married to his wife Liz since 1972[64] and has two children, Chase Koch and Elizabeth Koch.[47] Charles and his three brothers have all suffered from prostate cancer.[65] Koch "rarely grants media interviews and prefers to keep a low profile".[19] TIME magazine included Charles and David Koch among the most influential people of 2011. According to the magazine, the list includes "activists, reformers and researchers, heads of state and captains of industry." The article describes the brothers' commitment to free-market principles, the growth and development of their business, and their support for liberty-minded organizations and political candidates.[4] He now lives in Indian Wells, California.[66]
Awards[edit]





This section of a biography of a living person needs additional citations for verification. Please help by adding reliable sources. Contentious material about living persons that is unsourced or poorly sourced must be removed immediately, especially if potentially libelous or harmful. (June 2014) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Koch has received various awards and honors, including:

Honorary Doctor of Science, from George Mason University, for his continued support of the economics program at GMU[67]
Honorary Doctor of Commerce from Washburn University[68]
Honorary Doctor of Laws from Babson College
President's Medal from Wichita State University in 2004
The Adam Smith Award from the American Legislative Exchange Council
The 1999 Directors' Award for Global Vision in Energy from the New York Mercantile Exchange
The 1999 Governor's Arts Patrons Award from the Kansas Arts Commission
The 2000 National Distinguished Service Award from The Tax Foundation
The Spirit of Justice Award from The Heritage Foundation
The Entrepreneurial Leadership Award from the National Foundation for Teaching Entrepreneurship
The Brotherhood/Sisterhood Award from the National Conference of Christians and Jews
The Distinguished Citizen Award from the Boy Scouts of America
The Free Enterprise Award from The Council for National Policy
The Herman W. Lay Memorial Award from the Association of Private Enterprise Education
The Distinguished Service Citation from the University of Kansas
Honorary Life Member in the Washburn Law School Association
The Distinguished Citizen Award from Kansas State University
Induction into the Kansas Oil and Gas Hall of Fame
Induction into the Wichita and Kansas Business Halls of Fame
Spirit of Excellence Award from The Urban League of Wichita
Outstanding Humanitarian Award from the Greater Wichita Chapter of the National Society of Fundraising Executives
Wichita City Medallion
Wichita State University Entrepreneur in Residence
Wichita District Minority Small Business Advocate of the Year
The Individual Recognition Award from the Wichita/Sedgwick County Arts and Humanities Council
The Uncommon Citizen Award from the Wichita Chamber of Commerce
The 2011 William E. Simon Prize for Philanthropic Leadership from the Philanthropy Roundtable
The 2011 Defender of Justice award from the National Association of Criminal Defense Lawyers[69]
In 2012, ExecReps ranked him number two on their Top Chief Executive List[70]

See also[edit]

Charles Koch Arena
Charles Koch Institute
Charles G. Koch Charitable Foundation
List of billionaires

References[edit]


^ "Charles Koch profile". Forbes. Retrieved 23 February 2017. 
^ Mr. Big Forbes.com. Retrieved November 2011.
^ "Koch, Charles (1935)". New Netherland Project. 
^ a b Ferguson, Andrew (21 April 2011). "The 2011 TIME 100". TIME. Retrieved 22 April 2011. 
^ The Top 10, America's Largest Private Companies Forbes.com. Retrieved April 2011.
^ [1] Hurun Report Global Rich List 2014
^ "Bloomberg". Bloomberg LP. Retrieved October 31, 2012. 
^ "'Charles Koch', Forbes profiles". 
^ Charles G. Koch (2007). The Science Of Success ISBN 9780470139882 Retrieved April 2011.
^ 2006, ISBN 9781931721998
^ "Charles Koch's New Book Out Tuesday" Biz Journals, Wichita, October 12, 2015. (ISBN 9780147520470)
^ a b "History". Koch Cultural Trust. Retrieved 3 April 2012. 
^ a b c "The 400 Richest Americans". Forbes. Massachusetts Institute of Technology, Bachelor of Arts / Science Massachusetts Institute of Technology, Master of Science Son of Koch Industries founder Fred C. Koch (d. 1967), MIT grad who invented method of refining gasoline from heavy oil. Took refining innovation to Soviet Union 1929; returned home 1930s. Sons Frederick, Charles, David and William inherited Koch Industries after father's death; Charles and David bought out William and Frederick for $1.3 billion in 1983. 
^ "FMK Foundation History". Fmkfoundation.org. Retrieved 2010-08-29. 
^ Daniel Fisher (26 February 2007). "Koch's Laws". Forbes. Retrieved 16 November 2010. 
^ "Interview with Charles Koch". Warren Cassell Jr. 
^ a b c "Twenty Questions for Charles Koch". American Journal of Business. Muncie. 24 (1): 15–8. Spring 2009. 
^ a b c d e f g Stephen Moore (May 6, 2006). "The Weekend Interview with Charles Koch: Private Enterprise". The Wall Street Journal. p. A.8. 
^ a b c Phyllis Jacobs Griekspoor (4 March 2007). "Charles Koch: His philosophy and his company". Wichita Eagle. 
^ Mark Skousen (4 March 2007). "Business Bookshelf: A Short Course In Long-Term Value". The Wall Street Journal. p. D.8. 
^ Carrie Sheffield. "Charles Koch". Forbes. 
^ Koch's bio at the Mercatus Center
^ "Charles Koch opens up about his 'classical liberal' views". Fox News. 15 October 2015. Retrieved 27 December 2015. 
^ The Koch Brothers December 24, 2012 p. 96 Forbes
^ National Journal (May 16, 1992)
^ The Top 10 Forbes Asia October 19, 2009.
^ a b Continetti, Matthew (April 4, 2011). "The Paranoid Style in Liberal Politics". The Weekly Standard. 
^ Koch, Charles, The Science of Success, p. 57
^ a b c Kate Zernike (25 October 2010). "Secretive Republican Donors Are Planning Ahead". The New York Times. 
^ Koch, Charles (March 1, 2011). "Why Koch Industries Is Speaking Out". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ a b Daniel Fisher (December 5, 2012). "Inside The Koch Empire: How The Brothers Plan To Reshape America". Forbes. 
^ Koch, Charles, The Science of Success, p. 45.
^ Koch, Charles (April 3, 2014). "Charles Koch: I'm Fighting to Restore a Free Society". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ Kopan, Tal (April 3, 2014). "Charles Koch calls critics ‘collectivists’". Politico. 
^ "Koch Brothers Question Wisdom of U.S. Interventionism". November 5, 2015. 
^ "Charles Koch: American Foreign Policy a 'Form of Insanity'". 
^ What is MBM? www.mbminstitute.org. Retrieved April 2011.
^ a b Schor, Elana (16 May 2011). "In Right's Energy-Subsidy Clash, Shades of Koch vs. Pickens". New York Times. New York Times. Retrieved 19 May 2011. 
^ "25 Years at Cato" (PDF). Retrieved 2009-07-10. 
^ "Board of Directors – Mercatus". Mercatus Center at George Mason University. Retrieved 23 January 2014. 
^ "The 50 Top American Givers". Bloomberg Businessweek. Retrieved 27 April 2011. 
^ Charles Koch receives honorary degree from George Mason University www.kochind.com. Retrieved April 2011.
^ "Climate skeptic group works to reverse renewable energy mandates". Washington Post. 
^ Gillis, Justin; Kaufman, Leslie (15 February 2012). "Leak Offers Glimpse of Campaign Against Climate Science". The New York Times. 
^ "The Heartland Institute 2012 Fundraising Plan" (PDF). The Heartland Institute. 15 January 2012. 
^ a b c Glassman, James. "Market-Based Man". Philanthropy Magazine. Philanthropy Roundtable. Retrieved 16 March 2012. 
^ a b c d Jane Mayer (August 30, 2010). "Covert Operations: The billionaire brothers who are waging a war against Obama". The New Yorker. Retrieved January 5, 2012. 
^ Brian Doherty (2008). Radicals for Capitalism: A Freewheeling History of the Modern American Libertarian Movement. PublicAffairs. p. 410. ISBN 1-58648-572-5. One longtime Koch lieutenant characterized the overall strategy of Koch's libertarian funding over the years with both a theatrical metaphor and an Austrian capital theory one: Politicians, ultimately, are just actors playing out a script. The idea is, one gets better and quicker results aiming not at the actors but at the scriptwriters, to help supply the themes and words for the scripts—to try to influence the areas where policy ideas percolate from: academia and think tanks. Ideas, then, are the capital goods that go into building policy as a finished product—and there are insufficient libertarian capital goods at the top of the structure of production to build the policies libertarians demand. 
^ "Charles G. Koch Summer Fellow Program". Institute for Humane Studies at George Mason University. Retrieved 2010-09-10. The Charles G. Koch Summer Fellow Program combines a paid public policy internship with two career skills seminars and weekly policy lectures. You’ll gain real-world experience, take a crash course in market-based policy analysis, and hone your professional skills. The intensive ten-week program begins in June and includes a $1,500 stipend and a housing allowance. 
^ a b "About Charles G. Koch". Charles G. Koch Foundation. February 2009. 
^ "Bill of Rights Institute". Media Matters for America. 
^ "Youth Entrepreneurs Kansas". Charles G. Koch Foundation. 
^ BEST donors, accessed 3/25/11
^ "Charles Koch Arena". Wichita State University. Retrieved 22 May 2013. 
^ Wenzl, Roy (December 16, 2014). "Koch gives $11.25 million to Wichita State". The Wichita Eagle. Retrieved April 3, 2015. 
^ Suellentrop, Paul (April 2, 2015). "Wichita State, community work together to keep Gregg Marshall". The Wichita Eagle. Retrieved April 3, 2015. 
^ "Winner of the 2011 William E. Simon Prize". philanthropyroundtable.org. 
^ "2011 William E. Simon Prize". Philanthropy Roundtable. Philanthropy Roundtable. Retrieved 29 April 2011. 
^ Nelson, Colleen Mccain; Fields, Gary (Jul 16, 2015). "Obama, Koch Brothers in Unlikely Alliance to Overhaul Criminal Justice". Wall Street Journal. 
^ a b c Horwitz, Sari (Aug 15, 2015). "Unlikely Allies". Washington Post. 
^ Hudetz, Mary (Oct 15, 2015). "Forfeiture reform aligns likes of billionaire Charles Koch, ACLU". The Topeka Capital Journal. 
^ "Koch brothers join Obama in advocating US prison reform". Russian Today. Jul 17, 2015. 
^ Koch, Charles G. (February 18, 2016). "Charles Koch: This is the one issue where Bernie Sanders is right". The Washington Post. Retrieved February 19, 2016. 
^ "About Charles G. Koch". Charles G. Koch Charitable Foundation. Retrieved 19 December 2010. 
^ "Donor aims to 'lick' illness that he has battled for 15 years". The Chronicle of Philanthropy. Retrieved 16 October 2011. 
^ Robinson, Peter (April 14, 2016). "Good Profit Part I". Uncomomn Knowledge. Hoover Institution. Video Interview, recorded March 18, 2016 
^ Levinthal, Dave. "Spreading the Free-Market Gospel". The Atlantic. Retrieved 2017-03-09. 
^ "Honorary Degree Recipients and Degrees Conferred Honoris Causa" (PDF). Washburn. 
^ Ball, Molly (Mar 3, 2015). "Do the Koch Brothers Really Care About Criminal-Justice Reform?". The Atlantic. 
^ "May 2013 ExecRank Top CEOs". 


External links[edit]

Profile at Koch Industries
Charles G. Koch Charitable Foundation
Profile at Philanthropy Roundtable
Names in the News: David and Charles Koch at FollowTheMoney.org
Political contributions from Influence Explorer at the Sunlight Foundation
Charles Koch at Bloomberg L.P.
Robinson, Peter (April 29, 2016). "Good Profit Part II". Uncommon Knowledge. Hoover Institution. Video Interview, recorded March 18, 2016 
Charles G. Koch at Goodreads







v
t
e


Koch family



Parents



Fred C. Koch: 1900–1967





Children



Frederick R. Koch: 1933
Charles Koch: 1935
David Koch: 1940
William Koch: 1940





Other



Harry Koch: 1867–1942





Major companies



Koch Industries





Other organizations



Koch family foundations
Charles Koch Institute
Citizens for a Sound Economy
Americans for Prosperity
David H. Koch Institute for Integrative Cancer Research
Bill of Rights Institute
Cato Institute





See also



Political activities of the Koch brothers
Mary R. Koch (ship)
The Science of Success (book)
Mercatus Center
Charles Koch Arena
David H. Koch Theater












v
t
e


Koch Industries



Invista



Antron
Comforel
Coolmax
Cordura
Dacron
Lycra
Polarguard
SolarMax
Stainmaster
Tactel
Thermolite





Georgia-Pacific



Angel Soft
Brawny
Colhogar
Delica
Demak'Up
DensArmor Plus
Dixie
KittenSoft
Lotus
Mardi Gras
Moltonel
Okay
Plytanium
Quilted Northern
Soft 'n Gentle
Sparkle
Tenderly
ToughRock
Tutto
Vanity Fair
Zee





Other units



ABKO Properties
Flint Hills Resources
Koch Chemical Technology Group
Koch Fertilizer
Koch Minerals
KochPAC
Koch Pipeline Company
Koch Supply & Trading
Matador Cattle Company
Molex





Key people



Charles Koch
David Koch
Richard Fink
Kevin Gentry












v
t
e


The World's Billionaires – Top ten richest people in the world as of 20 April 2017






 Bill Gates ($86.0B, United States)
 Warren Buffett ($75.6B, United States)
 Jeff Bezos ($72.8B, United States)
 Amancio Ortega ($71.3B, Spain)
 Mark Zuckerberg ($56.0B, United States)
 Carlos Slim ($54.5B, Mexico)
 Larry Ellison ($52.2B, United States)
 Charles Koch ($48.3B, United States)
 David Koch ($48.3B, United States)
 Michael Bloomberg ($47.5B, United States)












v
t
e


Wealthiest people in the United States by state







AL
Jimmy Rane


AK
Leonard Hyde and Jonathan Rubini


AZ
Bruce Halle


AR
Jim Walton


CA
Mark Zuckerberg


CO
Charlie Ergen


CT
Ray Dalio


DE
Robert W. Gore and Elizabeth Snyder


FL
Thomas Peterffy


GA
Jim Kennedy


HI
Pierre Omidyar


ID
Frank L. VanderSloot


IL
Kenneth C. Griffin


IN
Carl Cook


IA
Harry Stine


KS
Charles Koch


KY
B. Wayne Hughes


LA
Tom Benson


ME
Bill and Susan Alfond


MD
Ted Lerner


MA
Abigail Johnson


MI
Dan Gilbert


MN
Whitney MacMillan


MS
Leslie Lampton


MO
Stan Kroenke


MT
Dennis Washington


NE
Warren Buffett


NV
Sheldon Adelson


NH
Andrea Reimann-Ciardelli


NJ
Donald Newhouse


NM
Mack C. Chase


NY
Michael Bloomberg


NC
James Goodnight


ND
Gary Tharaldson


OH
Les Wexner


OK
Harold Hamm


OR
Phil Knight


PA
Mary Alice Dorrance Malone


RI
Jonathan M. Nelson


SC
Anita Zucker


SD
T. Denny Sanford


TN
Thomas F. Frist Jr.


TX
Alice Walton


UT
Gail Miller


VT
John Abele


VA
Jacqueline Mars


WA
Bill Gates


WV
Jim Justice


WI
John Menard Jr.


WY
John Mars










Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 36349742
LCCN: n2006075374
ISNI: 0000 0001 1489 9756
GND: 136727751










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Charles_Koch&oldid=791155318"					
Categories: 1935 birthsLiving people20th-century American businesspeople21st-century American businesspeopleAmerican billionairesAmerican businesspeople in the oil industryAmerican chief executives of energy companiesAmerican chief executives of manufacturing companiesAmerican libertariansAmerican people of Dutch descentAmerican people of German descentAmerican philanthropistsBusinesspeople from KansasCato Institute peopleKansas RepublicansKoch familyMassachusetts Institute of Technology alumniMont Pelerin Society membersNon-interventionismPeople from Indian Wells, CaliforniaPeople from Wichita, KansasTea Party movement activistsHidden categories: Use American English from February 2016All Wikipedia articles written in American EnglishUse mdy dates from February 2016Articles with hCardsNo local image but image on WikidataArticles containing potentially dated statements from 2014All articles containing potentially dated statementsBLP articles lacking sources from June 2014All BLP articles lacking sourcesWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةবাংলাDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisՀայերենBahasa IndonesiaItalianoمازِرونیမြန်မာဘာသာOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаPortuguêsРусскийSimple EnglishSuomiSvenska 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 18 July 2017, at 13:49.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Charles Koch - Wikipedia





















 






Charles Koch

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Charles Koch


Born
Charles de Ganahl Koch
(1935-11-01) November 1, 1935 (age 81)
Wichita, Kansas, U.S.


Residence
Indian Wells, California, U.S.


Alma mater
Massachusetts Institute of Technology


Occupation
Chairman and CEO of Koch Industries


Net worth
$48.7 billion (February 2017)[1]


Political party
Republican


Spouse(s)
Liz Koch (m. 1972)


Children



Chase Koch[2]
Elizabeth Koch[3]





Parent(s)



Fred C. Koch
Mary Robinson





Relatives

Siblings:



Frederick R. Koch
David Koch
Bill Koch







Charles de Ganahl Koch (/ˈkoʊk/; born November 1, 1935) is an American businessman, political donor and philanthropist. He is co-owner, chairman of the board, and chief executive officer of Koch Industries, while his brother David Koch serves as Executive Vice President. Charles and David each own 42% of the conglomerate. The brothers inherited the business from their father, Fred C. Koch, then expanded the business.[4] Originally involved exclusively in oil refining and chemicals, Koch Industries now includes process and pollution control equipment and technologies; polymers and fibers; minerals; fertilizers; commodity trading and services; forest and consumer products; and ranching. The businesses produce a wide variety of well-known brands, such as Stainmaster carpet, the Lycra brand of spandex fiber, Quilted Northern tissue and Dixie Cup.
Koch Industries is the second-largest privately held company by revenue in the United States according to a 2010 Forbes survey.[5] In February 2014, Koch was ranked 9th richest person in the world by Hurun Report[6] with an estimated net worth of $36 billion. Previously, in October 2012 he was ranked the 6th richest person in the world with an estimated net worth of $34 billion—according to the Bloomberg Billionaires Index[7]—and was ranked 18th on Forbes World's Billionaires list of 2011 (and 4th on the Forbes 400), with an estimated net worth of $25 billion, deriving from his 42% stake in Koch Industries.[8] Koch has published three books detailing his business philosophy, The Science of Success,[9] Market Based Management,[10] and Good Profit.[11]
Koch supports a number of free market-oriented educational organizations, including the Institute for Humane Studies, the Ayn Rand Institute, and the Mercatus Center at George Mason University. He also contributes to the Republican Party and candidates, libertarian groups, and various charitable and cultural institutions. He co-founded the Washington, DC-based Cato Institute. Through the Koch Cultural Trust, founded by Charles Koch's wife, Elizabeth, the Koch family has also funded artistic projects and creative artists.[12]



Contents


1 Early life, education, and career
2 Political and economic views

2.1 Market-based management


3 Philanthropic and political activities
4 Personal life
5 Awards
6 See also
7 References
8 External links



Early life, education, and career[edit]
Koch was born and lives in Wichita, Kansas, one of four sons of Clementine Mary (née Robinson) and Fred Chase Koch.[13][14] Koch's grandfather, Harry Koch, was a Dutch immigrant who settled in West Texas, founded the Quanah Tribune-Chief newspaper, and was a founding shareholder of Quanah, Acme and Pacific Railway.[15] Among his maternal great-great-grandparents were William Ingraham Kip, an Episcopalian bishop, William Burnet Kinney, a politician, and Elizabeth Clementine Stedman, a writer.
In an interview with Warren Cassell Jr., which was recorded in February 2016, Koch explained that as a child he did not live a privileged lifestyle despite growing up in a wealthy family. Koch said, "My father wanted me to work as if I was the poorest person in the world."[16] Koch was educated at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology. He is a member of the Beta Theta Pi fraternity. He received a Bachelor of Science (B.S.) in General Engineering in 1957, a Master of Science (M.S.) in Nuclear Engineering in 1958, and a second M.S. in Chemical Engineering in 1960.[13] After college, Koch started work at Arthur D. Little, Inc. In 1961 he moved back to Wichita to join his father's business, Rock Island Oil & Refining Company.[17] In 1967 he became president of the business, which was then a medium-sized oil firm.[18] In the same year, he renamed the firm Koch Industries in honor of his father.[19] In 2006, Koch Industries generated $90 billion in revenue, a growth of 2000 times over, which represents an annual compounded return of 18%.[20] As of 2014[update], Koch was worth approximately $41.3[21] billion (in 2013 $36 billion) according to the Forbes 400 list.[13]
Koch has been a director of Entrust Financial Corp. since 1982 and director of Koch Industries Inc. since 1982. He is director of resin and fiber company Invista and director of Georgia-Pacific LLC, paper and pulp products. Koch founded or helped found several organizations, including the Cato Institute, the Institute for Humane Studies and the Mercatus Center at George Mason University, the Bill of Rights Institute, and the Market-Based Management Institute. He is a member of the Mont Pelerin Society.[22]
Political and economic views[edit]
Charles Koch is a classical liberal and has formerly identified as a libertarian.[23] He is opposed to corporate welfare[24] and told the National Journal that his "overall concept is to minimize the role of government and to maximize the role of private economy and to maximize personal freedoms."[25] He has expressed concern for too much government regulation in the U.S., stating that "we could be facing the greatest loss of liberty and prosperity since the 1930s."[26] In addition, he has warned that drastic government overspending and a decline of the free enterprise system will prove detrimental to long-term social and economic prosperity.[27]
Influences on Koch include Alexis de Tocqueville,[28] Adam Smith, Michael Polanyi,[17] Joseph Schumpeter, Julian Simon, Paul Johnson, Thomas Sowell, Charles Murray, Leonard Read, and F.A. Harper.[18] The presidents he most admires include George Washington, Grover Cleveland, and Calvin Coolidge. In an interview with the American Journal of Business, Koch said he owes "a huge debt of gratitude to the giants who created the Austrian School [of economics]. They developed principles that enabled me to gain an understanding of how the world works, and these ideas were a catalyst in the development of Market-Based Management." In particular, he expresses admiration for Ludwig von Mises’ book Human Action, as well as the writings of Friedrich Hayek.[17] Koch said "the short-term infatuation with quarterly earnings on Wall Street restricts the earnings potential of Fortune 500 publicly traded firms."[18] He also considers public firms to be "feeding grounds for lawyers and lawsuits," with regulations like Sarbanes–Oxley only increasing the earnings potential of privately held companies.[18]
Koch disdains "big government" and the "political class."[18] He believes billionaires Warren Buffett and George Soros, who fund organizations with different ideologies, "simply haven't been sufficiently exposed to the ideas of liberty."[18] Koch thinks "prosperity is under attack" by the Obama administration and "warns of policies that threaten to erode our economic freedom and transfer vast sums of money to the state."[29]
In an April 2011 Wall Street Journal op-ed, Koch wrote:

Government spending on business only aggravates the problem. Too many businesses have successfully lobbied for special favors and treatment by seeking mandates for their products, subsidies (in the form of cash payments from the government), and regulations and tariffs to keep more efficient competitors at bay. Crony capitalism is much easier than competing in an open market. But it erodes our overall standard of living and stifles entrepreneurs by rewarding the politically favored rather than those who provide what consumers want.[30]

His opposition to corporate welfare includes lobbying for the end to ethanol subsidies despite the fact that Koch Industries is a major ethanol producer. He is quoted as saying: “The first thing we’ve got to get rid of is business welfare and entitlements.”[31] Regarding government regulation, Koch has written that he expects his employees to cooperate fully with the law, regardless of personal views:

We needed to be uncompromising [with our workforce], to expect 100 percent of our employees to comply 100 percent of the time with complex and ever-changing government mandates. Striving to comply with every law does not mean agreeing with every law. But, even when faced with laws we think are counter-productive, we must first comply. Only then, from a credible position, can we enter into a dialogue with regulatory agencies to demonstrate alternatives that are more beneficial. If these efforts fail, we can then join with others in using education and/or political efforts to change the law.[32]

In an April 2014 Wall Street Journal op-ed, Koch wrote, "the fundamental concepts of dignity, respect, equality before the law and personal freedom are under attack by the nation's own government." He criticized the Obama Administration, saying that its "central belief and fatal conceit" is that people are not capable of running their own lives. "This is the essence of big government and collectivism," he wrote. He cited the "current health care debacle" as an example of disastrous government control. He complained that he had been the victim of "character assassination."[33][34]
In an November 2015 joint interview with his brother, David, on MSNBC's Morning Joe Koch, who supports a non-interventionist foreign policy,[35] criticized America's current foreign policy calling it a "form of insanity."[36]
Market-based management[edit]
Koch's business philosophy, "market-based management" (MBM), is described in his 2007 book The Science of Success. In an interview with the Wichita Eagle,[19] he said that he was motivated to write the book by Koch Industries' 2004 acquisition of Invista so he could give new employees a "comprehensive picture" of MBM. According to the website of the Market-Based Management Institute, which Koch founded in 2005, MBM is "based on rules of just conduct, economic thinking, and sound mental models", harnessing the dispersed knowledge of employees just as markets harness knowledge in society. "It is organized in and interpreted through five dimensions: vision, virtue and talents, decision rights, incentives, and knowledge processes."[37] In the book, Koch attempts to apply F. A. Hayek's spontaneous order theory and Austrian entrepreneurial theory, such as that of Mises and Israel Kirzner, to organizational management.[31][38] T. Boone Pickens argues that Koch's business success lends credibility to the book's concept.[38]
Philanthropic and political activities[edit]
See also: Political activities of the Koch brothers
Koch funds and supports libertarian and free-enterprise policy and advocacy organizations.[29] In 1977 he co-founded, with Edward H. Crane and Murray Rothbard, the Cato Institute.[39] He is a board member at the Mercatus Center, a market-oriented research think tank at George Mason University.[40]
In 2008, Koch was included in Businessweek's list of top 50 American givers. Between 2004 and 2008, Koch gave $246 million, focusing on "libertarian causes, giving money for academic and public policy research and social welfare."[41] Koch was awarded an Honorary Doctorate from George Mason University in recognition of his financial support "through scholarships, faculty recruitment, and research grants".[42] A leaked 2012 fundraising plan indicated that the Charles G. Koch Charitable Foundation contributed $25,000 in 2011 to The Heartland Institute, an American conservative and libertarian public policy think tank.[43][44][45]
Koch's philanthropic activities have focused on research, policy, and educational projects intended to advance free-market views. He has underwritten scholarships and financed the research of economists such as James Buchanan and Friedrich Hayek. He has also “supported efforts to inspire at-risk young people to consider entrepreneurship, to teach American students the principles of limited government, and to connect recent graduates with market-oriented organizations, in an effort to launch their careers in public policy.”[46]
Two works that have been especially influential upon Koch's philosophy are Ludwig Von Mises' Human Action and F. A. Harper's Why Wages Rise. After reading Harper's book, Koch became involved with Harper's Institute for Humane Studies, of which he became a principal supporter. He has been on the board of IHS since 1966. Since the 1980s, IHS has been increasingly interested in aiding the careers of aspiring educators, journalists, and policy professionals with an interest in classical liberal thought. Among other projects, the IHS runs the Charles G. Koch Summer Fellow Program, which “has supported more than 900 students during eight-week internships at public policy organizations, both in D.C. and around the country.”[46] In addition, almost 200 institutions of higher education in the U.S. are funded by the Charles Koch Foundation. What all the Koch-funded programs have in common is an interest in studying free societies with an eye to understanding how economic freedom benefits humanity.[46]
Through the Koch Cultural Trust, founded by Charles Koch's wife, Elizabeth, the Koch family has provided financial support to promising artists in a variety of fields. More than $1.7 million in grants have been awarded to programs and individuals with Kansas roots.[12]
Koch supported his brother's candidacy for vice president on the Libertarian Party ticket in 1980.[47] After the bid, Koch told a reporter that conventional politics "tends to be a nasty, corrupting business ... I’m interested in advancing libertarian ideas".[47] In addition to funding think tanks, Charles and David also support libertarian academics[48] and Koch funds the Charles G. Koch Summer Fellow Program through the Institute for Humane Studies which recruits and mentors young libertarians.[49] Koch also organizes twice yearly meetings[18] of Republican donors.[29]
Charles Koch looks favorably upon the Tea Party movement. "The way it's grown, the passion, and the intensity, was beyond what I had anticipated," he told an interviewer.[27] He's funded groups opposed to Barack Obama's administration.[47]
Koch has given money to support public policy research focused on "developing voluntary, market-based solutions to social problems."[50] He has given to the Bill of Rights Institute, a non-profit group that educates teachers, students, and others about the Bill of Rights.[50][51] He has also given to the Youth Entrepreneurs Kansas, an organization that teaches business skills to at-risk youth in Kansas schools.[52] Koch has also supported the Berkeley Earth Surface Temperature project, a scientific effort to compile an open database of the Earth's surface temperature records.[53]
In 2002, Koch Industries donated $6 million to renovate the Wichita State University basketball arena. The gift was given in honor of Koch, and the arena was subsequently renamed the Charles Koch Arena.[54] Koch has continued to be a major donor to both the university and its athletic program. In December 2014, Koch Industries and the Koch family foundation donated $11.25 million to the university, the largest one-time gift in school history, with $4.5 million of that going toward a plan to renovate the arena and expand the athletic program's academic support center.[55] Several months later, when men's basketball head coach Gregg Marshall was considering an offer to become head coach at the University of Alabama, Koch led a group of local business leaders and WSU boosters that raised Marshall's annual salary from $1.85 million to $3 million and kept him at the school. The raise was seen as an unprecedented move for a school outside the Power Five conferences, and likely to make Marshall among the 10 highest-paid college basketball coaches.[56]
In 2011, Koch was awarded the William E. Simon Prize for Philanthropic Leadership.[57] The award honors "the ideals and principles which guided William E. Simon's giving, including personal responsibility, resourcefulness, volunteerism, scholarship, individual freedom, faith in God, and helping people to help themselves."[58]
In July 2015 Charles Koch and his brother were praised by President Obama and Anthony Van Jones for their bipartisan efforts to reform the criminal justice system.[59][60] For roughly a decade Koch has been advocating for several reforms within the prison system, including the reduction of recidivist criminals, easing the employment process for rehabilitated persons, and the defense of private property from Asset forfeiture.[60][61] Aligning with groups such as the ACLU, the Center for American Progress, Families Against Mandatory Minimums, the Coalition for Public Safety, and the MacArthur Foundation, Koch believes the current system has unfairly targeted low-income and minority communities all while wasting substantial government resources.[60][62]
In February 2016, Koch penned an opinion piece in The Washington Post, where he said he agreed with presidential candidate Bernie Sanders about the unfairness of corporate welfare and mass incarceration in the United States.[63]
Personal life[edit]
Koch has been married to his wife Liz since 1972[64] and has two children, Chase Koch and Elizabeth Koch.[47] Charles and his three brothers have all suffered from prostate cancer.[65] Koch "rarely grants media interviews and prefers to keep a low profile".[19] TIME magazine included Charles and David Koch among the most influential people of 2011. According to the magazine, the list includes "activists, reformers and researchers, heads of state and captains of industry." The article describes the brothers' commitment to free-market principles, the growth and development of their business, and their support for liberty-minded organizations and political candidates.[4] He now lives in Indian Wells, California.[66]
Awards[edit]





This section of a biography of a living person needs additional citations for verification. Please help by adding reliable sources. Contentious material about living persons that is unsourced or poorly sourced must be removed immediately, especially if potentially libelous or harmful. (June 2014) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Koch has received various awards and honors, including:

Honorary Doctor of Science, from George Mason University, for his continued support of the economics program at GMU[67]
Honorary Doctor of Commerce from Washburn University[68]
Honorary Doctor of Laws from Babson College
President's Medal from Wichita State University in 2004
The Adam Smith Award from the American Legislative Exchange Council
The 1999 Directors' Award for Global Vision in Energy from the New York Mercantile Exchange
The 1999 Governor's Arts Patrons Award from the Kansas Arts Commission
The 2000 National Distinguished Service Award from The Tax Foundation
The Spirit of Justice Award from The Heritage Foundation
The Entrepreneurial Leadership Award from the National Foundation for Teaching Entrepreneurship
The Brotherhood/Sisterhood Award from the National Conference of Christians and Jews
The Distinguished Citizen Award from the Boy Scouts of America
The Free Enterprise Award from The Council for National Policy
The Herman W. Lay Memorial Award from the Association of Private Enterprise Education
The Distinguished Service Citation from the University of Kansas
Honorary Life Member in the Washburn Law School Association
The Distinguished Citizen Award from Kansas State University
Induction into the Kansas Oil and Gas Hall of Fame
Induction into the Wichita and Kansas Business Halls of Fame
Spirit of Excellence Award from The Urban League of Wichita
Outstanding Humanitarian Award from the Greater Wichita Chapter of the National Society of Fundraising Executives
Wichita City Medallion
Wichita State University Entrepreneur in Residence
Wichita District Minority Small Business Advocate of the Year
The Individual Recognition Award from the Wichita/Sedgwick County Arts and Humanities Council
The Uncommon Citizen Award from the Wichita Chamber of Commerce
The 2011 William E. Simon Prize for Philanthropic Leadership from the Philanthropy Roundtable
The 2011 Defender of Justice award from the National Association of Criminal Defense Lawyers[69]
In 2012, ExecReps ranked him number two on their Top Chief Executive List[70]

See also[edit]

Charles Koch Arena
Charles Koch Institute
Charles G. Koch Charitable Foundation
List of billionaires

References[edit]


^ "Charles Koch profile". Forbes. Retrieved 23 February 2017. 
^ Mr. Big Forbes.com. Retrieved November 2011.
^ "Koch, Charles (1935)". New Netherland Project. 
^ a b Ferguson, Andrew (21 April 2011). "The 2011 TIME 100". TIME. Retrieved 22 April 2011. 
^ The Top 10, America's Largest Private Companies Forbes.com. Retrieved April 2011.
^ [1] Hurun Report Global Rich List 2014
^ "Bloomberg". Bloomberg LP. Retrieved October 31, 2012. 
^ "'Charles Koch', Forbes profiles". 
^ Charles G. Koch (2007). The Science Of Success ISBN 9780470139882 Retrieved April 2011.
^ 2006, ISBN 9781931721998
^ "Charles Koch's New Book Out Tuesday" Biz Journals, Wichita, October 12, 2015. (ISBN 9780147520470)
^ a b "History". Koch Cultural Trust. Retrieved 3 April 2012. 
^ a b c "The 400 Richest Americans". Forbes. Massachusetts Institute of Technology, Bachelor of Arts / Science Massachusetts Institute of Technology, Master of Science Son of Koch Industries founder Fred C. Koch (d. 1967), MIT grad who invented method of refining gasoline from heavy oil. Took refining innovation to Soviet Union 1929; returned home 1930s. Sons Frederick, Charles, David and William inherited Koch Industries after father's death; Charles and David bought out William and Frederick for $1.3 billion in 1983. 
^ "FMK Foundation History". Fmkfoundation.org. Retrieved 2010-08-29. 
^ Daniel Fisher (26 February 2007). "Koch's Laws". Forbes. Retrieved 16 November 2010. 
^ "Interview with Charles Koch". Warren Cassell Jr. 
^ a b c "Twenty Questions for Charles Koch". American Journal of Business. Muncie. 24 (1): 15–8. Spring 2009. 
^ a b c d e f g Stephen Moore (May 6, 2006). "The Weekend Interview with Charles Koch: Private Enterprise". The Wall Street Journal. p. A.8. 
^ a b c Phyllis Jacobs Griekspoor (4 March 2007). "Charles Koch: His philosophy and his company". Wichita Eagle. 
^ Mark Skousen (4 March 2007). "Business Bookshelf: A Short Course In Long-Term Value". The Wall Street Journal. p. D.8. 
^ Carrie Sheffield. "Charles Koch". Forbes. 
^ Koch's bio at the Mercatus Center
^ "Charles Koch opens up about his 'classical liberal' views". Fox News. 15 October 2015. Retrieved 27 December 2015. 
^ The Koch Brothers December 24, 2012 p. 96 Forbes
^ National Journal (May 16, 1992)
^ The Top 10 Forbes Asia October 19, 2009.
^ a b Continetti, Matthew (April 4, 2011). "The Paranoid Style in Liberal Politics". The Weekly Standard. 
^ Koch, Charles, The Science of Success, p. 57
^ a b c Kate Zernike (25 October 2010). "Secretive Republican Donors Are Planning Ahead". The New York Times. 
^ Koch, Charles (March 1, 2011). "Why Koch Industries Is Speaking Out". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ a b Daniel Fisher (December 5, 2012). "Inside The Koch Empire: How The Brothers Plan To Reshape America". Forbes. 
^ Koch, Charles, The Science of Success, p. 45.
^ Koch, Charles (April 3, 2014). "Charles Koch: I'm Fighting to Restore a Free Society". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ Kopan, Tal (April 3, 2014). "Charles Koch calls critics ‘collectivists’". Politico. 
^ "Koch Brothers Question Wisdom of U.S. Interventionism". November 5, 2015. 
^ "Charles Koch: American Foreign Policy a 'Form of Insanity'". 
^ What is MBM? www.mbminstitute.org. Retrieved April 2011.
^ a b Schor, Elana (16 May 2011). "In Right's Energy-Subsidy Clash, Shades of Koch vs. Pickens". New York Times. New York Times. Retrieved 19 May 2011. 
^ "25 Years at Cato" (PDF). Retrieved 2009-07-10. 
^ "Board of Directors – Mercatus". Mercatus Center at George Mason University. Retrieved 23 January 2014. 
^ "The 50 Top American Givers". Bloomberg Businessweek. Retrieved 27 April 2011. 
^ Charles Koch receives honorary degree from George Mason University www.kochind.com. Retrieved April 2011.
^ "Climate skeptic group works to reverse renewable energy mandates". Washington Post. 
^ Gillis, Justin; Kaufman, Leslie (15 February 2012). "Leak Offers Glimpse of Campaign Against Climate Science". The New York Times. 
^ "The Heartland Institute 2012 Fundraising Plan" (PDF). The Heartland Institute. 15 January 2012. 
^ a b c Glassman, James. "Market-Based Man". Philanthropy Magazine. Philanthropy Roundtable. Retrieved 16 March 2012. 
^ a b c d Jane Mayer (August 30, 2010). "Covert Operations: The billionaire brothers who are waging a war against Obama". The New Yorker. Retrieved January 5, 2012. 
^ Brian Doherty (2008). Radicals for Capitalism: A Freewheeling History of the Modern American Libertarian Movement. PublicAffairs. p. 410. ISBN 1-58648-572-5. One longtime Koch lieutenant characterized the overall strategy of Koch's libertarian funding over the years with both a theatrical metaphor and an Austrian capital theory one: Politicians, ultimately, are just actors playing out a script. The idea is, one gets better and quicker results aiming not at the actors but at the scriptwriters, to help supply the themes and words for the scripts—to try to influence the areas where policy ideas percolate from: academia and think tanks. Ideas, then, are the capital goods that go into building policy as a finished product—and there are insufficient libertarian capital goods at the top of the structure of production to build the policies libertarians demand. 
^ "Charles G. Koch Summer Fellow Program". Institute for Humane Studies at George Mason University. Retrieved 2010-09-10. The Charles G. Koch Summer Fellow Program combines a paid public policy internship with two career skills seminars and weekly policy lectures. You’ll gain real-world experience, take a crash course in market-based policy analysis, and hone your professional skills. The intensive ten-week program begins in June and includes a $1,500 stipend and a housing allowance. 
^ a b "About Charles G. Koch". Charles G. Koch Foundation. February 2009. 
^ "Bill of Rights Institute". Media Matters for America. 
^ "Youth Entrepreneurs Kansas". Charles G. Koch Foundation. 
^ BEST donors, accessed 3/25/11
^ "Charles Koch Arena". Wichita State University. Retrieved 22 May 2013. 
^ Wenzl, Roy (December 16, 2014). "Koch gives $11.25 million to Wichita State". The Wichita Eagle. Retrieved April 3, 2015. 
^ Suellentrop, Paul (April 2, 2015). "Wichita State, community work together to keep Gregg Marshall". The Wichita Eagle. Retrieved April 3, 2015. 
^ "Winner of the 2011 William E. Simon Prize". philanthropyroundtable.org. 
^ "2011 William E. Simon Prize". Philanthropy Roundtable. Philanthropy Roundtable. Retrieved 29 April 2011. 
^ Nelson, Colleen Mccain; Fields, Gary (Jul 16, 2015). "Obama, Koch Brothers in Unlikely Alliance to Overhaul Criminal Justice". Wall Street Journal. 
^ a b c Horwitz, Sari (Aug 15, 2015). "Unlikely Allies". Washington Post. 
^ Hudetz, Mary (Oct 15, 2015). "Forfeiture reform aligns likes of billionaire Charles Koch, ACLU". The Topeka Capital Journal. 
^ "Koch brothers join Obama in advocating US prison reform". Russian Today. Jul 17, 2015. 
^ Koch, Charles G. (February 18, 2016). "Charles Koch: This is the one issue where Bernie Sanders is right". The Washington Post. Retrieved February 19, 2016. 
^ "About Charles G. Koch". Charles G. Koch Charitable Foundation. Retrieved 19 December 2010. 
^ "Donor aims to 'lick' illness that he has battled for 15 years". The Chronicle of Philanthropy. Retrieved 16 October 2011. 
^ Robinson, Peter (April 14, 2016). "Good Profit Part I". Uncomomn Knowledge. Hoover Institution. Video Interview, recorded March 18, 2016 
^ Levinthal, Dave. "Spreading the Free-Market Gospel". The Atlantic. Retrieved 2017-03-09. 
^ "Honorary Degree Recipients and Degrees Conferred Honoris Causa" (PDF). Washburn. 
^ Ball, Molly (Mar 3, 2015). "Do the Koch Brothers Really Care About Criminal-Justice Reform?". The Atlantic. 
^ "May 2013 ExecRank Top CEOs". 


External links[edit]

Profile at Koch Industries
Charles G. Koch Charitable Foundation
Profile at Philanthropy Roundtable
Names in the News: David and Charles Koch at FollowTheMoney.org
Political contributions from Influence Explorer at the Sunlight Foundation
Charles Koch at Bloomberg L.P.
Robinson, Peter (April 29, 2016). "Good Profit Part II". Uncommon Knowledge. Hoover Institution. Video Interview, recorded March 18, 2016 
Charles G. Koch at Goodreads







v
t
e


Koch family



Parents



Fred C. Koch: 1900–1967





Children



Frederick R. Koch: 1933
Charles Koch: 1935
David Koch: 1940
William Koch: 1940





Other



Harry Koch: 1867–1942





Major companies



Koch Industries





Other organizations



Koch family foundations
Charles Koch Institute
Citizens for a Sound Economy
Americans for Prosperity
David H. Koch Institute for Integrative Cancer Research
Bill of Rights Institute
Cato Institute





See also



Political activities of the Koch brothers
Mary R. Koch (ship)
The Science of Success (book)
Mercatus Center
Charles Koch Arena
David H. Koch Theater












v
t
e


Koch Industries



Invista



Antron
Comforel
Coolmax
Cordura
Dacron
Lycra
Polarguard
SolarMax
Stainmaster
Tactel
Thermolite





Georgia-Pacific



Angel Soft
Brawny
Colhogar
Delica
Demak'Up
DensArmor Plus
Dixie
KittenSoft
Lotus
Mardi Gras
Moltonel
Okay
Plytanium
Quilted Northern
Soft 'n Gentle
Sparkle
Tenderly
ToughRock
Tutto
Vanity Fair
Zee





Other units



ABKO Properties
Flint Hills Resources
Koch Chemical Technology Group
Koch Fertilizer
Koch Minerals
KochPAC
Koch Pipeline Company
Koch Supply & Trading
Matador Cattle Company
Molex





Key people



Charles Koch
David Koch
Richard Fink
Kevin Gentry












v
t
e


The World's Billionaires – Top ten richest people in the world as of 20 April 2017






 Bill Gates ($86.0B, United States)
 Warren Buffett ($75.6B, United States)
 Jeff Bezos ($72.8B, United States)
 Amancio Ortega ($71.3B, Spain)
 Mark Zuckerberg ($56.0B, United States)
 Carlos Slim ($54.5B, Mexico)
 Larry Ellison ($52.2B, United States)
 Charles Koch ($48.3B, United States)
 David Koch ($48.3B, United States)
 Michael Bloomberg ($47.5B, United States)












v
t
e


Wealthiest people in the United States by state







AL
Jimmy Rane


AK
Leonard Hyde and Jonathan Rubini


AZ
Bruce Halle


AR
Jim Walton


CA
Mark Zuckerberg


CO
Charlie Ergen


CT
Ray Dalio


DE
Robert W. Gore and Elizabeth Snyder


FL
Thomas Peterffy


GA
Jim Kennedy


HI
Pierre Omidyar


ID
Frank L. VanderSloot


IL
Kenneth C. Griffin


IN
Carl Cook


IA
Harry Stine


KS
Charles Koch


KY
B. Wayne Hughes


LA
Tom Benson


ME
Bill and Susan Alfond


MD
Ted Lerner


MA
Abigail Johnson


MI
Dan Gilbert


MN
Whitney MacMillan


MS
Leslie Lampton


MO
Stan Kroenke


MT
Dennis Washington


NE
Warren Buffett


NV
Sheldon Adelson


NH
Andrea Reimann-Ciardelli


NJ
Donald Newhouse


NM
Mack C. Chase


NY
Michael Bloomberg


NC
James Goodnight


ND
Gary Tharaldson


OH
Les Wexner


OK
Harold Hamm


OR
Phil Knight


PA
Mary Alice Dorrance Malone


RI
Jonathan M. Nelson


SC
Anita Zucker


SD
T. Denny Sanford


TN
Thomas F. Frist Jr.


TX
Alice Walton


UT
Gail Miller


VT
John Abele


VA
Jacqueline Mars


WA
Bill Gates


WV
Jim Justice


WI
John Menard Jr.


WY
John Mars










Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 36349742
LCCN: n2006075374
ISNI: 0000 0001 1489 9756
GND: 136727751










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Charles_Koch&oldid=791155318"					
Categories: 1935 birthsLiving people20th-century American businesspeople21st-century American businesspeopleAmerican billionairesAmerican businesspeople in the oil industryAmerican chief executives of energy companiesAmerican chief executives of manufacturing companiesAmerican libertariansAmerican people of Dutch descentAmerican people of German descentAmerican philanthropistsBusinesspeople from KansasCato Institute peopleKansas RepublicansKoch familyMassachusetts Institute of Technology alumniMont Pelerin Society membersNon-interventionismPeople from Indian Wells, CaliforniaPeople from Wichita, KansasTea Party movement activistsHidden categories: Use American English from February 2016All Wikipedia articles written in American EnglishUse mdy dates from February 2016Articles with hCardsNo local image but image on WikidataArticles containing potentially dated statements from 2014All articles containing potentially dated statementsBLP articles lacking sources from June 2014All BLP articles lacking sourcesWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةবাংলাDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisՀայերենBahasa IndonesiaItalianoمازِرونیမြန်မာဘာသာOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаPortuguêsРусскийSimple EnglishSuomiSvenska 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 18 July 2017, at 13:49.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Charles Koch - Wikipedia





















 






Charles Koch

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Charles Koch


Born
Charles de Ganahl Koch
(1935-11-01) November 1, 1935 (age 81)
Wichita, Kansas, U.S.


Residence
Indian Wells, California, U.S.


Alma mater
Massachusetts Institute of Technology


Occupation
Chairman and CEO of Koch Industries


Net worth
$48.7 billion (February 2017)[1]


Political party
Republican


Spouse(s)
Liz Koch (m. 1972)


Children



Chase Koch[2]
Elizabeth Koch[3]





Parent(s)



Fred C. Koch
Mary Robinson





Relatives

Siblings:



Frederick R. Koch
David Koch
Bill Koch







Charles de Ganahl Koch (/ˈkoʊk/; born November 1, 1935) is an American businessman, political donor and philanthropist. He is co-owner, chairman of the board, and chief executive officer of Koch Industries, while his brother David Koch serves as Executive Vice President. Charles and David each own 42% of the conglomerate. The brothers inherited the business from their father, Fred C. Koch, then expanded the business.[4] Originally involved exclusively in oil refining and chemicals, Koch Industries now includes process and pollution control equipment and technologies; polymers and fibers; minerals; fertilizers; commodity trading and services; forest and consumer products; and ranching. The businesses produce a wide variety of well-known brands, such as Stainmaster carpet, the Lycra brand of spandex fiber, Quilted Northern tissue and Dixie Cup.
Koch Industries is the second-largest privately held company by revenue in the United States according to a 2010 Forbes survey.[5] In February 2014, Koch was ranked 9th richest person in the world by Hurun Report[6] with an estimated net worth of $36 billion. Previously, in October 2012 he was ranked the 6th richest person in the world with an estimated net worth of $34 billion—according to the Bloomberg Billionaires Index[7]—and was ranked 18th on Forbes World's Billionaires list of 2011 (and 4th on the Forbes 400), with an estimated net worth of $25 billion, deriving from his 42% stake in Koch Industries.[8] Koch has published three books detailing his business philosophy, The Science of Success,[9] Market Based Management,[10] and Good Profit.[11]
Koch supports a number of free market-oriented educational organizations, including the Institute for Humane Studies, the Ayn Rand Institute, and the Mercatus Center at George Mason University. He also contributes to the Republican Party and candidates, libertarian groups, and various charitable and cultural institutions. He co-founded the Washington, DC-based Cato Institute. Through the Koch Cultural Trust, founded by Charles Koch's wife, Elizabeth, the Koch family has also funded artistic projects and creative artists.[12]



Contents


1 Early life, education, and career
2 Political and economic views

2.1 Market-based management


3 Philanthropic and political activities
4 Personal life
5 Awards
6 See also
7 References
8 External links



Early life, education, and career[edit]
Koch was born and lives in Wichita, Kansas, one of four sons of Clementine Mary (née Robinson) and Fred Chase Koch.[13][14] Koch's grandfather, Harry Koch, was a Dutch immigrant who settled in West Texas, founded the Quanah Tribune-Chief newspaper, and was a founding shareholder of Quanah, Acme and Pacific Railway.[15] Among his maternal great-great-grandparents were William Ingraham Kip, an Episcopalian bishop, William Burnet Kinney, a politician, and Elizabeth Clementine Stedman, a writer.
In an interview with Warren Cassell Jr., which was recorded in February 2016, Koch explained that as a child he did not live a privileged lifestyle despite growing up in a wealthy family. Koch said, "My father wanted me to work as if I was the poorest person in the world."[16] Koch was educated at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology. He is a member of the Beta Theta Pi fraternity. He received a Bachelor of Science (B.S.) in General Engineering in 1957, a Master of Science (M.S.) in Nuclear Engineering in 1958, and a second M.S. in Chemical Engineering in 1960.[13] After college, Koch started work at Arthur D. Little, Inc. In 1961 he moved back to Wichita to join his father's business, Rock Island Oil & Refining Company.[17] In 1967 he became president of the business, which was then a medium-sized oil firm.[18] In the same year, he renamed the firm Koch Industries in honor of his father.[19] In 2006, Koch Industries generated $90 billion in revenue, a growth of 2000 times over, which represents an annual compounded return of 18%.[20] As of 2014[update], Koch was worth approximately $41.3[21] billion (in 2013 $36 billion) according to the Forbes 400 list.[13]
Koch has been a director of Entrust Financial Corp. since 1982 and director of Koch Industries Inc. since 1982. He is director of resin and fiber company Invista and director of Georgia-Pacific LLC, paper and pulp products. Koch founded or helped found several organizations, including the Cato Institute, the Institute for Humane Studies and the Mercatus Center at George Mason University, the Bill of Rights Institute, and the Market-Based Management Institute. He is a member of the Mont Pelerin Society.[22]
Political and economic views[edit]
Charles Koch is a classical liberal and has formerly identified as a libertarian.[23] He is opposed to corporate welfare[24] and told the National Journal that his "overall concept is to minimize the role of government and to maximize the role of private economy and to maximize personal freedoms."[25] He has expressed concern for too much government regulation in the U.S., stating that "we could be facing the greatest loss of liberty and prosperity since the 1930s."[26] In addition, he has warned that drastic government overspending and a decline of the free enterprise system will prove detrimental to long-term social and economic prosperity.[27]
Influences on Koch include Alexis de Tocqueville,[28] Adam Smith, Michael Polanyi,[17] Joseph Schumpeter, Julian Simon, Paul Johnson, Thomas Sowell, Charles Murray, Leonard Read, and F.A. Harper.[18] The presidents he most admires include George Washington, Grover Cleveland, and Calvin Coolidge. In an interview with the American Journal of Business, Koch said he owes "a huge debt of gratitude to the giants who created the Austrian School [of economics]. They developed principles that enabled me to gain an understanding of how the world works, and these ideas were a catalyst in the development of Market-Based Management." In particular, he expresses admiration for Ludwig von Mises’ book Human Action, as well as the writings of Friedrich Hayek.[17] Koch said "the short-term infatuation with quarterly earnings on Wall Street restricts the earnings potential of Fortune 500 publicly traded firms."[18] He also considers public firms to be "feeding grounds for lawyers and lawsuits," with regulations like Sarbanes–Oxley only increasing the earnings potential of privately held companies.[18]
Koch disdains "big government" and the "political class."[18] He believes billionaires Warren Buffett and George Soros, who fund organizations with different ideologies, "simply haven't been sufficiently exposed to the ideas of liberty."[18] Koch thinks "prosperity is under attack" by the Obama administration and "warns of policies that threaten to erode our economic freedom and transfer vast sums of money to the state."[29]
In an April 2011 Wall Street Journal op-ed, Koch wrote:

Government spending on business only aggravates the problem. Too many businesses have successfully lobbied for special favors and treatment by seeking mandates for their products, subsidies (in the form of cash payments from the government), and regulations and tariffs to keep more efficient competitors at bay. Crony capitalism is much easier than competing in an open market. But it erodes our overall standard of living and stifles entrepreneurs by rewarding the politically favored rather than those who provide what consumers want.[30]

His opposition to corporate welfare includes lobbying for the end to ethanol subsidies despite the fact that Koch Industries is a major ethanol producer. He is quoted as saying: “The first thing we’ve got to get rid of is business welfare and entitlements.”[31] Regarding government regulation, Koch has written that he expects his employees to cooperate fully with the law, regardless of personal views:

We needed to be uncompromising [with our workforce], to expect 100 percent of our employees to comply 100 percent of the time with complex and ever-changing government mandates. Striving to comply with every law does not mean agreeing with every law. But, even when faced with laws we think are counter-productive, we must first comply. Only then, from a credible position, can we enter into a dialogue with regulatory agencies to demonstrate alternatives that are more beneficial. If these efforts fail, we can then join with others in using education and/or political efforts to change the law.[32]

In an April 2014 Wall Street Journal op-ed, Koch wrote, "the fundamental concepts of dignity, respect, equality before the law and personal freedom are under attack by the nation's own government." He criticized the Obama Administration, saying that its "central belief and fatal conceit" is that people are not capable of running their own lives. "This is the essence of big government and collectivism," he wrote. He cited the "current health care debacle" as an example of disastrous government control. He complained that he had been the victim of "character assassination."[33][34]
In an November 2015 joint interview with his brother, David, on MSNBC's Morning Joe Koch, who supports a non-interventionist foreign policy,[35] criticized America's current foreign policy calling it a "form of insanity."[36]
Market-based management[edit]
Koch's business philosophy, "market-based management" (MBM), is described in his 2007 book The Science of Success. In an interview with the Wichita Eagle,[19] he said that he was motivated to write the book by Koch Industries' 2004 acquisition of Invista so he could give new employees a "comprehensive picture" of MBM. According to the website of the Market-Based Management Institute, which Koch founded in 2005, MBM is "based on rules of just conduct, economic thinking, and sound mental models", harnessing the dispersed knowledge of employees just as markets harness knowledge in society. "It is organized in and interpreted through five dimensions: vision, virtue and talents, decision rights, incentives, and knowledge processes."[37] In the book, Koch attempts to apply F. A. Hayek's spontaneous order theory and Austrian entrepreneurial theory, such as that of Mises and Israel Kirzner, to organizational management.[31][38] T. Boone Pickens argues that Koch's business success lends credibility to the book's concept.[38]
Philanthropic and political activities[edit]
See also: Political activities of the Koch brothers
Koch funds and supports libertarian and free-enterprise policy and advocacy organizations.[29] In 1977 he co-founded, with Edward H. Crane and Murray Rothbard, the Cato Institute.[39] He is a board member at the Mercatus Center, a market-oriented research think tank at George Mason University.[40]
In 2008, Koch was included in Businessweek's list of top 50 American givers. Between 2004 and 2008, Koch gave $246 million, focusing on "libertarian causes, giving money for academic and public policy research and social welfare."[41] Koch was awarded an Honorary Doctorate from George Mason University in recognition of his financial support "through scholarships, faculty recruitment, and research grants".[42] A leaked 2012 fundraising plan indicated that the Charles G. Koch Charitable Foundation contributed $25,000 in 2011 to The Heartland Institute, an American conservative and libertarian public policy think tank.[43][44][45]
Koch's philanthropic activities have focused on research, policy, and educational projects intended to advance free-market views. He has underwritten scholarships and financed the research of economists such as James Buchanan and Friedrich Hayek. He has also “supported efforts to inspire at-risk young people to consider entrepreneurship, to teach American students the principles of limited government, and to connect recent graduates with market-oriented organizations, in an effort to launch their careers in public policy.”[46]
Two works that have been especially influential upon Koch's philosophy are Ludwig Von Mises' Human Action and F. A. Harper's Why Wages Rise. After reading Harper's book, Koch became involved with Harper's Institute for Humane Studies, of which he became a principal supporter. He has been on the board of IHS since 1966. Since the 1980s, IHS has been increasingly interested in aiding the careers of aspiring educators, journalists, and policy professionals with an interest in classical liberal thought. Among other projects, the IHS runs the Charles G. Koch Summer Fellow Program, which “has supported more than 900 students during eight-week internships at public policy organizations, both in D.C. and around the country.”[46] In addition, almost 200 institutions of higher education in the U.S. are funded by the Charles Koch Foundation. What all the Koch-funded programs have in common is an interest in studying free societies with an eye to understanding how economic freedom benefits humanity.[46]
Through the Koch Cultural Trust, founded by Charles Koch's wife, Elizabeth, the Koch family has provided financial support to promising artists in a variety of fields. More than $1.7 million in grants have been awarded to programs and individuals with Kansas roots.[12]
Koch supported his brother's candidacy for vice president on the Libertarian Party ticket in 1980.[47] After the bid, Koch told a reporter that conventional politics "tends to be a nasty, corrupting business ... I’m interested in advancing libertarian ideas".[47] In addition to funding think tanks, Charles and David also support libertarian academics[48] and Koch funds the Charles G. Koch Summer Fellow Program through the Institute for Humane Studies which recruits and mentors young libertarians.[49] Koch also organizes twice yearly meetings[18] of Republican donors.[29]
Charles Koch looks favorably upon the Tea Party movement. "The way it's grown, the passion, and the intensity, was beyond what I had anticipated," he told an interviewer.[27] He's funded groups opposed to Barack Obama's administration.[47]
Koch has given money to support public policy research focused on "developing voluntary, market-based solutions to social problems."[50] He has given to the Bill of Rights Institute, a non-profit group that educates teachers, students, and others about the Bill of Rights.[50][51] He has also given to the Youth Entrepreneurs Kansas, an organization that teaches business skills to at-risk youth in Kansas schools.[52] Koch has also supported the Berkeley Earth Surface Temperature project, a scientific effort to compile an open database of the Earth's surface temperature records.[53]
In 2002, Koch Industries donated $6 million to renovate the Wichita State University basketball arena. The gift was given in honor of Koch, and the arena was subsequently renamed the Charles Koch Arena.[54] Koch has continued to be a major donor to both the university and its athletic program. In December 2014, Koch Industries and the Koch family foundation donated $11.25 million to the university, the largest one-time gift in school history, with $4.5 million of that going toward a plan to renovate the arena and expand the athletic program's academic support center.[55] Several months later, when men's basketball head coach Gregg Marshall was considering an offer to become head coach at the University of Alabama, Koch led a group of local business leaders and WSU boosters that raised Marshall's annual salary from $1.85 million to $3 million and kept him at the school. The raise was seen as an unprecedented move for a school outside the Power Five conferences, and likely to make Marshall among the 10 highest-paid college basketball coaches.[56]
In 2011, Koch was awarded the William E. Simon Prize for Philanthropic Leadership.[57] The award honors "the ideals and principles which guided William E. Simon's giving, including personal responsibility, resourcefulness, volunteerism, scholarship, individual freedom, faith in God, and helping people to help themselves."[58]
In July 2015 Charles Koch and his brother were praised by President Obama and Anthony Van Jones for their bipartisan efforts to reform the criminal justice system.[59][60] For roughly a decade Koch has been advocating for several reforms within the prison system, including the reduction of recidivist criminals, easing the employment process for rehabilitated persons, and the defense of private property from Asset forfeiture.[60][61] Aligning with groups such as the ACLU, the Center for American Progress, Families Against Mandatory Minimums, the Coalition for Public Safety, and the MacArthur Foundation, Koch believes the current system has unfairly targeted low-income and minority communities all while wasting substantial government resources.[60][62]
In February 2016, Koch penned an opinion piece in The Washington Post, where he said he agreed with presidential candidate Bernie Sanders about the unfairness of corporate welfare and mass incarceration in the United States.[63]
Personal life[edit]
Koch has been married to his wife Liz since 1972[64] and has two children, Chase Koch and Elizabeth Koch.[47] Charles and his three brothers have all suffered from prostate cancer.[65] Koch "rarely grants media interviews and prefers to keep a low profile".[19] TIME magazine included Charles and David Koch among the most influential people of 2011. According to the magazine, the list includes "activists, reformers and researchers, heads of state and captains of industry." The article describes the brothers' commitment to free-market principles, the growth and development of their business, and their support for liberty-minded organizations and political candidates.[4] He now lives in Indian Wells, California.[66]
Awards[edit]





This section of a biography of a living person needs additional citations for verification. Please help by adding reliable sources. Contentious material about living persons that is unsourced or poorly sourced must be removed immediately, especially if potentially libelous or harmful. (June 2014) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Koch has received various awards and honors, including:

Honorary Doctor of Science, from George Mason University, for his continued support of the economics program at GMU[67]
Honorary Doctor of Commerce from Washburn University[68]
Honorary Doctor of Laws from Babson College
President's Medal from Wichita State University in 2004
The Adam Smith Award from the American Legislative Exchange Council
The 1999 Directors' Award for Global Vision in Energy from the New York Mercantile Exchange
The 1999 Governor's Arts Patrons Award from the Kansas Arts Commission
The 2000 National Distinguished Service Award from The Tax Foundation
The Spirit of Justice Award from The Heritage Foundation
The Entrepreneurial Leadership Award from the National Foundation for Teaching Entrepreneurship
The Brotherhood/Sisterhood Award from the National Conference of Christians and Jews
The Distinguished Citizen Award from the Boy Scouts of America
The Free Enterprise Award from The Council for National Policy
The Herman W. Lay Memorial Award from the Association of Private Enterprise Education
The Distinguished Service Citation from the University of Kansas
Honorary Life Member in the Washburn Law School Association
The Distinguished Citizen Award from Kansas State University
Induction into the Kansas Oil and Gas Hall of Fame
Induction into the Wichita and Kansas Business Halls of Fame
Spirit of Excellence Award from The Urban League of Wichita
Outstanding Humanitarian Award from the Greater Wichita Chapter of the National Society of Fundraising Executives
Wichita City Medallion
Wichita State University Entrepreneur in Residence
Wichita District Minority Small Business Advocate of the Year
The Individual Recognition Award from the Wichita/Sedgwick County Arts and Humanities Council
The Uncommon Citizen Award from the Wichita Chamber of Commerce
The 2011 William E. Simon Prize for Philanthropic Leadership from the Philanthropy Roundtable
The 2011 Defender of Justice award from the National Association of Criminal Defense Lawyers[69]
In 2012, ExecReps ranked him number two on their Top Chief Executive List[70]

See also[edit]

Charles Koch Arena
Charles Koch Institute
Charles G. Koch Charitable Foundation
List of billionaires

References[edit]


^ "Charles Koch profile". Forbes. Retrieved 23 February 2017. 
^ Mr. Big Forbes.com. Retrieved November 2011.
^ "Koch, Charles (1935)". New Netherland Project. 
^ a b Ferguson, Andrew (21 April 2011). "The 2011 TIME 100". TIME. Retrieved 22 April 2011. 
^ The Top 10, America's Largest Private Companies Forbes.com. Retrieved April 2011.
^ [1] Hurun Report Global Rich List 2014
^ "Bloomberg". Bloomberg LP. Retrieved October 31, 2012. 
^ "'Charles Koch', Forbes profiles". 
^ Charles G. Koch (2007). The Science Of Success ISBN 9780470139882 Retrieved April 2011.
^ 2006, ISBN 9781931721998
^ "Charles Koch's New Book Out Tuesday" Biz Journals, Wichita, October 12, 2015. (ISBN 9780147520470)
^ a b "History". Koch Cultural Trust. Retrieved 3 April 2012. 
^ a b c "The 400 Richest Americans". Forbes. Massachusetts Institute of Technology, Bachelor of Arts / Science Massachusetts Institute of Technology, Master of Science Son of Koch Industries founder Fred C. Koch (d. 1967), MIT grad who invented method of refining gasoline from heavy oil. Took refining innovation to Soviet Union 1929; returned home 1930s. Sons Frederick, Charles, David and William inherited Koch Industries after father's death; Charles and David bought out William and Frederick for $1.3 billion in 1983. 
^ "FMK Foundation History". Fmkfoundation.org. Retrieved 2010-08-29. 
^ Daniel Fisher (26 February 2007). "Koch's Laws". Forbes. Retrieved 16 November 2010. 
^ "Interview with Charles Koch". Warren Cassell Jr. 
^ a b c "Twenty Questions for Charles Koch". American Journal of Business. Muncie. 24 (1): 15–8. Spring 2009. 
^ a b c d e f g Stephen Moore (May 6, 2006). "The Weekend Interview with Charles Koch: Private Enterprise". The Wall Street Journal. p. A.8. 
^ a b c Phyllis Jacobs Griekspoor (4 March 2007). "Charles Koch: His philosophy and his company". Wichita Eagle. 
^ Mark Skousen (4 March 2007). "Business Bookshelf: A Short Course In Long-Term Value". The Wall Street Journal. p. D.8. 
^ Carrie Sheffield. "Charles Koch". Forbes. 
^ Koch's bio at the Mercatus Center
^ "Charles Koch opens up about his 'classical liberal' views". Fox News. 15 October 2015. Retrieved 27 December 2015. 
^ The Koch Brothers December 24, 2012 p. 96 Forbes
^ National Journal (May 16, 1992)
^ The Top 10 Forbes Asia October 19, 2009.
^ a b Continetti, Matthew (April 4, 2011). "The Paranoid Style in Liberal Politics". The Weekly Standard. 
^ Koch, Charles, The Science of Success, p. 57
^ a b c Kate Zernike (25 October 2010). "Secretive Republican Donors Are Planning Ahead". The New York Times. 
^ Koch, Charles (March 1, 2011). "Why Koch Industries Is Speaking Out". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ a b Daniel Fisher (December 5, 2012). "Inside The Koch Empire: How The Brothers Plan To Reshape America". Forbes. 
^ Koch, Charles, The Science of Success, p. 45.
^ Koch, Charles (April 3, 2014). "Charles Koch: I'm Fighting to Restore a Free Society". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ Kopan, Tal (April 3, 2014). "Charles Koch calls critics ‘collectivists’". Politico. 
^ "Koch Brothers Question Wisdom of U.S. Interventionism". November 5, 2015. 
^ "Charles Koch: American Foreign Policy a 'Form of Insanity'". 
^ What is MBM? www.mbminstitute.org. Retrieved April 2011.
^ a b Schor, Elana (16 May 2011). "In Right's Energy-Subsidy Clash, Shades of Koch vs. Pickens". New York Times. New York Times. Retrieved 19 May 2011. 
^ "25 Years at Cato" (PDF). Retrieved 2009-07-10. 
^ "Board of Directors – Mercatus". Mercatus Center at George Mason University. Retrieved 23 January 2014. 
^ "The 50 Top American Givers". Bloomberg Businessweek. Retrieved 27 April 2011. 
^ Charles Koch receives honorary degree from George Mason University www.kochind.com. Retrieved April 2011.
^ "Climate skeptic group works to reverse renewable energy mandates". Washington Post. 
^ Gillis, Justin; Kaufman, Leslie (15 February 2012). "Leak Offers Glimpse of Campaign Against Climate Science". The New York Times. 
^ "The Heartland Institute 2012 Fundraising Plan" (PDF). The Heartland Institute. 15 January 2012. 
^ a b c Glassman, James. "Market-Based Man". Philanthropy Magazine. Philanthropy Roundtable. Retrieved 16 March 2012. 
^ a b c d Jane Mayer (August 30, 2010). "Covert Operations: The billionaire brothers who are waging a war against Obama". The New Yorker. Retrieved January 5, 2012. 
^ Brian Doherty (2008). Radicals for Capitalism: A Freewheeling History of the Modern American Libertarian Movement. PublicAffairs. p. 410. ISBN 1-58648-572-5. One longtime Koch lieutenant characterized the overall strategy of Koch's libertarian funding over the years with both a theatrical metaphor and an Austrian capital theory one: Politicians, ultimately, are just actors playing out a script. The idea is, one gets better and quicker results aiming not at the actors but at the scriptwriters, to help supply the themes and words for the scripts—to try to influence the areas where policy ideas percolate from: academia and think tanks. Ideas, then, are the capital goods that go into building policy as a finished product—and there are insufficient libertarian capital goods at the top of the structure of production to build the policies libertarians demand. 
^ "Charles G. Koch Summer Fellow Program". Institute for Humane Studies at George Mason University. Retrieved 2010-09-10. The Charles G. Koch Summer Fellow Program combines a paid public policy internship with two career skills seminars and weekly policy lectures. You’ll gain real-world experience, take a crash course in market-based policy analysis, and hone your professional skills. The intensive ten-week program begins in June and includes a $1,500 stipend and a housing allowance. 
^ a b "About Charles G. Koch". Charles G. Koch Foundation. February 2009. 
^ "Bill of Rights Institute". Media Matters for America. 
^ "Youth Entrepreneurs Kansas". Charles G. Koch Foundation. 
^ BEST donors, accessed 3/25/11
^ "Charles Koch Arena". Wichita State University. Retrieved 22 May 2013. 
^ Wenzl, Roy (December 16, 2014). "Koch gives $11.25 million to Wichita State". The Wichita Eagle. Retrieved April 3, 2015. 
^ Suellentrop, Paul (April 2, 2015). "Wichita State, community work together to keep Gregg Marshall". The Wichita Eagle. Retrieved April 3, 2015. 
^ "Winner of the 2011 William E. Simon Prize". philanthropyroundtable.org. 
^ "2011 William E. Simon Prize". Philanthropy Roundtable. Philanthropy Roundtable. Retrieved 29 April 2011. 
^ Nelson, Colleen Mccain; Fields, Gary (Jul 16, 2015). "Obama, Koch Brothers in Unlikely Alliance to Overhaul Criminal Justice". Wall Street Journal. 
^ a b c Horwitz, Sari (Aug 15, 2015). "Unlikely Allies". Washington Post. 
^ Hudetz, Mary (Oct 15, 2015). "Forfeiture reform aligns likes of billionaire Charles Koch, ACLU". The Topeka Capital Journal. 
^ "Koch brothers join Obama in advocating US prison reform". Russian Today. Jul 17, 2015. 
^ Koch, Charles G. (February 18, 2016). "Charles Koch: This is the one issue where Bernie Sanders is right". The Washington Post. Retrieved February 19, 2016. 
^ "About Charles G. Koch". Charles G. Koch Charitable Foundation. Retrieved 19 December 2010. 
^ "Donor aims to 'lick' illness that he has battled for 15 years". The Chronicle of Philanthropy. Retrieved 16 October 2011. 
^ Robinson, Peter (April 14, 2016). "Good Profit Part I". Uncomomn Knowledge. Hoover Institution. Video Interview, recorded March 18, 2016 
^ Levinthal, Dave. "Spreading the Free-Market Gospel". The Atlantic. Retrieved 2017-03-09. 
^ "Honorary Degree Recipients and Degrees Conferred Honoris Causa" (PDF). Washburn. 
^ Ball, Molly (Mar 3, 2015). "Do the Koch Brothers Really Care About Criminal-Justice Reform?". The Atlantic. 
^ "May 2013 ExecRank Top CEOs". 


External links[edit]

Profile at Koch Industries
Charles G. Koch Charitable Foundation
Profile at Philanthropy Roundtable
Names in the News: David and Charles Koch at FollowTheMoney.org
Political contributions from Influence Explorer at the Sunlight Foundation
Charles Koch at Bloomberg L.P.
Robinson, Peter (April 29, 2016). "Good Profit Part II". Uncommon Knowledge. Hoover Institution. Video Interview, recorded March 18, 2016 
Charles G. Koch at Goodreads







v
t
e


Koch family



Parents



Fred C. Koch: 1900–1967





Children



Frederick R. Koch: 1933
Charles Koch: 1935
David Koch: 1940
William Koch: 1940





Other



Harry Koch: 1867–1942





Major companies



Koch Industries





Other organizations



Koch family foundations
Charles Koch Institute
Citizens for a Sound Economy
Americans for Prosperity
David H. Koch Institute for Integrative Cancer Research
Bill of Rights Institute
Cato Institute





See also



Political activities of the Koch brothers
Mary R. Koch (ship)
The Science of Success (book)
Mercatus Center
Charles Koch Arena
David H. Koch Theater












v
t
e


Koch Industries



Invista



Antron
Comforel
Coolmax
Cordura
Dacron
Lycra
Polarguard
SolarMax
Stainmaster
Tactel
Thermolite





Georgia-Pacific



Angel Soft
Brawny
Colhogar
Delica
Demak'Up
DensArmor Plus
Dixie
KittenSoft
Lotus
Mardi Gras
Moltonel
Okay
Plytanium
Quilted Northern
Soft 'n Gentle
Sparkle
Tenderly
ToughRock
Tutto
Vanity Fair
Zee





Other units



ABKO Properties
Flint Hills Resources
Koch Chemical Technology Group
Koch Fertilizer
Koch Minerals
KochPAC
Koch Pipeline Company
Koch Supply & Trading
Matador Cattle Company
Molex





Key people



Charles Koch
David Koch
Richard Fink
Kevin Gentry












v
t
e


The World's Billionaires – Top ten richest people in the world as of 20 April 2017






 Bill Gates ($86.0B, United States)
 Warren Buffett ($75.6B, United States)
 Jeff Bezos ($72.8B, United States)
 Amancio Ortega ($71.3B, Spain)
 Mark Zuckerberg ($56.0B, United States)
 Carlos Slim ($54.5B, Mexico)
 Larry Ellison ($52.2B, United States)
 Charles Koch ($48.3B, United States)
 David Koch ($48.3B, United States)
 Michael Bloomberg ($47.5B, United States)












v
t
e


Wealthiest people in the United States by state







AL
Jimmy Rane


AK
Leonard Hyde and Jonathan Rubini


AZ
Bruce Halle


AR
Jim Walton


CA
Mark Zuckerberg


CO
Charlie Ergen


CT
Ray Dalio


DE
Robert W. Gore and Elizabeth Snyder


FL
Thomas Peterffy


GA
Jim Kennedy


HI
Pierre Omidyar


ID
Frank L. VanderSloot


IL
Kenneth C. Griffin


IN
Carl Cook


IA
Harry Stine


KS
Charles Koch


KY
B. Wayne Hughes


LA
Tom Benson


ME
Bill and Susan Alfond


MD
Ted Lerner


MA
Abigail Johnson


MI
Dan Gilbert


MN
Whitney MacMillan


MS
Leslie Lampton


MO
Stan Kroenke


MT
Dennis Washington


NE
Warren Buffett


NV
Sheldon Adelson


NH
Andrea Reimann-Ciardelli


NJ
Donald Newhouse


NM
Mack C. Chase


NY
Michael Bloomberg


NC
James Goodnight


ND
Gary Tharaldson


OH
Les Wexner


OK
Harold Hamm


OR
Phil Knight


PA
Mary Alice Dorrance Malone


RI
Jonathan M. Nelson


SC
Anita Zucker


SD
T. Denny Sanford


TN
Thomas F. Frist Jr.


TX
Alice Walton


UT
Gail Miller


VT
John Abele


VA
Jacqueline Mars


WA
Bill Gates


WV
Jim Justice


WI
John Menard Jr.


WY
John Mars










Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 36349742
LCCN: n2006075374
ISNI: 0000 0001 1489 9756
GND: 136727751










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Charles_Koch&oldid=791155318"					
Categories: 1935 birthsLiving people20th-century American businesspeople21st-century American businesspeopleAmerican billionairesAmerican businesspeople in the oil industryAmerican chief executives of energy companiesAmerican chief executives of manufacturing companiesAmerican libertariansAmerican people of Dutch descentAmerican people of German descentAmerican philanthropistsBusinesspeople from KansasCato Institute peopleKansas RepublicansKoch familyMassachusetts Institute of Technology alumniMont Pelerin Society membersNon-interventionismPeople from Indian Wells, CaliforniaPeople from Wichita, KansasTea Party movement activistsHidden categories: Use American English from February 2016All Wikipedia articles written in American EnglishUse mdy dates from February 2016Articles with hCardsNo local image but image on WikidataArticles containing potentially dated statements from 2014All articles containing potentially dated statementsBLP articles lacking sources from June 2014All BLP articles lacking sourcesWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةবাংলাDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisՀայերենBahasa IndonesiaItalianoمازِرونیမြန်မာဘာသာOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаPortuguêsРусскийSimple EnglishSuomiSvenska 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 18 July 2017, at 13:49.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Charles Koch - Wikipedia





















 






Charles Koch

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Charles Koch


Born
Charles de Ganahl Koch
(1935-11-01) November 1, 1935 (age 81)
Wichita, Kansas, U.S.


Residence
Indian Wells, California, U.S.


Alma mater
Massachusetts Institute of Technology


Occupation
Chairman and CEO of Koch Industries


Net worth
$48.7 billion (February 2017)[1]


Political party
Republican


Spouse(s)
Liz Koch (m. 1972)


Children



Chase Koch[2]
Elizabeth Koch[3]





Parent(s)



Fred C. Koch
Mary Robinson





Relatives

Siblings:



Frederick R. Koch
David Koch
Bill Koch







Charles de Ganahl Koch (/ˈkoʊk/; born November 1, 1935) is an American businessman, political donor and philanthropist. He is co-owner, chairman of the board, and chief executive officer of Koch Industries, while his brother David Koch serves as Executive Vice President. Charles and David each own 42% of the conglomerate. The brothers inherited the business from their father, Fred C. Koch, then expanded the business.[4] Originally involved exclusively in oil refining and chemicals, Koch Industries now includes process and pollution control equipment and technologies; polymers and fibers; minerals; fertilizers; commodity trading and services; forest and consumer products; and ranching. The businesses produce a wide variety of well-known brands, such as Stainmaster carpet, the Lycra brand of spandex fiber, Quilted Northern tissue and Dixie Cup.
Koch Industries is the second-largest privately held company by revenue in the United States according to a 2010 Forbes survey.[5] In February 2014, Koch was ranked 9th richest person in the world by Hurun Report[6] with an estimated net worth of $36 billion. Previously, in October 2012 he was ranked the 6th richest person in the world with an estimated net worth of $34 billion—according to the Bloomberg Billionaires Index[7]—and was ranked 18th on Forbes World's Billionaires list of 2011 (and 4th on the Forbes 400), with an estimated net worth of $25 billion, deriving from his 42% stake in Koch Industries.[8] Koch has published three books detailing his business philosophy, The Science of Success,[9] Market Based Management,[10] and Good Profit.[11]
Koch supports a number of free market-oriented educational organizations, including the Institute for Humane Studies, the Ayn Rand Institute, and the Mercatus Center at George Mason University. He also contributes to the Republican Party and candidates, libertarian groups, and various charitable and cultural institutions. He co-founded the Washington, DC-based Cato Institute. Through the Koch Cultural Trust, founded by Charles Koch's wife, Elizabeth, the Koch family has also funded artistic projects and creative artists.[12]



Contents


1 Early life, education, and career
2 Political and economic views

2.1 Market-based management


3 Philanthropic and political activities
4 Personal life
5 Awards
6 See also
7 References
8 External links



Early life, education, and career[edit]
Koch was born and lives in Wichita, Kansas, one of four sons of Clementine Mary (née Robinson) and Fred Chase Koch.[13][14] Koch's grandfather, Harry Koch, was a Dutch immigrant who settled in West Texas, founded the Quanah Tribune-Chief newspaper, and was a founding shareholder of Quanah, Acme and Pacific Railway.[15] Among his maternal great-great-grandparents were William Ingraham Kip, an Episcopalian bishop, William Burnet Kinney, a politician, and Elizabeth Clementine Stedman, a writer.
In an interview with Warren Cassell Jr., which was recorded in February 2016, Koch explained that as a child he did not live a privileged lifestyle despite growing up in a wealthy family. Koch said, "My father wanted me to work as if I was the poorest person in the world."[16] Koch was educated at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology. He is a member of the Beta Theta Pi fraternity. He received a Bachelor of Science (B.S.) in General Engineering in 1957, a Master of Science (M.S.) in Nuclear Engineering in 1958, and a second M.S. in Chemical Engineering in 1960.[13] After college, Koch started work at Arthur D. Little, Inc. In 1961 he moved back to Wichita to join his father's business, Rock Island Oil & Refining Company.[17] In 1967 he became president of the business, which was then a medium-sized oil firm.[18] In the same year, he renamed the firm Koch Industries in honor of his father.[19] In 2006, Koch Industries generated $90 billion in revenue, a growth of 2000 times over, which represents an annual compounded return of 18%.[20] As of 2014[update], Koch was worth approximately $41.3[21] billion (in 2013 $36 billion) according to the Forbes 400 list.[13]
Koch has been a director of Entrust Financial Corp. since 1982 and director of Koch Industries Inc. since 1982. He is director of resin and fiber company Invista and director of Georgia-Pacific LLC, paper and pulp products. Koch founded or helped found several organizations, including the Cato Institute, the Institute for Humane Studies and the Mercatus Center at George Mason University, the Bill of Rights Institute, and the Market-Based Management Institute. He is a member of the Mont Pelerin Society.[22]
Political and economic views[edit]
Charles Koch is a classical liberal and has formerly identified as a libertarian.[23] He is opposed to corporate welfare[24] and told the National Journal that his "overall concept is to minimize the role of government and to maximize the role of private economy and to maximize personal freedoms."[25] He has expressed concern for too much government regulation in the U.S., stating that "we could be facing the greatest loss of liberty and prosperity since the 1930s."[26] In addition, he has warned that drastic government overspending and a decline of the free enterprise system will prove detrimental to long-term social and economic prosperity.[27]
Influences on Koch include Alexis de Tocqueville,[28] Adam Smith, Michael Polanyi,[17] Joseph Schumpeter, Julian Simon, Paul Johnson, Thomas Sowell, Charles Murray, Leonard Read, and F.A. Harper.[18] The presidents he most admires include George Washington, Grover Cleveland, and Calvin Coolidge. In an interview with the American Journal of Business, Koch said he owes "a huge debt of gratitude to the giants who created the Austrian School [of economics]. They developed principles that enabled me to gain an understanding of how the world works, and these ideas were a catalyst in the development of Market-Based Management." In particular, he expresses admiration for Ludwig von Mises’ book Human Action, as well as the writings of Friedrich Hayek.[17] Koch said "the short-term infatuation with quarterly earnings on Wall Street restricts the earnings potential of Fortune 500 publicly traded firms."[18] He also considers public firms to be "feeding grounds for lawyers and lawsuits," with regulations like Sarbanes–Oxley only increasing the earnings potential of privately held companies.[18]
Koch disdains "big government" and the "political class."[18] He believes billionaires Warren Buffett and George Soros, who fund organizations with different ideologies, "simply haven't been sufficiently exposed to the ideas of liberty."[18] Koch thinks "prosperity is under attack" by the Obama administration and "warns of policies that threaten to erode our economic freedom and transfer vast sums of money to the state."[29]
In an April 2011 Wall Street Journal op-ed, Koch wrote:

Government spending on business only aggravates the problem. Too many businesses have successfully lobbied for special favors and treatment by seeking mandates for their products, subsidies (in the form of cash payments from the government), and regulations and tariffs to keep more efficient competitors at bay. Crony capitalism is much easier than competing in an open market. But it erodes our overall standard of living and stifles entrepreneurs by rewarding the politically favored rather than those who provide what consumers want.[30]

His opposition to corporate welfare includes lobbying for the end to ethanol subsidies despite the fact that Koch Industries is a major ethanol producer. He is quoted as saying: “The first thing we’ve got to get rid of is business welfare and entitlements.”[31] Regarding government regulation, Koch has written that he expects his employees to cooperate fully with the law, regardless of personal views:

We needed to be uncompromising [with our workforce], to expect 100 percent of our employees to comply 100 percent of the time with complex and ever-changing government mandates. Striving to comply with every law does not mean agreeing with every law. But, even when faced with laws we think are counter-productive, we must first comply. Only then, from a credible position, can we enter into a dialogue with regulatory agencies to demonstrate alternatives that are more beneficial. If these efforts fail, we can then join with others in using education and/or political efforts to change the law.[32]

In an April 2014 Wall Street Journal op-ed, Koch wrote, "the fundamental concepts of dignity, respect, equality before the law and personal freedom are under attack by the nation's own government." He criticized the Obama Administration, saying that its "central belief and fatal conceit" is that people are not capable of running their own lives. "This is the essence of big government and collectivism," he wrote. He cited the "current health care debacle" as an example of disastrous government control. He complained that he had been the victim of "character assassination."[33][34]
In an November 2015 joint interview with his brother, David, on MSNBC's Morning Joe Koch, who supports a non-interventionist foreign policy,[35] criticized America's current foreign policy calling it a "form of insanity."[36]
Market-based management[edit]
Koch's business philosophy, "market-based management" (MBM), is described in his 2007 book The Science of Success. In an interview with the Wichita Eagle,[19] he said that he was motivated to write the book by Koch Industries' 2004 acquisition of Invista so he could give new employees a "comprehensive picture" of MBM. According to the website of the Market-Based Management Institute, which Koch founded in 2005, MBM is "based on rules of just conduct, economic thinking, and sound mental models", harnessing the dispersed knowledge of employees just as markets harness knowledge in society. "It is organized in and interpreted through five dimensions: vision, virtue and talents, decision rights, incentives, and knowledge processes."[37] In the book, Koch attempts to apply F. A. Hayek's spontaneous order theory and Austrian entrepreneurial theory, such as that of Mises and Israel Kirzner, to organizational management.[31][38] T. Boone Pickens argues that Koch's business success lends credibility to the book's concept.[38]
Philanthropic and political activities[edit]
See also: Political activities of the Koch brothers
Koch funds and supports libertarian and free-enterprise policy and advocacy organizations.[29] In 1977 he co-founded, with Edward H. Crane and Murray Rothbard, the Cato Institute.[39] He is a board member at the Mercatus Center, a market-oriented research think tank at George Mason University.[40]
In 2008, Koch was included in Businessweek's list of top 50 American givers. Between 2004 and 2008, Koch gave $246 million, focusing on "libertarian causes, giving money for academic and public policy research and social welfare."[41] Koch was awarded an Honorary Doctorate from George Mason University in recognition of his financial support "through scholarships, faculty recruitment, and research grants".[42] A leaked 2012 fundraising plan indicated that the Charles G. Koch Charitable Foundation contributed $25,000 in 2011 to The Heartland Institute, an American conservative and libertarian public policy think tank.[43][44][45]
Koch's philanthropic activities have focused on research, policy, and educational projects intended to advance free-market views. He has underwritten scholarships and financed the research of economists such as James Buchanan and Friedrich Hayek. He has also “supported efforts to inspire at-risk young people to consider entrepreneurship, to teach American students the principles of limited government, and to connect recent graduates with market-oriented organizations, in an effort to launch their careers in public policy.”[46]
Two works that have been especially influential upon Koch's philosophy are Ludwig Von Mises' Human Action and F. A. Harper's Why Wages Rise. After reading Harper's book, Koch became involved with Harper's Institute for Humane Studies, of which he became a principal supporter. He has been on the board of IHS since 1966. Since the 1980s, IHS has been increasingly interested in aiding the careers of aspiring educators, journalists, and policy professionals with an interest in classical liberal thought. Among other projects, the IHS runs the Charles G. Koch Summer Fellow Program, which “has supported more than 900 students during eight-week internships at public policy organizations, both in D.C. and around the country.”[46] In addition, almost 200 institutions of higher education in the U.S. are funded by the Charles Koch Foundation. What all the Koch-funded programs have in common is an interest in studying free societies with an eye to understanding how economic freedom benefits humanity.[46]
Through the Koch Cultural Trust, founded by Charles Koch's wife, Elizabeth, the Koch family has provided financial support to promising artists in a variety of fields. More than $1.7 million in grants have been awarded to programs and individuals with Kansas roots.[12]
Koch supported his brother's candidacy for vice president on the Libertarian Party ticket in 1980.[47] After the bid, Koch told a reporter that conventional politics "tends to be a nasty, corrupting business ... I’m interested in advancing libertarian ideas".[47] In addition to funding think tanks, Charles and David also support libertarian academics[48] and Koch funds the Charles G. Koch Summer Fellow Program through the Institute for Humane Studies which recruits and mentors young libertarians.[49] Koch also organizes twice yearly meetings[18] of Republican donors.[29]
Charles Koch looks favorably upon the Tea Party movement. "The way it's grown, the passion, and the intensity, was beyond what I had anticipated," he told an interviewer.[27] He's funded groups opposed to Barack Obama's administration.[47]
Koch has given money to support public policy research focused on "developing voluntary, market-based solutions to social problems."[50] He has given to the Bill of Rights Institute, a non-profit group that educates teachers, students, and others about the Bill of Rights.[50][51] He has also given to the Youth Entrepreneurs Kansas, an organization that teaches business skills to at-risk youth in Kansas schools.[52] Koch has also supported the Berkeley Earth Surface Temperature project, a scientific effort to compile an open database of the Earth's surface temperature records.[53]
In 2002, Koch Industries donated $6 million to renovate the Wichita State University basketball arena. The gift was given in honor of Koch, and the arena was subsequently renamed the Charles Koch Arena.[54] Koch has continued to be a major donor to both the university and its athletic program. In December 2014, Koch Industries and the Koch family foundation donated $11.25 million to the university, the largest one-time gift in school history, with $4.5 million of that going toward a plan to renovate the arena and expand the athletic program's academic support center.[55] Several months later, when men's basketball head coach Gregg Marshall was considering an offer to become head coach at the University of Alabama, Koch led a group of local business leaders and WSU boosters that raised Marshall's annual salary from $1.85 million to $3 million and kept him at the school. The raise was seen as an unprecedented move for a school outside the Power Five conferences, and likely to make Marshall among the 10 highest-paid college basketball coaches.[56]
In 2011, Koch was awarded the William E. Simon Prize for Philanthropic Leadership.[57] The award honors "the ideals and principles which guided William E. Simon's giving, including personal responsibility, resourcefulness, volunteerism, scholarship, individual freedom, faith in God, and helping people to help themselves."[58]
In July 2015 Charles Koch and his brother were praised by President Obama and Anthony Van Jones for their bipartisan efforts to reform the criminal justice system.[59][60] For roughly a decade Koch has been advocating for several reforms within the prison system, including the reduction of recidivist criminals, easing the employment process for rehabilitated persons, and the defense of private property from Asset forfeiture.[60][61] Aligning with groups such as the ACLU, the Center for American Progress, Families Against Mandatory Minimums, the Coalition for Public Safety, and the MacArthur Foundation, Koch believes the current system has unfairly targeted low-income and minority communities all while wasting substantial government resources.[60][62]
In February 2016, Koch penned an opinion piece in The Washington Post, where he said he agreed with presidential candidate Bernie Sanders about the unfairness of corporate welfare and mass incarceration in the United States.[63]
Personal life[edit]
Koch has been married to his wife Liz since 1972[64] and has two children, Chase Koch and Elizabeth Koch.[47] Charles and his three brothers have all suffered from prostate cancer.[65] Koch "rarely grants media interviews and prefers to keep a low profile".[19] TIME magazine included Charles and David Koch among the most influential people of 2011. According to the magazine, the list includes "activists, reformers and researchers, heads of state and captains of industry." The article describes the brothers' commitment to free-market principles, the growth and development of their business, and their support for liberty-minded organizations and political candidates.[4] He now lives in Indian Wells, California.[66]
Awards[edit]





This section of a biography of a living person needs additional citations for verification. Please help by adding reliable sources. Contentious material about living persons that is unsourced or poorly sourced must be removed immediately, especially if potentially libelous or harmful. (June 2014) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Koch has received various awards and honors, including:

Honorary Doctor of Science, from George Mason University, for his continued support of the economics program at GMU[67]
Honorary Doctor of Commerce from Washburn University[68]
Honorary Doctor of Laws from Babson College
President's Medal from Wichita State University in 2004
The Adam Smith Award from the American Legislative Exchange Council
The 1999 Directors' Award for Global Vision in Energy from the New York Mercantile Exchange
The 1999 Governor's Arts Patrons Award from the Kansas Arts Commission
The 2000 National Distinguished Service Award from The Tax Foundation
The Spirit of Justice Award from The Heritage Foundation
The Entrepreneurial Leadership Award from the National Foundation for Teaching Entrepreneurship
The Brotherhood/Sisterhood Award from the National Conference of Christians and Jews
The Distinguished Citizen Award from the Boy Scouts of America
The Free Enterprise Award from The Council for National Policy
The Herman W. Lay Memorial Award from the Association of Private Enterprise Education
The Distinguished Service Citation from the University of Kansas
Honorary Life Member in the Washburn Law School Association
The Distinguished Citizen Award from Kansas State University
Induction into the Kansas Oil and Gas Hall of Fame
Induction into the Wichita and Kansas Business Halls of Fame
Spirit of Excellence Award from The Urban League of Wichita
Outstanding Humanitarian Award from the Greater Wichita Chapter of the National Society of Fundraising Executives
Wichita City Medallion
Wichita State University Entrepreneur in Residence
Wichita District Minority Small Business Advocate of the Year
The Individual Recognition Award from the Wichita/Sedgwick County Arts and Humanities Council
The Uncommon Citizen Award from the Wichita Chamber of Commerce
The 2011 William E. Simon Prize for Philanthropic Leadership from the Philanthropy Roundtable
The 2011 Defender of Justice award from the National Association of Criminal Defense Lawyers[69]
In 2012, ExecReps ranked him number two on their Top Chief Executive List[70]

See also[edit]

Charles Koch Arena
Charles Koch Institute
Charles G. Koch Charitable Foundation
List of billionaires

References[edit]


^ "Charles Koch profile". Forbes. Retrieved 23 February 2017. 
^ Mr. Big Forbes.com. Retrieved November 2011.
^ "Koch, Charles (1935)". New Netherland Project. 
^ a b Ferguson, Andrew (21 April 2011). "The 2011 TIME 100". TIME. Retrieved 22 April 2011. 
^ The Top 10, America's Largest Private Companies Forbes.com. Retrieved April 2011.
^ [1] Hurun Report Global Rich List 2014
^ "Bloomberg". Bloomberg LP. Retrieved October 31, 2012. 
^ "'Charles Koch', Forbes profiles". 
^ Charles G. Koch (2007). The Science Of Success ISBN 9780470139882 Retrieved April 2011.
^ 2006, ISBN 9781931721998
^ "Charles Koch's New Book Out Tuesday" Biz Journals, Wichita, October 12, 2015. (ISBN 9780147520470)
^ a b "History". Koch Cultural Trust. Retrieved 3 April 2012. 
^ a b c "The 400 Richest Americans". Forbes. Massachusetts Institute of Technology, Bachelor of Arts / Science Massachusetts Institute of Technology, Master of Science Son of Koch Industries founder Fred C. Koch (d. 1967), MIT grad who invented method of refining gasoline from heavy oil. Took refining innovation to Soviet Union 1929; returned home 1930s. Sons Frederick, Charles, David and William inherited Koch Industries after father's death; Charles and David bought out William and Frederick for $1.3 billion in 1983. 
^ "FMK Foundation History". Fmkfoundation.org. Retrieved 2010-08-29. 
^ Daniel Fisher (26 February 2007). "Koch's Laws". Forbes. Retrieved 16 November 2010. 
^ "Interview with Charles Koch". Warren Cassell Jr. 
^ a b c "Twenty Questions for Charles Koch". American Journal of Business. Muncie. 24 (1): 15–8. Spring 2009. 
^ a b c d e f g Stephen Moore (May 6, 2006). "The Weekend Interview with Charles Koch: Private Enterprise". The Wall Street Journal. p. A.8. 
^ a b c Phyllis Jacobs Griekspoor (4 March 2007). "Charles Koch: His philosophy and his company". Wichita Eagle. 
^ Mark Skousen (4 March 2007). "Business Bookshelf: A Short Course In Long-Term Value". The Wall Street Journal. p. D.8. 
^ Carrie Sheffield. "Charles Koch". Forbes. 
^ Koch's bio at the Mercatus Center
^ "Charles Koch opens up about his 'classical liberal' views". Fox News. 15 October 2015. Retrieved 27 December 2015. 
^ The Koch Brothers December 24, 2012 p. 96 Forbes
^ National Journal (May 16, 1992)
^ The Top 10 Forbes Asia October 19, 2009.
^ a b Continetti, Matthew (April 4, 2011). "The Paranoid Style in Liberal Politics". The Weekly Standard. 
^ Koch, Charles, The Science of Success, p. 57
^ a b c Kate Zernike (25 October 2010). "Secretive Republican Donors Are Planning Ahead". The New York Times. 
^ Koch, Charles (March 1, 2011). "Why Koch Industries Is Speaking Out". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ a b Daniel Fisher (December 5, 2012). "Inside The Koch Empire: How The Brothers Plan To Reshape America". Forbes. 
^ Koch, Charles, The Science of Success, p. 45.
^ Koch, Charles (April 3, 2014). "Charles Koch: I'm Fighting to Restore a Free Society". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ Kopan, Tal (April 3, 2014). "Charles Koch calls critics ‘collectivists’". Politico. 
^ "Koch Brothers Question Wisdom of U.S. Interventionism". November 5, 2015. 
^ "Charles Koch: American Foreign Policy a 'Form of Insanity'". 
^ What is MBM? www.mbminstitute.org. Retrieved April 2011.
^ a b Schor, Elana (16 May 2011). "In Right's Energy-Subsidy Clash, Shades of Koch vs. Pickens". New York Times. New York Times. Retrieved 19 May 2011. 
^ "25 Years at Cato" (PDF). Retrieved 2009-07-10. 
^ "Board of Directors – Mercatus". Mercatus Center at George Mason University. Retrieved 23 January 2014. 
^ "The 50 Top American Givers". Bloomberg Businessweek. Retrieved 27 April 2011. 
^ Charles Koch receives honorary degree from George Mason University www.kochind.com. Retrieved April 2011.
^ "Climate skeptic group works to reverse renewable energy mandates". Washington Post. 
^ Gillis, Justin; Kaufman, Leslie (15 February 2012). "Leak Offers Glimpse of Campaign Against Climate Science". The New York Times. 
^ "The Heartland Institute 2012 Fundraising Plan" (PDF). The Heartland Institute. 15 January 2012. 
^ a b c Glassman, James. "Market-Based Man". Philanthropy Magazine. Philanthropy Roundtable. Retrieved 16 March 2012. 
^ a b c d Jane Mayer (August 30, 2010). "Covert Operations: The billionaire brothers who are waging a war against Obama". The New Yorker. Retrieved January 5, 2012. 
^ Brian Doherty (2008). Radicals for Capitalism: A Freewheeling History of the Modern American Libertarian Movement. PublicAffairs. p. 410. ISBN 1-58648-572-5. One longtime Koch lieutenant characterized the overall strategy of Koch's libertarian funding over the years with both a theatrical metaphor and an Austrian capital theory one: Politicians, ultimately, are just actors playing out a script. The idea is, one gets better and quicker results aiming not at the actors but at the scriptwriters, to help supply the themes and words for the scripts—to try to influence the areas where policy ideas percolate from: academia and think tanks. Ideas, then, are the capital goods that go into building policy as a finished product—and there are insufficient libertarian capital goods at the top of the structure of production to build the policies libertarians demand. 
^ "Charles G. Koch Summer Fellow Program". Institute for Humane Studies at George Mason University. Retrieved 2010-09-10. The Charles G. Koch Summer Fellow Program combines a paid public policy internship with two career skills seminars and weekly policy lectures. You’ll gain real-world experience, take a crash course in market-based policy analysis, and hone your professional skills. The intensive ten-week program begins in June and includes a $1,500 stipend and a housing allowance. 
^ a b "About Charles G. Koch". Charles G. Koch Foundation. February 2009. 
^ "Bill of Rights Institute". Media Matters for America. 
^ "Youth Entrepreneurs Kansas". Charles G. Koch Foundation. 
^ BEST donors, accessed 3/25/11
^ "Charles Koch Arena". Wichita State University. Retrieved 22 May 2013. 
^ Wenzl, Roy (December 16, 2014). "Koch gives $11.25 million to Wichita State". The Wichita Eagle. Retrieved April 3, 2015. 
^ Suellentrop, Paul (April 2, 2015). "Wichita State, community work together to keep Gregg Marshall". The Wichita Eagle. Retrieved April 3, 2015. 
^ "Winner of the 2011 William E. Simon Prize". philanthropyroundtable.org. 
^ "2011 William E. Simon Prize". Philanthropy Roundtable. Philanthropy Roundtable. Retrieved 29 April 2011. 
^ Nelson, Colleen Mccain; Fields, Gary (Jul 16, 2015). "Obama, Koch Brothers in Unlikely Alliance to Overhaul Criminal Justice". Wall Street Journal. 
^ a b c Horwitz, Sari (Aug 15, 2015). "Unlikely Allies". Washington Post. 
^ Hudetz, Mary (Oct 15, 2015). "Forfeiture reform aligns likes of billionaire Charles Koch, ACLU". The Topeka Capital Journal. 
^ "Koch brothers join Obama in advocating US prison reform". Russian Today. Jul 17, 2015. 
^ Koch, Charles G. (February 18, 2016). "Charles Koch: This is the one issue where Bernie Sanders is right". The Washington Post. Retrieved February 19, 2016. 
^ "About Charles G. Koch". Charles G. Koch Charitable Foundation. Retrieved 19 December 2010. 
^ "Donor aims to 'lick' illness that he has battled for 15 years". The Chronicle of Philanthropy. Retrieved 16 October 2011. 
^ Robinson, Peter (April 14, 2016). "Good Profit Part I". Uncomomn Knowledge. Hoover Institution. Video Interview, recorded March 18, 2016 
^ Levinthal, Dave. "Spreading the Free-Market Gospel". The Atlantic. Retrieved 2017-03-09. 
^ "Honorary Degree Recipients and Degrees Conferred Honoris Causa" (PDF). Washburn. 
^ Ball, Molly (Mar 3, 2015). "Do the Koch Brothers Really Care About Criminal-Justice Reform?". The Atlantic. 
^ "May 2013 ExecRank Top CEOs". 


External links[edit]

Profile at Koch Industries
Charles G. Koch Charitable Foundation
Profile at Philanthropy Roundtable
Names in the News: David and Charles Koch at FollowTheMoney.org
Political contributions from Influence Explorer at the Sunlight Foundation
Charles Koch at Bloomberg L.P.
Robinson, Peter (April 29, 2016). "Good Profit Part II". Uncommon Knowledge. Hoover Institution. Video Interview, recorded March 18, 2016 
Charles G. Koch at Goodreads







v
t
e


Koch family



Parents



Fred C. Koch: 1900–1967





Children



Frederick R. Koch: 1933
Charles Koch: 1935
David Koch: 1940
William Koch: 1940





Other



Harry Koch: 1867–1942





Major companies



Koch Industries





Other organizations



Koch family foundations
Charles Koch Institute
Citizens for a Sound Economy
Americans for Prosperity
David H. Koch Institute for Integrative Cancer Research
Bill of Rights Institute
Cato Institute





See also



Political activities of the Koch brothers
Mary R. Koch (ship)
The Science of Success (book)
Mercatus Center
Charles Koch Arena
David H. Koch Theater












v
t
e


Koch Industries



Invista



Antron
Comforel
Coolmax
Cordura
Dacron
Lycra
Polarguard
SolarMax
Stainmaster
Tactel
Thermolite





Georgia-Pacific



Angel Soft
Brawny
Colhogar
Delica
Demak'Up
DensArmor Plus
Dixie
KittenSoft
Lotus
Mardi Gras
Moltonel
Okay
Plytanium
Quilted Northern
Soft 'n Gentle
Sparkle
Tenderly
ToughRock
Tutto
Vanity Fair
Zee





Other units



ABKO Properties
Flint Hills Resources
Koch Chemical Technology Group
Koch Fertilizer
Koch Minerals
KochPAC
Koch Pipeline Company
Koch Supply & Trading
Matador Cattle Company
Molex





Key people



Charles Koch
David Koch
Richard Fink
Kevin Gentry












v
t
e


The World's Billionaires – Top ten richest people in the world as of 20 April 2017






 Bill Gates ($86.0B, United States)
 Warren Buffett ($75.6B, United States)
 Jeff Bezos ($72.8B, United States)
 Amancio Ortega ($71.3B, Spain)
 Mark Zuckerberg ($56.0B, United States)
 Carlos Slim ($54.5B, Mexico)
 Larry Ellison ($52.2B, United States)
 Charles Koch ($48.3B, United States)
 David Koch ($48.3B, United States)
 Michael Bloomberg ($47.5B, United States)












v
t
e


Wealthiest people in the United States by state







AL
Jimmy Rane


AK
Leonard Hyde and Jonathan Rubini


AZ
Bruce Halle


AR
Jim Walton


CA
Mark Zuckerberg


CO
Charlie Ergen


CT
Ray Dalio


DE
Robert W. Gore and Elizabeth Snyder


FL
Thomas Peterffy


GA
Jim Kennedy


HI
Pierre Omidyar


ID
Frank L. VanderSloot


IL
Kenneth C. Griffin


IN
Carl Cook


IA
Harry Stine


KS
Charles Koch


KY
B. Wayne Hughes


LA
Tom Benson


ME
Bill and Susan Alfond


MD
Ted Lerner


MA
Abigail Johnson


MI
Dan Gilbert


MN
Whitney MacMillan


MS
Leslie Lampton


MO
Stan Kroenke


MT
Dennis Washington


NE
Warren Buffett


NV
Sheldon Adelson


NH
Andrea Reimann-Ciardelli


NJ
Donald Newhouse


NM
Mack C. Chase


NY
Michael Bloomberg


NC
James Goodnight


ND
Gary Tharaldson


OH
Les Wexner


OK
Harold Hamm


OR
Phil Knight


PA
Mary Alice Dorrance Malone


RI
Jonathan M. Nelson


SC
Anita Zucker


SD
T. Denny Sanford


TN
Thomas F. Frist Jr.


TX
Alice Walton


UT
Gail Miller


VT
John Abele


VA
Jacqueline Mars


WA
Bill Gates


WV
Jim Justice


WI
John Menard Jr.


WY
John Mars










Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 36349742
LCCN: n2006075374
ISNI: 0000 0001 1489 9756
GND: 136727751










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Charles_Koch&oldid=791155318"					
Categories: 1935 birthsLiving people20th-century American businesspeople21st-century American businesspeopleAmerican billionairesAmerican businesspeople in the oil industryAmerican chief executives of energy companiesAmerican chief executives of manufacturing companiesAmerican libertariansAmerican people of Dutch descentAmerican people of German descentAmerican philanthropistsBusinesspeople from KansasCato Institute peopleKansas RepublicansKoch familyMassachusetts Institute of Technology alumniMont Pelerin Society membersNon-interventionismPeople from Indian Wells, CaliforniaPeople from Wichita, KansasTea Party movement activistsHidden categories: Use American English from February 2016All Wikipedia articles written in American EnglishUse mdy dates from February 2016Articles with hCardsNo local image but image on WikidataArticles containing potentially dated statements from 2014All articles containing potentially dated statementsBLP articles lacking sources from June 2014All BLP articles lacking sourcesWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةবাংলাDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisՀայերենBahasa IndonesiaItalianoمازِرونیမြန်မာဘာသာOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаPortuguêsРусскийSimple EnglishSuomiSvenska 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 18 July 2017, at 13:49.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft














james koch - NetFind Content Results










AOL Search
Skip over navigation


















Search the Web




























Web


Web



Content











James Koch | Vitals.com



Ad
 ·
Vitals.com/​Dr_James Koch



Find James Koch Online Free phone number, address & report




Find James Koch Records | peoplelooker.com



Ad
 ·
www.peoplelooker.com/​James Koch



Have Information at Your Fingertips Instantly. Try PeopleLooker Today!





Uncover Potential Relatives



Photos & Videos



Historical Deeds




Location History



Email Address



Monitor Social Info





James Koch | UCompareHealthCare.com



Ad
 ·
UCompareHealthCare.com/​James Koch



Phone Number, Locations Ratings, Reviews & Compare















David Koch (television presenter)




David James Koch (born 7 March 1956), nicknamed "Kochie" , is an Australian television presenter best known as a host of the Seven Network's breakfast program Sunrise. From Adelaide,

more


Go to:
Encyclopedia
-
News
-
Videos
-
Reference


Source:
Wikipedia







Results From The WOW.Com Content Network

Koch Brothers' Groups Criticize GOP Senate ... - HuffPost

www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/koch-brothers-obamacare_us_594fc204e4...


Koch Brothers' Groups Criticize GOP Senate Health Care Bill For ... fix health care,” James Davis, the Koch network ... want to share with HuffPost?


Jim Koch, Sam Adams Beer Creator, Becomes Craft Beer's ...

www.huffingtonpost.com/2013/09/10/jim-koch-sam-adams-billionaire_n...


Jim Koch, the 64-year-old co-founder of Boston Beer Company, has a lot of reasons to raise a bottle of one of his trademark Samuel Adams Boston Lager's i...


Jim Koch - WOW.com

www.wow.com/wiki/Jim_Koch


Jim Koch; Jim Koch, 2013. Born May 27, 1949 (age 68) Alma mater: Harvard University: Known for: ... C. James "Jim" Koch (pronounced / k ...


I Was Manhandled by a Koch Capo | HuffPost

www.huffingtonpost.com/lauren-windsor/i-was-manhandled-by-a-koc_b...


I Was Manhandled by a Koch Capo. ... Later Freedom Partners Executive Vice President of Communications James Davis approached us in the lobby.


Jane Seymour Opens Up On Divorce From James Keach

www.huffingtonpost.com/2014/12/12/jane-seymour-divorce_n_6315274.html


Like most people married for more than 20 years, Jane Seymour never thought her marriage would end. "That …


The Kochs Are Plotting A Multimillion-Dollar Assault On ...

www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/koch-electric-vehicles_us_56c4d63ce4b...


The Kochs Are Plotting A Multimillion-Dollar Assault On Electric Vehicles ... and prolific conservative donors -- Charles and David Koch. James Mahoney, ...


The Four Horsemen Of The Trumpocalypse: Koch, Mercer ...

www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/the-four-horsemen-of-the...koch-mercer...


The Four Horsemen Of The Trumpocalypse: Koch, Mercer, Bannon, And Trump Himself. ... may soon be deciphering Koch’s “intentions,” not James Madison’s.


Endangered Facts: Sen. Inhofe's Attack on the Endangered ...

www.huffingtonpost.com/noah-greenwald/endangered-facts-sen-inhofe...


The nation's climate-denier-in chief, Oklahoma Sen. James Inhofe, ... and development companies- including Koch Industries and Murray Energy.


Sam Adams' Founder Jim Koch On How To Be A Ruthless Beer ...

www.huffingtonpost.com/2013/05/02/samuel-adams-beer-jim-koch_n...


Sam Adams' Founder Jim Koch On How To Be A Ruthless Beer Merchant. ... founder Jim Koch how he grew Sam ... Sam Adams' Founder Jim Koch On How To Be ...


To Charles Koch, Professors are Lobbyists | HuffPost

www.huffingtonpost.com/connor-gibson/to-charles-koch-professor_b...


This article is the second of two posts examining Charles Koch's campus investments, as reported in Jane Mayer's Dark Money. ... James Otteson, ...










James Koch | Vitals.com



Ad
 ·
Vitals.com/​Dr_James Koch



Find James Koch Online Free phone number, address & report




Find James Koch Records | peoplelooker.com



Ad
 ·
www.peoplelooker.com/​James Koch



Have Information at Your Fingertips Instantly. Try PeopleLooker Today!





Uncover Potential Relatives



Photos & Videos



Historical Deeds




Location History



Email Address



Monitor Social Info





James Koch | UCompareHealthCare.com



Ad
 ·
UCompareHealthCare.com/​James Koch



Phone Number, Locations Ratings, Reviews & Compare



Searches related tojames koch



jim koch


james koch austin tx


james koch obituary


james koch net worth



jim koch sam adams


dr james koch


james koch lawyer chicago


james koch md




12345Next

Related Searches



jim koch


james koch austin tx


james koch obituary


james koch net worth


jim koch sam adams


dr james koch


james koch lawyer chicago


james koch md




















Search the Web

















© AOL Inc. All Rights Reserved.Privacy
 | Terms of Use
 | Preferences
 | Contact Us
 | Powered by Bing™

Wow.com - Part of the AOL Search Network








